First off, I cannot believe how mad this game has made me.  I like all kinds of games, but honestly trying to figure out some of the levels in this game left me stumped.  It's one thing to be stuck somewhere and have to retry a lot, but several times during this game I was stuck in an area and had no idea where to do/what to do, etc... even after I killed all the bad guys I didn't know how to get out of the room.  This game is not intuitive (sp?) at all!Secondly, this game should not be called the Incredibles, it should be called Mr. Incredible, because you play as him almost all the time.  Playing as Elasta-Girl is great, I really enjoyed that part, but when there are a lot of baddies with guns, Mr. Incredible is a pain since he has no way to block anything, so you spend a lot of time getting pushed back until the bad guys reload.I liked the first mission as Dash (when you play as Dash, which is only twice) you have to run fast; however the second mission I just lost my patience because I had to restart about a million times because I couldn't see what was ahead of me.Playing a Violet was bad, they should have done a lot more with her instead of a boring stealth mission.  The Incredi-ball mission Incredibi-sucked, it took me like an hour to hit something because it was in a difficult place.I'm just finishing up the game now and quite frankly I haven;'t enjoyed a lot of it, which is a shame because I really loved the movie.  Some of the levels are too hard because you can barely find the way to do something and Mr. Incredible needs to do more than punch people.  Currently I'm on the Rocket Silo level and I keep falling down trying to get onto a platform.  What a load of fun that is to do 100 times or more.Bottom line:  Playing as Elasta-girl was fun, everything else was either blah, or made me want to swear a lot.  Hopefully the second game will be better.  I'll be renting that instead of buying, this game left me disappointed overall</review_text>
Shouldn't you  people know by now?Say it with me:NEVER BUY MOVIE GAMES.A friend of mine bought it and it was horrible.It was way too easy to die in,etc,etc,etc.Hey listen.Keep you money.Your investment isn't in here</review_text>
I bought the KR Party bundle for my boyfriend's daughter for her birthday. She loves the game, but it has only been about two weeks and the mic is dead. It started with the static for a while, but then while I was singing, it just died completely. I know I'm not a great singer, but I'm not THAT bad</review_text>
I bought this mic in December and after only two nights of singing, it completely died!  What a complete disappointment.  Save your money!</review_text>
This game was originally released for 10 dollars. Almost everything about it is pulled straight from Diablo and is not quite as good. Though this game has a few things about it that are interesting, and can be enjoyable to some people, I would just skip this game and go for Diablo 2</review_text>
This game is, simply put, not good. I got bored to tears playing it, then ended up giving it away because it was robbing useful space on my desk. It is slow-paced, predictable, and not suspenseful at all. In fact, these characteristics are probably why it's so mainstream, even though it's laughable in comparison to real first-person shooters, which by the way don't even belong on consoles. Owning at this game means you are an average player. Any true FPS gamer knows what childish, pathetic garbage this is, while the rest just go with the hype. Many have successfully deceived themselves into thinking it's worth anything at all. It isn't</review_text>
I used to love this game, but there are so many better games out there, plus this game is overated, with a not so good storyline, and nerdy weapons, it's just not good</review_text>
the vertical stand is wonderfull... but why? you can do this with 2 useless dvd cases and some duck tape... I put my PS slim vertically and it helps but why waste the time buying the product? I bought it just for kicks... literally</review_text>
If you're looking to spend money on this, don't. Having spent my teen years holed up in my bedroom on a Commodore 64 (and being the current fan that I am), I was really excited when I heard about this product. Unfortunately, it stinks. There are a couple of games on this contraption that are real gems, the rest being mediocre at best. The overall bad choice of games isn't my issue with this thing though. It's the CRUMMY JOYSTICK. Control is horrible. The stick is clunky and unresponsive and makes playing a real chore. As someone else pointed out in their review, often it doesn't even respond when pushed in a certain direction. I can't believe it's 2006 yet these companies releasing plug-n-play video game contraptions can't even make a decent joystick! A real letdown</review_text>
Not as much fun as I remember. Maybe better if they had a better selection of games (One on One, Hardball, etc.</review_text>
I purchased this product for my niece,having had positive experiences with similar items,and finding the price to be too tempting.However,what had been the hope of introducing her to the videogames of my generation turned into an exercise in frustration from the outset.The screw to the battery casing stripped with very little application of a screwdriver,the titles suffered from redundancy,and many of them required the use of too many buttons.What was the most disappointing aspect of this item was the potential it possessed; perhaps fewer similar titles and a re-configuration of the button commands would ensure the promise of this product</review_text>
I was really excited when I saw this item was out!  I had the Commodore 64 when I was a kid, and my brother and I used to spend hours and hours playing games on it.  I was so glad to see that Winter Games and Summer Games was included.... until the item arrived and I plugged it in and tried to play with it.. the joystick doesn't work at ALL when you move it to the right.  So, you can only use it to go up down or left.BIG Dissapointment.  Don't waste your $$</review_text>
This second part of Xenosaga compares very badly to the stellar first part, regardless of what anyone says.  I no longer wanted to play this game after only 30 minutes.The game begins with lots of boring instructions for a very non-intuitive battle system.  Annoying amount of experience points is needed to defeat nearly every main enemy, including the very first one.  Battle result and saving screens are a painful chore.Battle camera is inadequate and characters look and act like small puppets.  The game has very few items, weapons, or armor to deal with even ordinary enemies, which are stronger than expected.  The skill combination that will be successful on a main enemy is not available until engaged by that enemy.  Battles with main enemies are long, which isn't such a problem.  However, they often conveniently power up at the end of the battle, just to frustratingly finish off a battle-weakened party.Voice acting is very uninspired and sometimes even annoying.  I don't remember any music from this game, so plain it is.  Some character changes are likely to upset at least half of everyone who liked the first Xenosaga.  Very noticeable is the use of swearing, which is the main reason I don't enjoy or watch Hollywood movies during my rest and relaxation anymore.New, meaningless characters have been introduced into the story, and the focus shifted far away from the main characters.  The cover character hardly says or does anything this time.  There is one short scene between the main characters during a critical moment, but if you blink you will miss it.This game is far more frustrating than challenging, which is not a good game trait.  I don't recommend even playing this game before reading the above, to fully prepare for the disappointment that awaits.  If you're looking forward to anything that made the first Xenosaga great, you will be extremely disappointed.  The second Xenosaga is better completely avoided.</review_text>
I loved the first Xenosaga. Then, this arrived. Episode 2 isen't a bad game in terms of the story, the intro is absolutely DYNAMITE. Then you get into a battle. Now, if you like tactical stuff, this is a good game for you. But if you're trying to fight your way through a hoard of enemies to get to a save point in record timing, I say save your money. Gone is the amazingly well-done battle system in the first episode. In its place stands a completely out-of-nowhere new way of battling that takes 15 minutes to get rid of a couple of easy enemies( the easy ones in this game have around 2000 Hps). Ridiculous, but that's not all. The enemies have weak "zones" that depend of the height of the attack that you input.The zones are A,B and C, A being the highest. Triangle=C, square=B and Circle=A -SOMETIMES-. See what I mean? It's completely screwed-up and you have to become deeplyaddicted to the game to understand its full potential. And if       that wasn't enough, they changed the voice actors too. Kos-Mos'svoice sounds more like an operator than a robot's and Momo sounds like a brat. At least, chaos' voice has improved. I'd prefer playing episode 1 twice than playing this. I just hope Namco comes out with a better sequel, otherwise spend your moey on something else (like Shadow Hearts, for example).</review_text>
Pros:- Mechs are a bigger part of the games (you actually have to use them),- The graphics of the cutscreens are great, and the graphics overall are betterthan before,- A couple of the characters look better,- Much harder than Episode I,- More optional bosses,Cons:- New battle system is a load of mouse spunk (can I say spunk?),- Most characters look worse (especially Kos-Mos), and Jin travelsthroughout space with no pants on,- Almost all of the sidequests are terrible,- Very short,- The story is much weaker,- The dictionary is gone; and so are Shion's glasses,- No shops. Why are there no shops?- Too much more to list.  Just bad.  The movie "Howard the Duck" is better thanthis</review_text>
We got this game free in a box of Corn Chex. We thought, Oh this will be fun since the show is cool. So we got home and played it and it was so annoying! There's just like a black screen before and after the question shows up and a black background. Just, don't buy it if you want to have any fun</review_text>
When Disney Interactive released &quot;Who Wants to Be a Millionaire,&quot; in early 2000, they anticipated a very warm response to the disc, which had a firm but low opening price. However, when actually being played, the game is sure to depress. If it isn't crudely simple, the design is poor and uninspired. The entire game is essentially based on one lackluster thing: Regis Philbin repeating the same phrases over and over again. &quot;Be Sure to come back to... Who Wants to be a Millionaire.&quot; &quot;I hope you'll join me again on... Who Wants to be a Millionaire.&quot; If one doesn't decide to resell (or simply trash) this game within its first week of purchase, they work for Disney Interactive or are Regis themselves. Don't waste your time on this pitiful effort</review_text>
Driving physics are as unrealistic as they can get.  Obtaining licenses is extremely difficult, made worse by poor car physics.  Your heavy car easily bounces off light cars, while light cars easily derail your heavy car.  Turning the steering wheel only slightly produces heavy tire squeal, and that's with sports tires!Long gone are the ESPN-like replays of GT 2.  For some reason cars look thinner than before.  The analog tachometer has been reduced to just a bar across the screen.  The 3D mechanics can be headache prone, made worse by the poor physics of the cars.  Easily the most inadequate music ever.The game makes you start with a used model of only certain makes, which is nothing new.  However, it takes a long time to earn any money for a better car.  Only 7 horsepower upgrades make huge differences on the track?!  The game has mostly only newer models, almost none from a few years ago, unlike in GT 2.The only good thing about this game is that you don't have to drive all the time.  The B-Spec driving mode can win races for you.  Just leave for a few minutes and return to a victory screen.  This can help in skipping the painful, early parts of the game.The powertrain is still not modifiable.  Compression, bore, stroke, camshaft timing/overlap, valve size, and other engine characteristics are still not available.  With poor driving physics, engine modification would not have helped this game.Loading times are very long, with the most annoying loading indicator ever.  Constant auto saving feature is quick but can become annoying.  There is an excessive amount of confirmation screens.This game is a yet another disappointment, much like GT 3 was.  The makers of this game made it quite clear that if you want to know what the real cars drive like, you will have to drive them for real.  The Gran Tourismo series are over, unlikely to return to what they used to be.  I'm not a racing game fan, but only GT 2 was good enough for me to buy.  If you want good, car make-independent physics, you need to play Gran Tourismo 2.</review_text>
DOn't buy this - it will crash your entire xbox.  Learn to play - forget the cheats</review_text>
If you are looking for codes like Game Shark had, this is not for you.  Not only do you HAVE to have a computer, If anything happens to the disk, you are screwed.  You won't be able reinstall windows, or install it on a new computer.  Some games do offer rewards like unlimited health for %100 completion.  So if those are they games you plan on using,  this is the best thing out there</review_text>
returned item for refund; found it cheaper at Toys R U</review_text>
SMALL MEMORY WHICH MEANS THAT U CAN ONLY PUT 1 SAVE ON IT SO U HAVE TO RUN BACK TO YOUR COMP EVERYTIME U WANNA SAVE!!! AND SOFTWARE IS VEERY CONFUSING!!! HORRIBLE BUY!!! I RETURNED THE PIECE OF JUNK!!</review_text>
I am extreamly dissapointd with this game.  Every section and mission is exactly the same with the exception of the location.  There is absolutly no skill involved in beating the game which i was able to do in 3 sittings.</review_text>
Really? Wow. So, players in real football go through other players torso's? They skate and glide around the field at 40MPH without moving their legs? WR's change direction on one foot, pivot, glide and elude tackles? Uh, ok.Anyone who plays this game on the All-madden level will notice right away that this is the furthest thing from a realistic football game.What are the nerds at EA thinking? Do they ENJOY making a game who's AI constantly cheats? I love how they tout games that "give the user more control" when the user has very LITTLE CONTROL over anything that goes on in the game. I don't control if I catch it or drop it, or intercept it, or if my line blocks, of if my DB's cover their assignment...none of it. The COMPUTER makes my line miss blocks or not block at all...drop easy picks...drop easy catches, etc. And why, oh why, are DT's and LB's faster than my fastest WR? Is THAT realistic? The AI is terrible. It blatantly and UNrealistically cheats.Terrible game. Just stop making these games if this is your final product</review_text>
This game is a joke. It is the same exact game as the 2005 version with minimal additions. The online play is so glitchy and drops so often its not even worth the time. Do not go out and buy this game thinking that its better because of all the hype. If you want to play a great football game go get NFL 2K5 by 2KSports/Sega Sports. This game is 3 years old and blows Madden away any day of the week. In 2k5 you are able to go to roster manager and change your rosters to make them current. You can edit players and create rookies like Reggie Bush or Jerious Norwood and make the roster the same as the current 2007 NFL lineups. Madden bought the rights to be the only official Nfl game for the sole reason that Madden sucks and he wants to make all the money and not spend any money improving his game. Madden bought the rights to the Nfl trademak through 2010 so no other companies could make an official Nfl game and thats why there is no 2k7 or any other game football game for it to compete with. Thats why Blitz is the only other game and they cannot use Nfl players so they have to have a generic game without real players. I hate Madden with a passion. 2K Sports is the way to go for any sports game including football you just have to do some manual labor updating rosters but once you have it is current and still 10x better than Madden will ever be. DO NOT BUY THIS GAME!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!</review_text>
I swear if it wasn't that i liked final fantasy 7 and 8 so much i'd just break this game at then i'd move on and be happy. But i can't do that because that would be waste of money the only thing that kept me in the game was the fact that i did'nt want to waste money. This game makes kingdom hearts look like a M rated game. Oh my god this is so childish. You know how in most final fantasy games they try to make the main character cool they didn't feel like doing that in this one. You are a monkey-man! How stupid is that. Plus the other character are way more dumb looking that the main one im just happy i beat in and can put that awful exp. behind me. AHHHHHHHHHH</review_text>
I have been an extremely devoted SMB fan since the very first time I laid eyes on it. I own ALL of them, and so when I stood in line all night Saturday (and through Sunday morning, 8am), I made sure to grab myself a copy of SMB: Banana Blitz for my brand new Wii. I bought an entire set of controllers, anticipating the mini-game fun with all my friends. (We're huge SMB fans, all of us. It always makes an appearance at our parties.)But now I'm really angry. They completely gutted our favorite mini-game(s), hitting Monkey Target worst of all. I can honestly say I don't care that there are 50 freakin mini-games, because now Monkey Target is completely worthless. Instead of the amazingly subtle game play with bonus items, increasingly difficult levels, magnets, velcro, double bonuses, wind speed and direction, and the all-import ramp run-off you have... a cannon, one level, no wind or wind direction, no bonuses, and no special items.Who cares if I can SORT of pilot a submarine on a single level? Monkey squash -- no joy there. A lot of the controls for the mini-games are terrible. And so on, so forth. The new mini games suck almost unilaterally, but gosh darn, there are 50 of them! But volume does not make up for lack of quality.I love traditional SMB levels and the ones on SMB: Banana Blitz are nice. The graphics are beautiful and fun. But the best part of the game for me and my friends, is now gone and dead. None of the reviews I'd read mentioned the fact that this favorite of most SMB players was killed like this, and if they had, I certainly wouldn't have wasted my $50 plus tax.If Sega people are reading this: BRING BACK MONKEY TARGET. That's what people play at parties when they're slightly drunk and sick of listening to Super Smash Brothers, and way too awake to enjoy Mario Party</review_text>
As was said in a earlier review the creators of final fantasy are giving us everything but what we actually asked for.  They gave us Advent Children, cell phone games, and finally Dirge of Cerberus.  This game is an action based game showing you a day in the life of the most under-used and least interesting character in the Final Fantasy Series.  Its the creators way of telling us that they will never re-make Final Fantasy VII but will rather insult us with every marketing ploy know to man</review_text>
All of the people that gave this game a review of more than two stars are bs-ing you.  Those people are probably hardcore ff7 fans - that game was barely mediocre at best.  Other ff7 releases = advent children, cell phone game, and movie/tv show thing.  All three things, resectively, sucked.  Now comes, "Dierge of Cerberus"  whoop did eeee doo!!  The only reason why I rented it was because the title says, "final fantasy" in it.  The only redeeming quality of this game is the cutscenes - other than that, boring.  If you can get more than 20 minutes through the game, then by all means, it's the game for you</review_text>
I really wanted to like this game.. unfortunately for me, it blows. I'd trade it for a migraine if I could. The gameplay is pretty horrible, the sword scenes are reminiscent of PC adventure games circa 1992, where you press the "Attack" key and  swing your sword aimlessly at the bad-guy. The run & gun part of the game is nothing to write home about either. It feels like being teleported into the body of a cracked-out, 1 legged, drunken monkey.Also, I know the graphics aren't the Wii's strong-point, but that is no excuse to regress back to 8-bit. When you're trying to shoot someone across the room, it really sucks when you can't tell them  apart from a flower pot.....or is that a lawn chair?The cut scene's were obviously supposed to look like Sin City. I stress the word SUPPOSED cause they were probably strung together by some poor intern after the development team went into hiding. They look like an amateur flash slide-show. Kinda like what your local mom & pop video editor would have put together if your little nephew had gotten his way and had a Sin City themed Bar Mitzvah.This game is a joke. Anybody associated with it should be embarrassed.</review_text>
I can't stand this game after 5 minutes. The game is so unresponsive its not funny.  The first board I wanted to throw my remote. My friend watching asked me what the hell was going on. I seriosly didn't move the remote at all and my guy starts spinning around. At first I thought maybe the control calibration is wrong but then I was playing trauma center before and after Red steel and not once did i have a problem with the controls. Seriously the worst game i ever played</review_text>
This is a perfect example of false advertisement. If you're like the many that i've heard of trying to order a remote for the Playstation 2, Don't order this one unless you have a newer model. The picture shows an IR unit but it doesn't come with one. So save yourself the hassle and don't order this</review_text>
I saw a DVD player at Target for $30 yesterday.  I especially don't see the need for the xbox 360 remote if it's $40!!  Space-saving, maybe???</review_text>
A simple DVD player, as long as you or a friend own an X-box console. Simply push in a little plastic knob into the controler socket and their you go oyu know own a standard of the line DVD player.The maginfacation is great the rewind and fastfrward is great.It has all the extras a normal DVD player has and a easy to operate menu and layout.No overloads of pointless buttons just point out the obvious structer.You may be dissapointed in the response time, but that is not entirely the remote or players fault.If you own an old x-box console or a low memory X-box console  you may encounter slowness and maxed out freezing.Some mint condition titles may not even work.(I purchased "Little Nicky" sometime ago mint and to this date it still does not work on my X-box console)Batteries may play a roll.With out a doubt though this is the most easy and portable DVD player around with the acknowledgement of owning an X-box console first.A must have for a gamer/movie lover wit ha large movie library or a constant renter</review_text>
"Hey kids, fire up the XBOX and lets watch this movie!"That is what is heard through households that own an XBOX but for some reason or another they are still in the 90's and don't already have a DVD player.Like my title suggests, if you already have a DVD player, this is a waste of money. The only reason I purchased one is because my DVD player had problems playing some DVD-R's that I got from a friend. I had some money to burn so I just wanted to see if the XBOX DVD kit could play it to determine if the DVD was a bad burn or was it just my DVD player. I found that the XBOX was able to play the DVD-R's in question with no problem. However, aside from those two DVD-R's, all of the DVD's I own are bought from retail stores, so I really have no need to play DVD-R's, and my DVD player plays normal discs perfectly.With that being said, I only used XBOX's DVD playback kit once to watch the DVD-R's I had problems with. Because of the content of these burned "movies", there is really no need to watch them again....... However if push comes to shove I can always use one of my PC's or Mac to watch the burned DVD; no need to use my XBOX for that. I meant to return the DVD kit the next day, but never got around to it.The XBOX's DVD player is a good feature, but the fact that Microsoft charges you to use the feature makes it not worth the money.....unless of course you don't have a DVD player at all.</review_text>
My only experience with this product was after I opened it, and started to play a DVD in my Xbox, when I tried to pause it, it didn't work, and it had brand new batteries. I found (after much frustration) that if I smacked it against my hand a few times then it would work for about 2 minutes. I took it back to exchange for another in hopes that it was just a bad unit, but it was sold out so I just got my money back. You can buy a DVD player for not much more than this way overpriced piece of junk costs</review_text>
DO NOT USE THISthe dvd thing causes  the xbox to break. when u play games the disk doesnt constantly spin. it reads some and takes break so it doesnt over heat. when it reads a dvd, it must constantly spin. the dvd playback kit fryed my xbox. at most "best buy"s you can buy a dvdplayer that functions better for less money than the one for xbox.</review_text>
this just sucks the main person just keeps running around.He just keeps running and or walking which is controlled thru the key board.no fwd bike control,he won't peddle, but gos backwards quite well.Tryed different setups reloads and nothing worked.Atleast I bought it used and for not much money.Maybe ill find a fix and try it again later</review_text>
I'm going to start this review by saying that I came to the Wii as a lifetime PC-only gamer. I have never felt the need to buy a console until the Wii and its fun controller system came out. The aspect I was most excited about was controlling first person shooters just as precisely and intuitively as the mouse and keyboard, together with the added entertainment of using it for other motion-activated actions within the game (rowing, throwing grenades, close combat, etc). As a result, after spending the night out in the cold to get my console, and flushed with excitement at seeing all the merchandise, I grabbed three games: Zelda (a no-brainer), Trauma Center, and Call of Duty 3. Of those three titles, I'm sorry to say that CoD 3 was the one to leave a bitter taste in my mouth.As I have stated before, I am a PC gamer; I'm really into my hobby, and love the satisfaction of building a PC which can manage all the latest games. I played CoD 1 and 2 on the PC, and greatly enjoyed both. By far the biggest problem with the Wii version, however, especially as someone accustomed to playing on the computer, are the graphical shortcomings of the title. I literally had no idea what was going on. I could barely tell which direction the enemies were coming from and the only reason why I was going in the right direction was because of the linear construction of most of the levels. Added to this, I had no idea how to get rid of the first German to engage me in hand to hand combat (a much advertised feature, which is actually just an interactive cut-scene). I followed the instructions to wave my controllers around wildly, and although I worked myself into a frenzy (causing my dogs to panic and think something really was attacking me) that inevitable German (I tried throwing all my grenades into the room he hides in) kept clubbing me to death. Even beyond this setback, I found that the controls were often quite poorly implemented. It is also disappointing (yet speaks volumes) that the grenade 'throwing' function that involves you actually 'throwing' the nunchuck (without letting go, by the way, unless you've got a backup TV) is disabled by default; trying to use it usually gets you to miss your target/get cut down/ blow yourself up. For the record, I know that the Wii controller works. I've played many hours of other games already (as the system conveniently informs you). This just seems like a shoddy implementation of it.I can definitely tell you that there is a lot of ambition here to convey the frenzy of war, with some obvious strong attempts at creating absorbing combat scenes. Nevertheless, it essentially boils down to being a messy soup of blurry pixels which, even to my gameplay-over-graphics mentality in buying the Wii, blocks the enjoyability of this title. To be honest, it has made me think that WW2 isn't the best-suited area for the Wii. After all, these historical titles tend to rely a great deal on cinematically portraying the visceral splendor of war, rather then pushing exciting new gameplay elements. My advice on the FPS front: wait for the Wii 'Far Cry' game and see how that turns out. In the meantime, there are countless hours of other great titles more suited to the Wii graphics waiting for your attention.Before leaving you, I'd just like to clarify on thing: this is the perspective of someone who has very little experience with consoles. Perhaps you're reaction to the game will be very different if you come to the Wii straight from a gamecube instead of PC/high definition gaming.Oh, and if you're still determined to buy it, keep an eye out for my used copy of the game; I'm going to need the money for 'Banana Blitz'..</review_text>
I haven't even got to play it yet because the game does not work on my PS2. After the PS2 logo comes up, the screen goes blank and nothing happens. I thought it was maybe just that disc, but I exchanged it and the same thing happened. I called Ubisoft and they said many people with the Slim PS2 have called to say it doesn't work, but they don't have any answers. Sony said that it is an error in the format of the discs, and it may not work in many PS2's. Do not buy if you don't want the risk of it not working!!!!</review_text>
As one that couldn't stand NBA Ballers, I thought I would give this game a try.Pros:create a ballerNice graphicsCons:Defense? If you are a fan of Pheonix Sun basketball, you will love this gameThe announcer needs to learn ENGLISHThe whole "I-Ball Trick Stick" is horrible and will have you sreaming as you're stuck on the second side game that is required before you can advance on And 1 tourThat stupid mic trick that allows you to score 4 points with one shotStupid Watch This Trick that you can't stop despite the fact that you can still move your player. You can't even block!You can not choose who you want to face in other game modes unless you are playing two player.Guess which game I'll be trading for NBA Live 2007 or WWE Smackdown vs Raw 2007 this fall?</review_text>
Ok let me break itdown for you. The Game isn't all thatb great, infact it sucks on ice, but the only reason i am giving this game fear grade is because of the year. Really you really can't blame them that made this game. The Fact Is 2006 is one of the worst years. there just throwing all the game at your face and they arent really that great. we see about 90% of games and movies arent doing that good. so my suchest is wait to 2007 when the PS3 and the wii comes out. I Promise you that year want disoponte. So dont buy every thing in 06, wait till 07. Dont waiste your mone</review_text>
why is it that 3rd party memory cards can store at least double the information that these can? These memory cards are way over priced.I love PS2. It's one of the best systems I have ever played and owned, but this memory card stuff is a scam. I already own 2 cards and I need more.</review_text>
This is without a doubt the worste game I have ever purchased. It is basiclly one big empty landscape with about 16 or so bosses that you have to climb on to beat.They could have made this a decent game so easily just by puting in some minions and some characters to talk to and buy stuff from. As it is right now it's just a really, really, really, crappy version of Zelda: Orcarina of Time.If you have any respect for decent video games you will not buy this video game unless it is for the sole purpose of setting it on fire and stomping on it</review_text>
I gave it one star because there was no way to give it less.This game when played on the X Box was great.  So when it came out for PC I bought it.  BIG MISTAKE!  The control are too hard to learn.  And when you are in a battle you can't stop to think which keys when used together work. There are too many keys that you need to push together to do even the simplest thing.I wasted my money on this game.  I deleted it and will never play it.  Don't waste your money</review_text>
I ordered this from amazon, it shipped from 3btech.... and ive had no luck with it... the communicator its self is quite comfortable... but i cannot comment on the quality of the mic or the audio that comes through it because it will not charge... i called logitech tech support and the tech asked me the usual questions (is it plugged in, have you tried a different wall outlet, have you tried jiggling the plug at the communicator end, and so on) after all the questions the tech said that it was defective and that they were running dangerously low on stock of that particular one.So i guess what im trying to say is order at ur own risk and i hope you have better luck with it than i did</review_text>
ok first of all let me say that yes this mic has a nice look and feel to it..also being wireless it adds to its attractivness but over all this mic after a long time of wearing it can really hurt your ear....it becomes very uncomfortable to wear and has even given me headaches, being as how me and a friend needed a headset we both bought one...i no longer use this headset while my freind has no choice till he gets his 360 also, and to this day he constantly has to say "hold up im switching my mic to my other ear cause this ear is starting to hurt" with the 360 controller and headset being wireless and it becoming more availible just wait cause in the end this headset isnt worth the price and it wont be compatible for your 360</review_text>
Have you played any of the games in the Doom series?  How about Metroid Prime? Medal of Honor? Golden Eye?  Well, then you've played Halo 2, also, because ALL First Person Shooter games are exactly the same.  I don't care how many times X-Box magazine (odd how the magazine that drools the most over an X-BOX game is the system's magazine.) calls it the greatest game of all time, I'd rather play Mario Power Tennis which was atrocious.The story is absolutely appauling in terms of a Science Fiction orientated theme, utterly mundane, unoriginal, boring and just all around unentertaining.  The gameplay is so generic that it's as if this was the first creation of some fresh out of college video game designer, the music is cliche, the voice acting is flat, and Master Chief is just an all around retard.The weapons, oh boy, the weapons, again another lame aspect of the game.  The alien's weapons are like something in the kid's "toy gun" section from Toys R Us, and the human guns are nothing that I haven't used in a Resident Evil game.When the first Halo came out I didn't get the big deal, I didn't even play it, then eventually I got myself an X-Box, and decided to give this installment a shot - huge mistake.  Come to think of it none of the games of X-box are even worth owning a system for: Fable was decent, but got old after beating it a few times, The Knights of the Old Republic series was boring, and everything else on X-Box I could play on PS2 or Gamecube</review_text>
Halo 1 on steroids, Halo 2 is a clear Microsoft stamp on Bungie's creativity and control and it muddies up what was a balanced gameplay.  A hackneyed single player story that makes no sense, and has no flow, along with levels that aren't replayable.  You thought the Library from Halo1 was tedious?  Try the headache inducing map design in this game.  Also in the nonsense, the unneccesary switch to an Elite's perspective for half the game, along with a new group of Covenant bad guys that look like rejects from a Captain Planet cartoon.  Apes with mohawks, yeah, nice design.  I can only play one or two levels of the single player, and they are so noobish, it loses appeal quickly.On to Multiplayer.  Okay, in 2004 upon release, this was a great game.  It took time to go up in level, and the ranking system wasn't as abused as it is now.  Once new maps, kept on the harddrive (read mod kids) were released by Bungie, that opened the door to full blown chaos.  Now 2 years later, modding has died down somewhat, but a whole new slew of bridging and connection speed manipulation makes it roughly 25% likely you'll find a game with no lag.  So I still play on occasion, it's lame they can't offer dedicated servers so you can play your map of choice, choose servers with good connections, and then the modders and big gun noobs can find the type of game they want to play too.  I only pray Halo 3's multiplayer improves on this system, otherwise I'm done with the Xbox console permanently</review_text>
Before I was even done with Final Fantasy VII, I ordered this game. I loved that game, and thought 'Say, if Final Fantasy VII is this good, then VIII must be even better!', boy was I wrong! I'm not bashing Final Fantasy VIII, I kind of liked the game, but there are big problems with it. First of all, the draw system is kind of hard, but I liked it, it was a change of pace, but the way you have to equip summon GFs (Guardian Force) was hard and boring. The music in the game reminds me of the music in the movie 'AKIRA', which is a bad thing, The characters in battle remind me of crash dummies, and the way that you get new weapons is by making them at junk shops! Not only that, but the characters are not very likeable.Main characters:Squall- A member of SeeD, he is a jerk to everybody.Zell-A member of SeeD, he is a surfer dude and a dunce.Quistis-A teacher and a member of SeeD, she seems to like Squall...for one reason or another...Seifer- Squall's rival, he is even worse then Squall.Rinoa- A member of 'The owls',Square soft ran out of ideas, she is just like Aeris.Selphie- A member of SeeD, she is a weird character and I was sad to see her in Kingdom hearts.Laguna- A Galbadian soldier. He is the best charecter in the game.Irvine-A member of SeeD, he is a lady's man and is recycled later in Final Fantasy IX as a better charecter known as Zidane.This game is the second worst Final Fantasy game ever made. The story is great, but playing it is so bad that its almost unbelivable. If Square soft remade this game for the PS2 or PSP, I would buy it, but only if they removed the draw system</review_text>
This is by far the worst instance of overzealous copy protection I've ever experienced.  I bought this game new at a local store because I've been itching to play SimCity 4 but that game will not work with my new video card.  Got this game home and it installed just fine, but when it came time to launch the game, it said disc authentication failed.  Tried it with the other disc, failed again.  Went to the company's support forums and found a lot of other people with the same problem and no one had done anything to help them.  Thankfully the people at the store were very reasonable and gave me a full refund</review_text>
Don't buy it unless you want the Starforce malware on your computer.  I understand publishers wanting to prevent piracy, but not at the expense of replacing the drivers I need(ed) for my DVD burner.  Check the search engines and see for yourself.  Would have otherwise been a great game, too bad it isn't playable because of this malware</review_text>
Starforce....nothing else need be said. Starforce singlehandly has destroyed a number of "could be" great games...I don't know since not a single one will play on a Dell XPS "Gaming" Laptop</review_text>
I bought this game because it sounded like a lot of fun.  I tried installing it on my Dell laptop and no dice.  It would not run.  I tried installing it on my Dell desktop computer and again, it would not run.  When I went to the knowledge base, technical support lists that if you have an integrated video card, the game will not work on your system.  In short, if you have an "over the counter" system, you cannot run this game on your computer.  I find this ridiculous and disappointing.  I would not suggest buying this game until you go to their technical support page and go over all of the requirements for game play.  Especially since these little facts are not listed on the box</review_text>
This game sucks.  It tries to be Sim City with extra features.  Unfortunately, the graphics are way below average.  In fact, some of the screens look like they were designed by a first year art student.  The Interface is clumsy and not intuitive.  I am a big fan of the Sim City series and this game really falls short</review_text>
This game has StarForce copy protection, which is software that you do not want on your computer. Reportedly, it replaces your CD and/or DVD drivers, and often causes extreme hardware and software problems. I've been a victim of the software problems, it basically crippled my very expensive SCSI scanners and it was extremely difficult to figure out what was doing it. It could be the best game that's ever been produced, but anyone who's had the StarForce experience is going to steer clear</review_text>
I purchased this remote control to make watching DVD's on the PS2 easier.  I had problems getting it to work consistantly right out of the box.  I had to press most of the buttons very hard to get them to work.  I hoped it would get better but it only got worse.  I am now back to using the game controler and threw the remote control away.I would NEVER recommend this product.</review_text>
I know that Pelican screen protectors and styluses are tempting because they're always the cheapest ones available.  That should tell you something.First of all, the top screen uses adhesive.  It's smooth plastic in the middle, but the edges will leave sticky goo on the screen.  Because the edge is a different material than the middle, it's insanely difficult to squeeze the air bubbles out of it, and being adhesive, trying again and again isn't much of an option.  Furthermore, the sticky edge is white, not clear, and it looks horrible on my onyx DS Lite.After having so much difficulty with the top screen protector, I checked online for reviews.  I read several reports of people who used the Pelican styluses with the Pelican bottom screen protector and the screen protector being very drastically scratched up within an hour's worth of use.  So, whether the stylus is too harsh for the bottom screen protector or the screen protector was too flimsy for the stylus, the combination just doesn't work.Many people report simply throwing their Pelican Write and Protect sets into the trash, so I'm not the only one that paid Pelican money for something that's going into the trash can.  No matter how inexpensive Pelican's product is, it's still too expensive if you end up throwing it in the trash too.I know I'm going to avoid the Pelican screen protectors and styluses in the future, and I very much wish that there were reviews here on Amazon before I bought mine.  I had to dig through Nintendo DS forums to read other peoples' opinions.Finally, if you already bought one and hate it, you can remove it by using scotch tape on the edges to peel it off and rubbing alcohol to remove the residue</review_text>
This is Supposed to be an x-box cleaner, but the system does not read the disc.  A shoddy product</review_text>
People, I don't know what you see in this game.  It's not really a bad game, it's just an average arcade shooter.  More often than not, I can't even hit the enemy because the action occurs so quickly.  I pop out from behind something and I'm dead meat.  Pick up the second one to see what it was like to play a good Time Crisis game</review_text>
I'd like to give this game a good review, but unless you read the fine print, you may be as dissapointed as I was to discover that it doesn't work on LCD televisions.  It also is incompatible with rear projection and plasma television sets</review_text>
This game has a good concept, nice graphics, and some definitely funny moments, but the gameplay is a total bore.There are two main gameplay styles: "investigation" and "trial". Investigation is the worst; it involves nothing more than checking everything in a room, talking to everyone, and a ton of pointless reading, much like an old point-and-click adventure on PC.The court sections are a little better, but not much. Once again, it's very linear; you don't have to use your brain much, just try all the options. And once again, there is a huge amount of reading. There is way too much dialogue packed into the game, and not near enough actual gameplay. And most of the talking is aimless, too; very little of it actually advances the plot.Overall, this game just tried way too hard to have good plot and characters, and left the player with little more to do than click on objects and scroll through text</review_text>
My nephew really needed a new controller.  So I ordered this along with a game for his birthday.  The game was received fine, but he never received the controller.  I finally got notification of shipping delay several weeks later.  Yet the controller still listed as ships within 24 hours on Amazon.  The delays kept coming and eventually it just turned into a cancelled order by Amazon.So the 1 star is for the service, the delay, and the lack of full explanation.  Who knows, the controller could have been wonderful??</review_text>
The Playstation controller is nice. However the Nintendo 64 user would remember that the N64 controller was just a snazzy, maybe even more so. The XBOX controller is like a brick when compared to both. The PS2 delivered on a vibrating Dual Shock controller as standard with the unit. This controller feels great with the thumb pads / thumb sticks allowing for all sorts of movement. Suddenly in 2005, four years after the PS2 was released, games like Metal Gear Solid III: Snake Eater and God of War improve on this thumb pad function with the new mini-games feature. The controller has been given new life because of this.The big negative is the problem that Sony PS2 controllers are extremely poor quality. This controller, for all its design, will give you a dual shock. First of all you will be shocked at how suddenly they break. Drop it on the floor and you will easily damage the L1, L2 or R1, R2 wing buttons. Even if you don't drop it the wing buttons will usually break in less than a year if you enjoy gaming. The next shock is going through so many of these controllers because of this design flaw. Adding up the cost of each controller I could easily have bought myself another PS2 and then some more. The cord also has an uncanny ability to just wrap around itself and kink. I have never seen one that managed to remain straight. Also when a button breaks it tends to release little pieces into the controller so even if you don't need that button for the game the controller feels like it has sand rolling around inside of it.For all its handheld conditioning the controller is far from robust. I have used a very similar Logitech Cordless Rumblepad 2 for the PC that is the same design as the PS2 controller and that is a proper robust model. Just comparing the two side by side makes the PS2 controller look like it was developed in the USSR in the early 80s or something. The fact that Sony have done absolutely nothing to improve on the quality of their own generic PS2 controller is probably the reason why they have made so much money out of the PS2 unit. It is a way too expensive even if the controller was more robust. I hope Sony get it right with the PS3 next time. Make these controllers more robust please. The PS2 controller was always far from a quality device since its inception and is the only item that let the PS2 down badly</review_text>
1 star for looking at the game cover in the store, 2 stars for the visual and audio and playinggggg.-Walk, pick up specified items, push things, use a few gadgets.-Those save points that are maddening rather than save as you go.-Things to do over for the another character.-Same collection of villans over and over.-The cut scenes are sketched for you and the narration is on and on.-(why do the houses look so similar.)-Stuff in the houses that you can not touch. boring.-Find Things you need but can not use yet and have to go back for it.-Not so puzzle solve as much as fetch this and that.-No free range chicken, doors are often locked.-Had to catch same snakes more than 3 times (weeee)-Atleast if you fail a task you get to try again. -REMEMBER nothing goes well, from the get go.-I found no cheats online for this game as of yet... -Dont play the piano, you hit buttons when they float by on screen.-The kids are cute and each special gadget and moves such as they are.I have Never read these books but there is a Warning at the start of the game that this is depressing and states nothing comes out right for these kids.If you want to try this game rent it.If you want to buy this game for someone......make sure you dont mind making yourself depressed for spending the cash and them for playing it.. Do you play the game or does it play you? :-</review_text>
I got this game during the summer expecting it to be great fun. Well...it caught my interest for a few weeks then I just got bored with it. I'd only recomend it to people who do not get bored easily</review_text>
I bought this game 5 days ago and when i finally got it it was missing a pice of plastic in the middle so that i could not play the game and the case was also damage</review_text>
When I first played this game, I got bored in 10 minutes.All you do is shoot and kill people for nothing, have the police chase you and you shoot them, Bring girls into your car and do it with them. I dont recommend this game at all its overrated</review_text>
When I bought the XBox on 6-11-06 it came at a very good rate of time, my son enjoyed it then as we returned from a vacation he turned it on and we saw smoke I don't feel paying for an item at this price was fair to only have it for two months. I can't say the  person that sold me the XBox has even tried to email me since I've emailed him , hmmmm.</review_text>
This game is horrible. I rented it for 5 days and returned it 3 hours after i rented it. I had wasted 5 bucks. Its patheticic. You cant do anything, graphics are horrble, cutscenes are as long as some commercials, and the characters are gay.Pros:Sunny can bite, yayCons:Horrbiel graphicsonly 3 playable charactersBad humorShort cutscenesu cant do anything1 path gamehardly 3d, (seriously, it doesnt look like it</review_text>
This extension cable did not work with my standard Microsoft S Controller.  Unless you still use the old monster-sized XBox controller, these cables are worthless</review_text>
Tediously long and weary. Nothing interesting, just a lot of borrowed ideas from RTCW, HL2, etc. I am sick of this</review_text>
Beautiful graphics and nice storyline, but the amount of times the game freezes or you receive an error is just awful! Not to mention, the monsters level up with you so you'll never be at an advantage. You could pretty much beat the game at level 5</review_text>
I bought the game couple of weeks ago. I was hesitating on buying it initially, but finally I did because of all the good hype about the game. I wish I didn't buy it.To be fair, I have to admit that the game has astonishing landscape, cities and the level of details in the game. I don't think I have ever seen suhc creativity and perfectness in earlier games. I am sure that are lot of people that will find such features enaough for them to adore the game.For me, landscape is not enough since the largest downside is the story, if there is any story, "from my perspective". I have abandoned playing after closing the 4th or 5th Oblivion gate. I don't see any excitment in playing the game any further. I explored most of the cities though, quite quickly. The conversation looks silly that every time the camre will zoom in to the person you are chating with. It was nice the first couple of times but then ....I am waiting for my sweet gothic3 to go out. Honestly I would prefer playing Gothic1 on playing oblivion. Just to tell you about the action/excitment I am talking about, I would like to say that when I got gothic2 I played for almost 36 hours straight no food no sleep just drink water and play play and lots of play.</review_text>
I can't believe how many people are saying how "realistic" this game is.  That can not be further from the truth.  All the CPU does is lob the ball down field on 3rd and long plays and the receiver catches it 80% of the time regardless of coverage.  What fun is that?  This in itself is highly unrealistic.  Don't even get me started on the other things this game does. NCAA 2006 is nothing but an arcade game, realism is thrown out the window in this one.  EA does not know the meaning of AI.  The only difference between the levels is the amount of cheating the CPU does.Don't waste your money, and don't make EA any more richer, its obvious they just throw these games together.  They just take our money and laugh all the way to the bank.</review_text>
I really tried to like this game, being that EA chickened out and bought their way out of competition.The graphics and sound are great in this game, but its ruined by EA's cheating AI. I have never seen a game cheat this much in my life. No matter what play you call the defense always knows what you are calling, even if you think you have them beat on a play, your receiver will purposely drop a wide open pass or better yet the defender turns on his nitrous oxide that was installed in his uniform and cover half the field in 2 seconds to deflect a pass. If you throw a high pass, not to worry the lineman has installed jet packs which allows them to jump 10 feet in the air and deflect or pick off your pass. If the CPU wants you to lose you will lose no matter what you do.If you QB is going back for a pass and a lineman is 3 feet away from you, even if you press the passing button, your QB will just stand there so he can take a sack. This game is total BS, there is no way to get off passes in heavy pressure becuase the game forces you into a tackle animation.When you are playing defense, you are better off putting down your controller and clipping your nails or flossing your teeth while the CPU pulls of BS miracle plays on every single down. Remember how I said your receivers will purposely drop wide open passes? Not the CPU receivers, the CPU receivers, regardless of their rating can catch passes in double and triple coverage every time. if they don't catch it, the ball just gets tipped over and over again until he can catch it. Think you stopped a 3rd down conversion? Think again, you will get flagged for pass interference or a face mask penatly. And remember about your QB being forced into a tackle animation? Not the CPU, the CPU can get of 60 yard spirals while he's being hit!What about the inconsistency you ask? Well let me explain. How is it that one game you can be totally on, but the next game, you can't even complete ONE pass! I'll tell you why. The CPU wants you to lose, so you will drop every pass, fumble every run and get called for every penalty in the book. I was playing a game, and managed to run back a punt and KR for a TD, before my offense even touched the field. Then all of a sudden the CPU turned on its God Mode and every thing went right for the CPU. BS lobs, BS runs and BS calls. I did not complete ONE SINGLE pass in the entire first half. Its not because the CPU was playing good defense, its because my receivers dropped every ball that was thrown to them, wide open or not. I ended up only completing one pass in the entire game, 1 for 20 I think. At this point, I knew I had no chance of winning, so I just started punting the ball on first down to avoid any more frustration. My so called impact RB only got 2 yards on 20 rushes, and my so called impact CB gave up 3 TD passes to a below average receiver. What is the point of playing if you are not even given a chance to win?Yes you can win games as I have, but it is so inconsistent. If the CPU wants you to lose you will lose, nothing you can do about it.I see why EA bought the license, after putting out crap like this, they were sure to lose a lot of customers to a game that knows how to develop better AI, instead of this cheating crap. I am taking this game to the store for store credit and I am done with EA for good. EA sucks and so does this game</review_text>
If you need a remote to turn on the tele and run the 360, this will do.  But it won't operate a DVR, DVD, VCR or cable box.  If you're really keen on it, I'll sell you mine.</review_text>
No way to change the inputs on your TV.The DVD functions and the TV functions are accessed alternatly by pressing a "tv" button but there is no way to tell which the romote is aligned to. Therefore when you press the power button you have no idea which you will be powering on/off, the TV or the XBox. And if things couldn't get any dumber, if you press the eject button while the remote is in TV mode it doesn't work. The eject button is only designed to work with the XBox yet it is disabled when in TV mode?There is also no option to program a receiver.As many others mentioned, this remote looks nice but the people who designed it must have been drunk. Do not buy this remote unless you like wasting your money on garbage</review_text>
Try before you buy! This game has a major glitch: its save game files are erased sometimes, so you can start all over again.Beware</review_text>
First, let me say that I whole-hearedly agree with the review by Tiberius. Back in the glory days of Counter-Strike (2001-2002), this game was the be-all end-all for 1) Online video games, 2) First-Person Shooters, 3) PC Games, and 4) Any video game basically. It had real-life weapons, the graphics were superb at the time, the maps were extremely well-made, the system requirements are still obscenely low, and damnit it was fun. Then, inevitabely, the hands of time began to take their ruthless, indiscriminate toll. Video cards supported better graphics, new (and yes, better!) games came out (Battlefield 1942, Unreal Tournament 2004), hacking became the unmistakable poison of Counter-Strike, and a lot of the cool, casual gamers grew up or moved on. From 2000 to 2004, Counter-Strike went from an utter joy to a sensation to a fading diamond to a nuisance. By 2004 to present day, it has become a problem. Great games and great game developers are losing tons of money because people are still playing this game after five years on their mom's worn-out 640 Megahertz Pentium III PCs running Windows 98. Counter-Strike is still one of the most popular games of all-time, with a ridiculous number of people playing it on average a day, because people just don't seem to have enough self-control to give up their hopeless addiction.Today, server admins are, for the most part, humorless dictators, and will not stand for anything that deviates from this game's undeniable, monotonous drone. People are still playing the same maps from the 1.0 release, that have completely lost all their zest and initial potential. It always feels as if I've played the same round a thousand times before, and I probably have. Even the custom maps are sickening in their monotony. fy_iceworld is fun for 3 consecutive seconds. Many other popular custom maps in heavy server rotation are the same way, and all look disguisting. I've played on probably over 500 servers, and downloaded probably over the same amount of *quality* custom maps, and not more than 3 have I ever seen a server run in its rotation, or voted on by the players. Furthermore, people are still playing the game using dial-up, and CS veterans are always complaining about camping, even if its a tactic used to complete the objective. As far as the objectives are concerned, Counter-Strike has basically become a deathmatch game. No one will listen to anyone's plan (on the rare occasion there is one), no one tries to rescue the hostages, and everyone always calls someone a "p***y" or "nub" if you use the auto shotgun or AWP. And to top it all off, Valve cancelled the outstanding won.net and replaced it with this Steam garbage, a utility soaking wet with incompetence.L337 Speak has also gained mass popularity to the jaded Counter-Strike culture, and has become its own incessant frustration. But I won't even get into that. If you're new to CS, don't bother, veterans of this game are far from friendly, and you'll probably get called a bunch of names involving lots of zeroes and threes if you're a beginner. For now, if you want to indulge yourself in a great online game, check out World of Warcraft, Battlefield 1942, Sven Co-Op, or even Team Fortress Classic (a dated game with an *awesome* community that has yet to lose its initial charm)</review_text>
I'll make this short and sweet for you.  I went to a cyber cafe so I can play this "gem" and see what all the fuss is about on this game.  OVERRATED.  I have no idea how people prais this as "THE BEST GAME IN THE WORLD!!"...How silly, This game is just plain average..  If you wanna play a nice Game from Valve..I don't need to tell you but I'll give you a hint....H***f L*fe...This game is just pure garbage and the Online is boring...And I don't need your flaming or bashing just cause One mans opinion differs from yours..The goodVisuals are good I guessBadVery MediocerPlain boring combat...Nothing newOnline isn't that greatExtreamly Overrated...TRUST ME..Gets boring after awhileAnd yes I played this out for more then an 1hour...2 bucks I'll never get back2.1 out of 5 stars....  Extreamly Overrated, Not worth my 2 bucks, and that's all I got to say....Peac</review_text>
If you are looking for an XBOX vertsion of another chapter in MechWarrior series, this ISN'T it. This is an extemely dumbed-down version of MW. Even if you (Mechwarrior fans) forget about having no customization, remember this: You can only fire one weapon at at time. You have to cycle between lazers, cannons and rockets. I was bored after about 5 minutes.Again, people who never played MW series may like this game better</review_text>
As the opening cutscene introduces you to Blinx the cat, the supporting cast and the particulars of his upcoming adventures, I found myself trying to wrap my brain around the basic premise of the story. The idea is that a secret, off-world clan of humanoid cat creatures, armed with souped up vacuum cleaners, are responsible for the development and dispersal of time itself to every known plane of existence on the map. It seems that time, when compressed tightly enough to be transported by said cats, takes the form of one of five different brightly-colored shapes. If these crystals are left out on the open for too long without being properly introduced to the flow of things, they turn into monsters. I could go on, because the game certainly doesn't stop there, but I think you get the point.I like to think that there's a fairly thick line drawn between cartoony fantasy and super-detailed realism. Generally, a lot of the physics and environmental details are taken for granted in a realistic game, because they're almost exclusively set in a photorealistic, lifelike location. Cartoons, on the other hand, generally don't worry themselves with the particulars and are primarily concerned with delivering a good time. How much fun would the Wile E. Coyote cartoons be if every time the lead character suffered a grisly fate, it strictly obeyed the laws of gravity and aerodynamics? Blinx tries to straddle that thick line by delivering a story that's overly detail-centric in an environment that's right out of a kid's show. The result is a tale that comes off as way, WAY out of left field and almost completely abstract. It focuses on things that would be better left to the viewer's imagination and ignores the importance of a good underlying story along the way.Beneath the needless discussions of why there are monsters in the world, how time compression works and how cats are actually responsible for all that we hold dear, the actual plot is almost laughably straightforward and generic. There's a princess, evil pigs have kidnapped her, and it's up to you and you only to rescue her and save her world. That's it, no side-stories, no reasoning, no subplots - just a straightforward rush from Point A to Point B. And here I thought the phrase "save the princess" was universally recognized as an ages-old cliche.Now, I don't want it to sound like I'm railing on this game just because it's got a few more nitpicky details than its peers and it reuses an old phrase from way back in the platformer handbook as its sole driving factor. It's also completely lacking in character development, general storytelling and ongoing inspiration. None of the characters in Blinx really establish themselves as individuals, including the lead character himself. You don't hate the pig on the spaceship because he's trying to destroy the world, you hate him because every time he shows up he tries to steal your money. I honestly forgot there was a princess at the end of the game after level three, because she's never mentioned between the game's start and its finish. I mean, the very first Super Mario Brothers at least reminded you that the princess was in another castle at the end of every boss fight.I don't honestly think the game was really designed to be enjoyable so much as it was geared to be overly challenging. The first level and a half are set up in the standard "get to know you" format, with the simplest of enemies, the most routine of stage layouts and plenty of opportunities to mess around with your tools. Shortly thereafter, you're thrown to the wolves. For the most part, the level designs are very short, with more of an emphasis on cheap hits than on complexity and true challenge. I noticed a lot of overlap in the stage layouts, whether it's retracing your steps time and time again or walking along a catwalk (har har) above the beginning of the stage and invariably plummeting back to the start point. You'll almost always know what needs to be done, but actually accomplishing that act is the real trick. I just can't overemphasize how unbearably cheap most of this game really is. If there's a bottomless pit nearby, (and chances are very good that there is) Blinx will find a way to force himself into it, regardless of what you're hitting on the control pad. If there's an enemy two feet in front of you and you hit the attack button, he'll aim at a random switch on the other side of the room, rather than the imminent threat.That's not to say that the entirety of The Time Sweeper is totally without merit, because it does bring a few fresh ideas to the table, but for the most part those insights are hampered by their surroundings. The ability to control time, for instance, was at the time a really fresh, interesting new play mechanic and still stands out today, despite the limited field of imitators that have since emerged. You can rewind a few seconds to catch an enemy unaware or rebuild a crumbling bridge, pause the action and take advantage of the frozen time, knock the level into slow motion, etc. All the while, Blinx is moving around in real time. It's a great idea, but the implementation is painfully short and underutilized. Why can't I use two controls at the same time? Why don't more aspects of the stage encourage the player to experiment with and solve problems with these powers? Why doesn't the ridiculous ten minute stage time limit pause, speed up or rewind when I use my time powers? Why is their duration so brief, and why can't I hold more than a dozen uses at a time? I mean, this could've really been a fantastic experience if the time control aspect had been beefed up a little further and treated as more than just an auxiliary function of an otherwise run-of-the-mill platformer.The controls, too, are an undeveloped, undertested nightmare. Blinx himself is often sluggish to respond, especially when implementing his time controls. He has difficulty making a precise turn, whether on midair or on solid ground. He stops to briefly celebrate when gaining an item, which leaves him open to constant enemy attacks. He routinely moves in the direction of certain death, as though pulled by a magnetic field, whether you've instructed him to do so or not. He'll occasionally refuse to perform a double jump, particularly when attempting a difficult, precise leap across a gaping chasm.I think it's these controls that most make Blinx so mind-squashingly aggravating. At a glance, you'd imagine they'd be fairly difficult to screw up. You've got a jump button, a suction / fire button, a time control button and an analog stick to control movement. Plus, there had already been a long, established line of three-dimensional platformers on the market in the years before the title's release, paving the way to an ideal control experience. Super Mario 64 had its issues, sure, but nothing like this, and it was the trailblazer for the entire genre's jump to the world of 3D. It's like they had a map leading them right to the treasure and decided to forge their own path anyway.I can't even say I'm impressed by the graphics showcased throughout The Time Sweeper, either. With the exception of the lead character himsef, these are some incredibly cheesy, preschoolish character designs - they feel unfinished and hurried, less purposeful than you'd imagine (especially in contrast with Blinx himself). Particularly insulting is the large population of simple blobs that roam around the levels, trying in vain to bump into you and cause a fatal injury. Here's a finely detailed main character, with such close attention paid to his wardrobe that even the gloss of his shoes was obviously debated time and time again, and he's pitted against a set of monsters that could've sprung to life directly out of the pages of a four-year-old's sketchbook.Despite featuring a spoken dialog track, there's no English voice acting. I couldn't pinpoint the language, but my wife seems to think it's either French or some close variation of it. It certainly didn't sound Japanese. While this does add a touch of personality to the title, and it's not every day that you get a chance to hear a cat shouting something in the language of love, it all seemed really odd and out of place coming out of my television. Everyone's vocal personalities are so black-and-white, too, that I feel like a great chance to establish some much-needed individuality amongst the cast was lost once again here. The bad guys all have the same deep, gravelly, transparently evil tone, while the good guys are all bright, cheery, squeaky and high-pitched like the monkeys in Super Monkey Ball. It's like a parody of the games that had come before, but I won't give the developers enough credit to assume that they were doing it on purpose.Overall, Blinx is really just a few promising concepts thrown together in one package, strapped to the shell of a far-below-average third person platformer and unleashed upon an unsuspecting public. At the time of its release, it was still in need of a lot of polishing, some serious scrutiny behind closed doors and a re-evaluation of just how far some of these concepts and half-hearted character designs could be conceivably stretched without losing any quality. On top of that, I really don't know which audience they were targeting with it. The game is ridiculously difficult, which betrays the childlike demeanor that surrounds it and leads me to believe it was meant for the serious gamers out there, but so bright, kid-friendly and annoyingly cutesy that I can't imagine anyone in that demographic rushing out to the stores on release day. The number of spontaneous controller hurls shot through the roof during my time with Blinx, reaching near-Marvel vs. Capcom 2 levels with its unashamed, excruciatingly cheap hits, especially in later levels. I have no idea how I acquired the willpower to finish level eight.The game is adequately lengthy, and offers some replay value, with hidden cat medals in each stage eventually unlocking production sketches, promotional materials and the like. Once you start hunting for floating cat heads in those super-tough later levels, though, you'll remember why you were so happy to be finished with them in the first place. Unless you feel like pulling your hair out in clumps (I shaved my head after the experience as a part of the cleansing process) and enjoy self-mutilation, I'd recommend you stay far away</review_text>
I hate this game its the worst game I've ever played</review_text>
I was so excited to see this game come out- I loved the Godfather, and From Russia with Love, and the hype surrounding this game was incredible.  The actual game, however, was incredibly disappointing.  The driving controls, especially compared to the driving controls in The Godfather, are AWFUL.  I was having so much trouble driving I kept looking through the handbook to see if I was doing something wrong, but from what I saw I was using the controller the way I was supposed to.  Most of the missions involve driving, under a specific time limit, and with these awful controls, I gave up early- way too frustrating.  The musical play list that you get to control was fun, but I would have liked more free-roaming like in the Godfather.  I was also looking forward to hearing everyone's voices that were in the opening credits- Dale Earnhardt Jr???  But since I have almost totally given up on it now, I guess I won't get to hear their voice acting talent.  Does anyone know if they plan to re-release this on the xbox 360?  Maybe some of the control issues could be worked out before then.  This game had so much potential that right now it is not living up to</review_text>
Every year there has to be a game adapted from a classic movie or based on a classic movie (From Russia With Love, which is actually not a bad game.). Recentlty just landing my hands on a copy of this, I simply couldn't resist picking up SCARFACE: THE WORLD IS YOURS. I loved the movie SCAR FACE, and I was gonna love this.But It turns out I didn't.The controls are really a joke, instead of your normal FPS/3PS/RPG etcetera, there are really bland controls you can't even tell what to do. The dialouge is corny, and everything else is a joke.For die-hard fans only, I guess</review_text>
You get a few outfits and some new furniture but not a lot.  With all of the free stuff out there to download for The Sims, the Stuff Pack is not very worth it.  Maxi is just milking the franchise for every penny</review_text>
I noticed there were not many new items in this game, I found this the advertising for this game to be deceiving.  This expansion ws not worth the money</review_text>
Downloading objects from fan sites can be hit or miss -- I have had many collections I've downloaded work incorrectly or not work at all in the next expansion pack, and items I really liked were suddenly unavailable.  So, I was looking forward to a "Stuff" pack from Maxis.Bah.  Yes, there are several very nice items, but really, this is an underwhelming collection on the whole.  Items are very limited and the collections are small.  The pictures you see on the cover are a good portion of what is contained.  Like so many here remarked, the money spent is not equal to the value received.  Another reviewer pointed out what the title "Glamour Life" implies -- jewelry, house items, luxurious textures for floors and walls, and clothing for all ages, and most of all, excess and abundance.  There's no abundance here.  I've found items I like, but I am not impressed with the collection.Maxis knows that its target audience is always hungry for new items, and I think it is taking advantage of the fact, fooling us into thinking we are getting much more than we actually recieve for our money.  I feel a little cheated.  If you must have this, wait until the price drops, or -- better yet -- find a good, reputable fan site  (there are some very good ones out there that have safe downloads) and download for a small fee or for free</review_text>
This pack offered very little of anything. The decor (very little of it) is uninspired. I was hoping to get some good artwork at least.  I know a lot of people don't like to download from fan sites but don't waste your money on this junk.  Believe me fansites have much better and more creative stuff for your sims and most of it is free, and none of it cost  as much as this glamour life stuff pack did.  This is the first and last stuff pack that I will ever buy</review_text>
OK, so where the heck is Vince Young, Matt Leinart, and Reggie Bush in this version?  You see Reggie Bush on the cover, so you think you're going to get the opportunity to play with the Heisman Trophy winner, pair him up with Lendale White and Matt Leinart, and take on the Longhorns to try and replay the Rose Bowl.  But none of these players are to be found.  In fact, Ohio State is listed as the #1 team.Am I behind the times?  Or is this how EA Sports does their football games?  Do I need to buy NCAA 06 in order to use these players in their prime?  I was hoping to be able to play them with updated "abilities" that would reflect all of their outstanding years in 2005.Any ideas out there?  Is this a code or a "cheat" I need to unlock?HELP!!</review_text>
I was reading that 8000-word review by Dave Jeanclerc, and I strongly disagree with some of his points.  (P.S. My review has nothing to do with the XBox 360 version, which, apparently, is awesome.)I HAVE PLAYING THE EA FOOTBALL GAMES SINCE THE MID-90'S, and I'm sick of paying $50 for the same game every year.  EA Games owns the rights to the college and NFL teams, so you won't see any football games by any other game companies, most noteably, SEGA, who revolutionized football simulation games in the late 80's.NCAA Football 07 is basically the same as NCAA Football 2002, and 2003, and 2004, and 05 and 06.  Each year, EA adds a little tweak to the mix, but overall, it's the same look, the same feel, the same moves, the same everything.  This year, they've changed the way you kick the ball, and added more defensive audibles--that's it.  There are a few other minor adjustments, but none are worth noting IMO.  In fact, the audibles they added are the EXACT SAME audibles you used to have on Sega's ESPN Football 2005--you can call audibles for individual defensive players.  Thieves.  Everything else is THE EXACT SAME AS 05 and 06.  The most disappointing thing, graphically speaking, is the crowd...it still looks like flat rows of objects moving in unison, just like it did on games made 10 years ago.OH--one other big change...the "improved" momentum meter.  If you thought it was ridiculous last year, wait til you play NCAA 07.  The "momentum meter" has such a strong influence on the game, that if you make ONE OFFENSIVE MISTAKE in the beginning of the game, you're doomed...that's it.  You can't win.  For example--I played FSU vs. UM twice.  The first time, I made no 1st half errors, and pounded the Hurricanes 31-10.  I played with the same exact settings in the same stadium again, and purposely fumbled the opening kickoff, giving the Hurricanes the ball at my 35 yd. line, and I lost the game 45-24.  That fumble was my ONLY MISTAKE of the game.NESSLER, HERBSTRIET AND CORSO ARE STILL MAKING THE SAME EXACT IN-GAME COMMENTS THEY WERE SAYING IN 05 AND 06...GIMME A BREAK!!!!  Also, the AI is still atrocious.  Defensively, the computer controlled team is hapless.  They blitz on every down.  In fact, I've lined up numerous times for a 3rd and long with 4 or 5 receivers, and the defense continually loads 8 men in the box...they don't even put enough DB's out there to stop me.  It's basically a game of long bombs.  If you choose a team with good receivers, you can easily throw for 400+ yards a game by continually going deep.  THE SAFETIES ALWAYS BLITZ!!!  The safeties only drop back into coverage if you have 3rd and 20+, or 4th and 15+.  So how does the computer couteract your deep balls?  Easy--when the momentum meter swings against your favor, your receivers drop EVERY BALL YOU THROW AT THEM, (even if you hit them in the chest with the ball) and when you finally decide to run the ball, your RUNNING BACK FUMBLES THE BALL IMMEDIATELY.  I played a game between USC and Cal, and I kept switching to play with the team that DIDN'T have the momentum, and I ended up turning the ball over on every possession.You may be reading this and saying, "Hey--this guy has played this game a lot to figure all of this out."  No, not really--it's exactly how I've played the 05 and 06 game, and the same "glitches" I've encountered in them, too.  EA has really dropped the ball again.  You are paying $50 to get updated rosters, and, in typical EA fashion, you don't even have names for any of the players--just different skill levels.EA games suck.  Their soccer games are horrible, their basketball games are too slow and awkward, and they don't update their football games.  I GUARANTEE YOU THAT MADDEN 07 WILL BE THE SAME AS MADDEN 06...JUST WATCH.And by the way--EA has gone all-out on the XBox 360 editions of NCAA 07 ans Madden 07...I'm sure those versions will be stunning.  The rest of us are paying the same price for last year's game</review_text>
Typical Xbox game using checkpoints instead of creativity to make it challenging. Nothing more mind numbing than doing the same thing over and over again because you keep getting killed right before the next checkpoint. Granted, you can get hours and hours of playing time from it, but only about 25% is something that you haven't already done 10 times before. I highly recommend this game to people who are of the intellect that enjoy working on production lines where they do same thing repeatedly. If your brain actually requires some kind of stimulation, find a more creative game. In addition, some actions tend to be a bit uncooperative at times, such as when attempting to knock someone out but instead you just stand there waiting to get shot. Apparently if you aren't facing in just the perfect position when attempting smash his brains out, you stand there like a manakin hoping the guy two inches in front of you doesn't notice. Another option is to try and shoot him, but unless you get a head shot, expect to fire of gobs of rounds to take him out since you seem to be armed with what can only be a .22 short pistol</review_text>
nothing more really needs to be said.I'm running a 3GHz P4;256Mb ATI Radeon 9000 series PCI express video card and 2Gb of RAM and the game still hangs,lags and locks up on my computer. I tried uninstalling & reinstalling-same effect.DO NOT BUY THIS GAM</review_text>
The overall impression is that of a game made on the rush.Assuming the "good" alignment, you win simply by building expensive  buildings at the edge of your influence zone and burning the enemy's platoons sent by a very unintelligent AI. Since winning requires no strategy, the game is challenging; you can do basically the same on all levels.The races against which one fights are pretty much the same except for their "skins" and the building's aspect. Defeating them all takes you at most 8 hours of gameplay.Unlike the previous version of B&W, there are no custom campaigns nor multiplayer features. Cinematics and creature apart, it looks like a very primitive first version of "Age of Empires".</review_text>
The game itself is very interesting - the storyline is engaging and the controls are unique.  It's an RPG, which is quite a switch for Mario.  The major problem with this game is interactivity - not enough of it.  Specifically, there are far too many cutscenes that are not skippable.  Many of these cutscenes lead directly into a boss battle.  The most frustrating instance of this is just before the final boss battle - it takes about 10 minutes to get to the "real" fight from the prior save point.  This isn't a problem for the first time through the sequence, but if you lose 4 or 5 times, this just becomes a hassle and makes the game not really worth playing to see the end.  This is a major problem that most game designers have found work-arounds for, but Nintendo revealed its lack of RPG experience in this element.  It's an interesting game, but just make sure to win, or have a friend/sibling/(enemy?) skip through the dialog sequences for you if you get tired of them</review_text>
All I have to say is this game is not for 'EVERYONE'!! you have to be able to READ to play! Last time I checked not everyone can read. I bought this for my 13 year old son...who has autisum. He can master just about every game I get him but he can't read. So, for him this game was not much fun. I ended up playing more than he did and I didn't even enjoy it</review_text>
with games such as Grand theft auto: San Andreas, driv3r,true crime, etc. the competition is fierce and a game like this won't cut it. first when max talks it sounds like he is mumbling second the graphics suck third the game just sucks in general i am so glad i got this used for $6 i bet it was returned because it was too dumb for the previous owner. i saw it at EB games for only $5 that must mean it sucks and i read rockstar game the rights to remedy because the sales for the sequel max payne 2 were so low i have no clue how this was made a "greatest hit" play GTA or true crime instea</review_text>
I had high hopes on this game but I was disapointed. The controls are horrible and definately the voice acting throughout 90% was bad. The story line was basically typical, it really didn't hold my interest for long. I did beat the game because I spent $50 on it the day it came out and I figured I would at least do that. I gave the game to a friend of mine after I beat it and he had the same opinion as I did. It's worth renting but definately not worth buying. Hopefully those who decide to buy or rent this game can devote a good bit of time trying to learn the controls</review_text>
this game is just a waste of time everything about this crap game gave me a huge headache think god for advil they said that it took then a long time to make this game and for what its not worth nothing cameras are very bad it makes you dizzy when you play it there also a part in this game were you have to follow a maze in pich dark all you see is the lines from the maze you fall off almost every time plus that baby crying too just does it help you. like I said just a waste of time. plus max payne looks fuuny in this game take a good look at his face it looks like he from resident evil the walking dead. and they said it took then a long time to make this game. this game should have never been release</review_text>
this game is really bad I mean everything about it. they took so long to make this and for what.its just a waste off time and your money I gave it 1star because the guns are the best thing about this crap gam</review_text>
Being a Starsky and Hutch fan since I was a kid, I was looking forward to playing this. The graphics are &quot;cartoon&quot; horrible and the need for &quot;VR&quot; points becomes annoying after awhile. The bad guys are like something from a Chinese Kung Fu movie, you can shoot at them accurately and it takes all day to kill them...and that's with playing with a PS2 gun (I can't imagine shooting with a controller) which makes you lose the mission because you are down on &quot;VR&quot; points. The dialog gets annoying too and you can't skip hearing it either</review_text>
This game has a great design and excellent/fun story BUT it was obviously not fully tested before it was released for the PC. Whenever there are more than about 5 enemies on the screen the game has horrible clipping/graphic slowdown issues. This means the bad guys keep shooting but your guy doesn't respond quickly to the commands. The clipping is so bad that sometimes I just wanted to find the CEO of Activision and shove this game down his throat. This CAN be a fun game, just don't play the PC version. Borrow someone's Xbox and play that version. This is another example of a greedy developer rushing a PC port to market without bothering to make sure it worked right</review_text>
I thougt there would be a better story line, and what I found was very disappointing.The boss (McGruder) was easier to beat than the boss in the Matrix-Path to neo. I mean, I paid good money for this game on the premise that it was a quality game; obviously I was wrong</review_text>
Don't buy this here - it is selling for $49.99 at Best Buy (bestbuy.com). Wait until they lower the price on Amazon</review_text>
I rented this game for my 3 year old.  Who loves the movie.  He tried to play it.  He like it.  I tried to play it & got to the dancing part.  I couldn't get past it.  I tried for 5 days.  My rental time was up.  I returned it.  I haven't rented it since.  This game is way too hard to beat.  And my 3 year old got bored with it real fast.  I would NOT recommend this game to anyone.  Don't waste your money buying it.  Unless you are an expert with video games.  I'm just thankful that I rented it instead of buying it</review_text>
I rented this game and returned it the next day because between my and my friend we could not get past the dancing scene we tried for like an hour and couldn't get past it don't waste your time or patience with this annoying game</review_text>
Pointless quests with no real conclusions. CTD every 30-45 minutes. Lengthy dialoge with no real human attachment. All in all a VERY unpolished product, even with the patch. If your favorite aspect of the first game was the story then do not buy this game</review_text>
Such great visuals and I love most of the Star Wars RPG/Shooters, BUT, I cant believe this is a point and click game.  I was hoping KOTOR2 would have implimented a normal battle engagement.  Theres nothing worse than toggling thru menus etc during an intense battle and actually having to turn around, click the target, then engage someone else after the kill.  The days of Boulder's Gate point-n-click should be over, but I guess theres a crowd for this type of gameplay.  Still a good game, but dissapointed</review_text>
lucas should be ashamed to stamp his name on this turkey. do not play on the xbox 360. you will experience random sound shreiks, resolution issues, too-lonng load times. and overall this is a really buggy and perplexing product. why? the first was very good</review_text>
I BOUGHT THIS GAME WHEN IT WAS $50 BECAUSE I THOUGHT IT WOULD BE A GREAT GAME. I WAS WRONG. YOU DONT GET A LIGHTSABRE UNTIL FAR INTO THE GAME AND ALL THE ADVERTISMENTS SHOWS YOU WITH A LIGHTSABRE. THE GAME IS EXTREMELY BUGGY AND HAS POOR GRAPHICS. I AM A HUGE STARWARS FAN AND WOULD NOT RECCOMEND THIS GAME TO ANYONE NO MATTER HOW BIG OF A STARWARS FAN THEY ARE.DONT BUY THIS GAME</review_text>
First off i just want to say that i've read "The Secret of the Old Clock" and it made this game even more boring because i knew the basic outline.I see in an above review an adult of the age 35 loved it, which i can understand. But I'm 15 and i found this game OVERLY boring. The puzzles were way too easy, and driving around in the horribly done car part of the game made me want to quit playing. It says youll get a pay if you do some chores for people...i didnt get anything. Although I love herinteractive and and i love all the other nancy drew games i would highly reccomend you dont waste $19.00 on it. I would only reccomend getting it if it was in a value pack of Nancy Drew games</review_text>
i was excited to play this game because i wanted to play a detective-like game.  unfortunately, this game is very kid-like.  here's an example.  the first non auto-generated task is to solve some puzzles for a guy.  these are the simple kind of puzzles you could find in a children's word game book.  i easily got all of them except 1, meaning i couldn't progress past this point.  no problem for me, because by this time i didn't want to!  i'm not saying it's a bad game, it's just probably not a good game for grownups.</review_text>
Sure, the graphics and sound ARE nice, but this game is very linear and very forgiving- too forgiving. You can save and reload just about constantly, so long as there aren't monsters nearby and things are made kinda dummy-proof so you can't make any significant mistakes. As a result, I never really felt like I was taking much of a chance doing anything. The dialogue is mostly a matter of clicking responses until you can't click anymore and there's not much bad consequence to clicking them in any ol' order. There's really only one path through the different areas of the game and nothing ever respawns. You can also adjust the difficulty levels from very easy to very difficult but the experience and treasure don't adjust accordingly. This means if a fight is too tough after a couple reloads you can make it very easy and still get the same rewards you would have gotten when it was hard. &lt;yawn&gt; Maybe I'm just a little jaded from playing online games like Everquest for so long. In online, realtime games with other humans playing around you there is much more of an unpredictable, and more importantly uncontrolable, and much more exciting environment to play in. I got so bored with this that I actually stopped playing while close to completing the very last area of the game. I just didn't care anymore. This game requires very little thinking or strategizing</review_text>
On paper, the idea of a 24 video game sounds like a great idea, and upon first glance of it, it seems like it's firing on all cylinders.  Featuring all the major players from the series reprising their roles (Kiefer Sutherland, Dennis Haysbert, Elisa Cuthbert, etc.) and a storyline and tone and atmosphere that captures the feel of the show, 24: The Game falls apart once you get further into it.  The missions are repetitive, the animation and graphics are jumpy and glitched, and the controls are unresponsive to say the least.  Targeting enemies is a chore at times as you use the analog sticks, but the targeting along with just plain moving gets incredibly cumbersome thanks to a camera that seems to want to work against you.  Some of this could be forgiveable, but the further you get through 24 the more rushed the game feels.  It's a shame too, considering how innovative the series was in it's early life and everything the game had going for it.  If more polish was put into it, 24: The Game could have been something special, but as it is, it's only recommended as a rental for fans of the series</review_text>
I guess the first thing i'll say is that I got Jedi Academy BEFORE I got this game. I was HUGELY dissaponted. I really liked Jedi Academy but this game is not that great. I have cheat codes so I can have all wepons and all amo and I can be undying. There are partes in this game that are INSAINLY tought. There are way to many puzzles - I don't mind puzzles but there are simply way to many. And some on them are insainly hard. I would recomend you to get Jedi Knight: Jedi Academy - way better the puzzles aren't insain and you get to choose what you look like and....well I could go on but i'll leave it there. If you aredy have Jedi Academy and you want another star wars game that is $20 then you sould get Battlefront thats anoter great game. Just don't get this game.</review_text>
I used my remote all of about 8 times before it stopped working.  Even with the proprietary dongle inserted into a controller slot you cannot control this thing with a controller, you must use the remote control.  When you take the dongle out with a DVD in, a screen will come up telling to reinsert, so if either the dongle or the remote get slightly injured or malfunction, then you've just wasted thirty bucks.  I feel quite ripped off.  With the low cost of DVDs nowadays, it's a MUCH better idea to buy a standalone IMHO, you can get a good progressive scan for about $30 or $40, which comes out to about the same price.As a side, it is also EXTREMELY annoying that you can't turn on, or off the device with the remote, you must go up to box to do it yourself, especially annoying if you just want to watch a DVD in your bed and crash afterwards.All in all the value proposition offered by this product is very low considering the similarly priced alternatives</review_text>
DVD's which play perfectly well on other cheap players, freeze/skip or don't play when I try to play them on the XBOX. Don't waste your money on this, buy a stand-alone DVD player instead so you won't have the frustration that I've had</review_text>
This remote is of awful quality; i've been through two of them in the past year. I wouldn't complain so much if it didn't cost $30! It's worth ten, at most. Most people would be better off buying a cheap DVD player, rather than using the xbox</review_text>
The game seemed to start off like any other Nancy Drew game.  My daughter has played them all.  However, after a while, it seemed as thow it was an easter egg hunt for three year olds.  Everything was easy to find and not mysterious at all.  All the other games took my daughter quite some time before she figured out the mystery.  However, this game took her two days.  All the other Nancy Drew games kept her intrigued and kept her coming back for more.  This game breezed by and and she was quite disappointed.  In fact, her words at the end of the game were, "that's it?".  Her interactive, better come out with a more interesting game next time or you'll lose the interest</review_text>
Seems like they just huried this game. Too much running around to get answers. The phone did not even have web acsess. Actually i did not like it at all</review_text>
My daughter and I have played all of the previous games; we've enjoyed them overall.  Some of the games are fantastic, challenging and fun. This game was quite lame in comparison to the others.  The puzzles weren't really puzzling, just boring tasks.  There were not many clues to find.  Because there weren't many clues, there was no real sense of detecting anything.  The game ended abruptly and was very short.  We did NOT use a walk-through to solve the mystery in record time, just experienced a lack of challenge.  We did like the newness of becoming Frank and Joe Hardy occasionally.  The rest was pretty boring.  If you are looking for a Nancy Drew game, try one of the others instead</review_text>
The review by Bovey is spot-on!  These games have gotten more boring as they go.  The majority of this game is spent looking for the same shells over and over to make the same necklaces over and over....how much is enough?  There was no real sense of scariness or danger... just boredom! And the game was so short... suddenly it ended!  I am so disappointed in what these games have become.  I loved The Final Scene, I even liked Blackmoor Manor even though I could never have finished it without consulting a walkthrough.  This game was just lame. I don't recommend paying full price for it</review_text>
I've been a fan of these games since the first one - Secrets Can Kill - came out.  I've played them all.I'm not at all sure what's happened to the games, though.  While the graphics have steadily improved, the puzzles, plot, and gameplay have really gone downhill.The first game, "Secrets Can Kill" had pretty horrific graphics, but the story was compelling and there were some fabulous puzzles in it.Things really picked up with the second game, "Stay Tuned for Danger".  Better graphics and a very interesting story, very cool puzzles, great plot.I can absolutely recommend Games 2 (Stay Tuned for Danger), 3 (Message in a Haunted Mansion), 4 (Treasure in the Royal Tower), 5 (The Final Scene), 6 (Secret of the Scarlet Hand), 7 (Ghost Dogs of Moon Lake), 9 (Danger on Deception Island), and 10 (Secret of Shadow Ranch).These games are similar in length and have interesting puzzles.  Lots of areas where you can snoop around - which I really enjoy.Game #8 (The Haunted Carousel) is interesting and has wonderful graphics, but is awfully short.I did not at all enjoy #11 (Curse of Blackmoor Manor) as I found it way too difficult.   I also cannot really recommend #12 (Secret of the Old Clock). It was too short and repetitive.I did somewhat enjoy #13 (Last Train to Blue Moon Canyon) and #14 (Danger by Design) but they were nowhere near the quality of the earlier games in terms of plot or puzzles.And now, we have #15.  Outstanding graphics, but way too short.  The amount of repetition of puzzles in order to advance drove me completely crazy.  I don't mind Nancy running about doing errands to help people (for that, I thought Games 3 and 4 had it perfectly balanced).  But I like each task to be different and interesting.  Not mind-numbingly repetitive and boring.This seems to be a factor of the more recent games - delivering telegrams in Game #12, painting pictures in Game #14, and now finding seashells and making necklaces in this game.I miss looking for clues.  Putting together evidence for a purpose.  I miss puzzles that actually are woven into the fabric of the plot and are there to advance the game.  It seems like the repetition now might be so that it can be said that this game took X number of hours to complete.I also miss learning useful things.In #1, I learned about American Sign LanguageIn #3, I learned about Chinese symbols and the San Francisco earthquakeIn #4, I learned about latitude and longitude and how a sextant worksIn #6, I learned SO much about the Maya and how to work a HAM radioIn #7, I learned about Roman Numerals and ProhibitionIn #8, I learned how to make invisible writing!In #9, I learned how to work a HAM radio and about Pacific Northwest sea animalsAfter that, well, I didn't really learn very much of anything useful in any of the later games.If you've never played a Nancy Drew game, please, please, PLEASE do yourself a favor and start with one of the earlier games (although probably not the very first one - the graphics aren't as good and switching discs can be highly annoying).  But give #2 - 9 a try; you won't be disappointed!Oh please, Her Interactive, PLEASE go back to the way they used to be structured.  I'd gladly sacrifice some of the improved graphics if it meant regaining some plot, cohesion, or integrated, interesting puzzles.</review_text>
Both this game and Danger by Design were disappointing compared to some of the previous games (Shadow Ranch, the Last Train to Blue Moon Canyon, Secret of the Old Clock, etc.).  The game was short, and I thought the tasks were a bit dull.  I also found it somewhat confusing switching between Nancy Drew and the Hardy Boys.  Hopefully Her Interactive will produce something better next time, because these games really are addictive, even for adults</review_text>
this game has a 25 minute introduction or story.  Square Enix was really creative and the stories are so good!  However I do expect them to put something like "Skip Intro" cause impatient people could really get mad at the stories!  I, however only get a game every five months so I am fine with that.  This is only a minor flaw.  Another flaw is that when you want to look at the map or statistics, you have to wait 5 seconds until it appears.  Very annoying, but again a minor flaw.  This game depends on how much you like to battle the same creatures over and over and over again!  It get very boring after awhile.  You have to train those dumb spirits and sometimes you just want them to level up quicker.  This game gets very boring after awhile and you will want to ditch the game as well as the characters.  There is not much action and you have a limited amount of monsters to battle.1.0 ~ 3.5----- terrible3.6 ~ 5-----bad5.1 ~ 6.5-----average6.6 ~ 8-------good8.1 ~ 9------great9.1 ~10------must buy excellent!graphics- 9/10  greatsound   -9/10   some voice acting but greatfun   -   5/10  depends on how patient you are and how you react to battling the same monster over and over againaverage- about 8my grade-   7   goo</review_text>
I had read pretty good reviews about this game so I bought it.   I was hoping for something with a little action with an interesting storyline.  What I got was probably the most boring game I have ever played.- The introduction/prolouge lasts about 7 minutes or so, including the credits.  You cannot break out and move on- After you set down your PSP and grab a drink, you come back and find that there is one short battle for you to play.  Then you go back to the "story".  The characters have long, annoying conversations and you get to press "X" at the end of each of their sentances.  Again, no way to break out, no in-game menu for you to manage the game.  You have to go through each painfully slow dialog box until the "chapter" is over.This game is really bad.  Maybe it gets a little more interesting; it is possible that there is actually something for you to do besides watch the characters argue.  It is really slow and it is all about the storyline and the dialog.  There does not appear to be any freeplay.  If you have played this type of game before and you enjoy that style of play, then you might like it.  I was bored and frustrated from the first minute</review_text>
Pretty much sums up how I felt after 15 minutes of introductory waffle, hellishly annoying bingy bongy music and (admittedly very pretty) cut scenes, totally emotionless voice overs, impossibly slow conversations that served little or no point.And to be honest at that point it was either switch off the psp or throw it against a wall. I decided to switch it off.Now I'm a big fan of adventure games, played untold legends 1 till it gave up on me (literally left hanging around with nothing to do and no more quests on offer).From what I can gather, the in game graphics for Valkyrie (after 15 minutes [though it seemed like much longer]) I'd seen some really cool character graphics - bit like tekken DR in-game graphics - and some of those horrible 2d munchkin japanese rpg graphics, which are the in-game stuff.So the bit you play looks like it's 20 years old and should be on a gba, the cutscenes are nice but there will no doubt be far too many of those - ie: 5 minutes of slow cut scenes for every encounter.I can't say this is a proper review as I couldn't stand this title long enough to get to any actual gameplay and there's no way I'm sitting through that intro again.My advice, if you like the long winded old style walk-and-talk for three hours before actually doing anything, japanese rpgs. Get this (or better still go to an antiques shop and find an old text adventure).If you prefer a game where you actually play the character and do stuff - avoid this like the plague.I've got high hopes for dungeon siege when it comes out (but then I had high hopes for valkyrie too :-( ), but for now untold legends 2 is okay, not as good as it should have been but a helluva lot more fun than valkyrie.I would like to point out that I've never played on a ps2, xbox or game cube - so this is the first time I've seen a valkyrie profile game. I didn't have any preconceptions, obviously if I had I'd never have gone anywhere near this title in the first place :-)</review_text>
I love the idea behind this game and it's pretty impressively exectuted. I had three gripes though: 1) It's so fast paced that I found it really difficult to progress past the third procedure. 2)I couldn't get the magnify and reduce (with quick little circles) to work.  This caused me great frustration. 3)There's no way to skip through the seemingly endless pages of character dialogue if you have to repeat a procedure a couple of times.I quit playing it pretty quickly</review_text>
This game is mindnumbingly hard not because its a very challenging but rather its set up to fail.Most missions thrust you into a situation with little indication of what to do. As the patients vital signs drops, you frantically poke at your DS trying to think on what to do. The nurse, who assists you, gives you vague ideas on how and before you know it you've failed the mission. It would take me an average of 10-15 failures before I finally won a mission. The last mission I played that made me quit, resulted in 30+ failures. And that's only being 1 hour and half into the game.The graphics are crisp and clear. The storyline didn't make much of an impression on me. But I was probably too frustrated to pay attention to that. This game had a lot of potiental but killed it by constantly making you fail. Do not buy this game unless you have an extreme amount of patients, game collector who will keep it sealed, or you're a gultton for punishment. Whatever you do, do not buy this game for the hype. It does not live up to it.</review_text>
To me, this game was seriously disappointing. So disappointing, I didn't finish the second case before setting it down forever.I was highly entertained - at first. It's cute, funny, and going around clicking on things for a new DS user was highly entertaining. However, it quickly got older.1. You can't skip through the horrendously long dialog - ever. Even after you've heard it about a million times because you're clicking on people hopelessly in frustration unable to figure out what to do.2. I found myself looking for an internet walk through, yes, on this simplistic game. I couldn't figure out what to click and wandering around hopelessly for thirty minutes reading over dialog you've read a thousand times just gets too frustrating even for my typical patience level.3. Possible Spolier - There seemed to be a glich in the second story in which I talked to the wrong person at the wrong time and then I could never get a ticket into the planetarium. After that, I just couldn't take it any more and gave up.4. The places and people never change. For each case, from my understanding, it's all the exact same tiny few places. I'm not a big gamer, but I like a world bigger than three feet.I let a friend borrow it and thus far she is enjoying it more than me.Just to help this review - I'm a college-age female and this is my first gaming console, although I've played the PS2 quite a bit. Maybe it's really a hit or miss but I don't really recommend it for anyone but someone with a high patience level. A REALLY high patience level</review_text>
This GameCube is WEAK. I have owned both the NES and the Nintendo 64 and those were excellent gaming systems. Nintendo's recent system, the GameCube, has several problems with it's design. First of all, the internal fan is slow but, quiet. After an hour or so of use, the system overheats, thus shuts down. Second problem, the wireless controllers for this system SUCK. We have tried 4 brands and none have worked more than a week. The brands we have tried: Pelican, Intec, Nintendo, and Osmart. The third problem is that the system was not built to last. I still have the NES and Nintendo 64, which both work great! I doubt the GameCube will last past 4-5 years of use. Simply put, DON'T BUY THIS PRODUCT! ALSO! The Nintendo Wii is going to come out soon. From the description and from the specs, you will need to stand up and interact (move around and stuff) with the game. Sounds fun but, would you like to do that after a hard day of work? It will work something like the Sony Eye Toy.</review_text>
This game is fun and injoyable, but the bonus levels are questionable and it is almost better with less people</review_text>
I am a huge fan of the RPG genre and have played just about every one for the PC.  Morrowind is the most boring one I have ever played.  I turned it off after two evenings of SLOWLY walking around, having stupid repetitive conversations with NPCs, and lamely fighting rats.  The interface is terrible.  You are very limited in what you can carry, so after you kill a monster you can't even carry your treasure back to town.  This "game" was all work with no fun.  Do not buy</review_text>
there are pros and cons of this card.PROS-its stores a lot of memoryable to save many files at one timecompactaffordableCONS-games that require 256 blocks will not be able to save!sometimes crashes.i tried saving with nhl 06 and it said it needed more memory. if you have a game that used 256 blocks get the gameshark 16x memory car</review_text>
Make no mistake, this is the memory card for you if you've got a Gamecube (which I'm assuming you do, or you're planning on getting one soon).Anyway, there are 251 blocks on this baby, which may not seem like a lot, but it is.  It gets the job done, and you don't have to worry about it corrupting data or anything.  I've had mine for a while and nothing has happened to the files saved on there.  It's also easy to save and delete information from this thing with the simple click of a button.Please, don't get that damn third party memory card from Madcatz, my experience with that is corrupted data, and constant reformating of the card (which erases your files anyway).  Only go with Nintendo, they're the only ones who know the divine nature of their memory card.I must say, though, this is for the casual gamer.  Someone who doesn't have every game they can possibly get a hold of.  Some EA games, for exammple, take up over one-hundred blocks of memory.  Basically, what I'm saying is simple: If you're one who has a ton of games, you may find yourself buying more than one of these memory cards before you know it.  Not every game has a save for just the game.  Resident Evil, for example, saves on a different block every time.  Just like a playstation memory card.  If you're like me, however, you probably don't have THAT many games that it's a bother.The other thing I must caution is simple: This thing, like every other memory card, is small as hell.  This one even more so.  If you can, keep it plugged in your Gamecube at all times.The great thing about memory cards, just about everyone of them, is simple: You can take them anywhere.  Does your same friend also own Super Mario Sunshine?  Hey, that's great, now you can leave your copy of the game at home and take your memory card.  It lightens the load.It's essential to have a memory card if you buy a Gamecube, and this is a good one.  If, however, you happen to be someone who has a TON of games, this won't hold you over long enough, and you'll have to buy another.No Gamecube owner should be without a memory card, though.</review_text>
Remember all those countless super hero licensed beat 'em up's that plagued 16-bit systems?  At first glance EA's Marvel Nemesis: Rise of the Imperfects might not seem like that type of game, but make no mistake that it is: a repetitive and quickly boring beat 'em up with a host of technical issues.  You can play as a variety of Marvel Comics heroes and villains, as well as six "Imperfects": cyborg-esque warriors created specifically for the game.  The single player mode is ungodly repetitive as you battle hordes of generically created enemies.  This gets boring real quick, with button mashing galore and repetitive gameplay.  The destructable environments seem like a good plus at first, but you'll soon learn how much they actually work against you in a brawl, and it becomes more frustrating than it should be.  The cumbersome control scheme adds to this, not to mention that the controls can get to be quite buggy as well.  The graphics look sharp from a distance, but the game has an odd look to it like it doesn't know if it wants to look like Spider-Man 2 or Ultimate Spider-Man (both are great games that are much more worth your time than this), and the in game cut scenes look godawful.  There are a few saving graces which save Marvel Nemesis from being a complete clunker, including a horde of unlockable content that comic fans will love.  The Marvel heroes' super powers are nicely pulled off, including Storm's weather attacks and Daredevil's agility, and the online support is where the most fun from the game is to be had.  Other than that though, there's not much else here to hold your interest.  If you're looking for a great super hero game, check out the X-Men Legends series or the aforementioned Ultimate Spider-Man.  If you're looking for a great beat 'em up, check out Rockstar's the Warriors; all of which are more worthwhile than this</review_text>
This review is in reference to "Nancy Drew: Last Train to Blue Moon Canyon Game + Strategy Guide" edition.I've played 3 or 4 of the Drew games.  This one played faster and was over before the time it took to install the game.Before I had installed 'Blue Moon Canyon', I had installed "Morrowind the Game of the Year Edition", which sold for five dollars less than 'Blue Moon Canyon'.  Morrowind is a huge 4 disc game that has, at the bare minimum, 400 hours of gameplay, and possibly might literally be endless.  The entire Morrowind set had been installed and up and running within 15-20 minutes.After I had installed and played 'Blue Moon Canyon' we installed and got up and running "Age of Mythology Gold" also within 20 minutes. This is another massive game, a Real Time Strategy game that included the expansion pack "The Titans". Both 'Mythology' games were completely installed.  This is another game that can be played and explored for years.  The two game set sold for five dollars more than 'Blue Moon Canyon', or the original full retail price of the strategy guide edition."The Last Train to Blue Moon Canyon" took so long to download...we went out for dinner and let it download while we were gone.  We have a P4 at 3.2Ghz, an 80GB HD, of which only 23GB were used, and 1.5 GB of RAM.  There is no reason on earth why Nancy Drew games should take so long, over an hour, to download...unless their copy protection program conflicted with our Toshiba Super-Multi Drive drivers.The actual installation was not as painful as the download.  What was painful was the gameplay.  I had a lot of fun playing the 'Secret of the Old Clock'.  Whereas most of the Amazon user reviews came across as lukewarm to the game, I liked playing the golf game, and the car chase, and the "bank shots" of reflective light beams to be aligned.  I even felt proud when I finally got the sewing completed.I knew that the Drew games wouldn't deliver the value that the two games (mentioned above) did.  But after the reading the reviews of 'Blue Moon' I expected to have more fun than I did with 'Secret', even though I knew it would be short lived.What a let down.  The game was over in two or three hours. Most of the gameplay was a memory test of what order what button was pushed or stick was knocked over, or  which way the track leaned to.  The 'arcade' games in the General Store were just hit the button or in this case 'click the mouse'. You didn't even have to look.  The most complicated task was getting a piece of paper to do a rubbing. It was very boring.Between the price, the concern over the length of the download, the most unimaginative gameplay set to walking back and forth on a train, I cannot recommend this game as being fun. It had a few moments with the Math/scale problems but it wasn't enough to carry the game or balance the huge amount of needless dialogue the player has to endure listening to.I realize I'm an adult, but the eight year-old little girl (I bought it for) lost interest after the first 15 minutes.  She was wiser than I.Sorry Nance, this one is a waste of money, and might contribute to hardware damage with driver conflicts.marf</review_text>
i didnt like clue chronicles i sat there for 5 hours and still couldnt figure it out, i got so far and couldnt get any further. this was a waste of my money, if i could sell it i would, i like the regular clue better, that is why i bought this i thought it was something like the old one, when i seen it wasnt, i thought this might be fun, but as i was playing it i hated it more and more. i have sat down and tried this game 10 different times and i end up in the same spot and cant get no where else. i hate i</review_text>
We recommend not buying this game, unless you don't mind a buggy version that is not supported by Hasbro and can't be fixed.  Hasbro has decided not to support the game and the patches at the website are no longer available.  Save your money and wait for the next one, hopefully bug free</review_text>
I bought this game about a week ago. I had not purchased the prequil (sp?) to this game and did not know what to expect.I began playing the game and immediately got bored about 30-45 minutes later. I have no played the game since. Here's why:The graphics, to me, are ridiculously annoying. It makes the game feel so unrealistic. The graphics are a step lower than "NBA Street" and even more unrealistic. The real problem is that there is just nothing to do. You enter tournements and they all feel the same. The little side missions are laughable, and I feel like turning off my Ps2 and smashing the controller on my head repetitively everytime I play one of them.I can go on and on about why I hated this game. But I won't. The bottom line is that I strongly urge you not to waste your money. The cover and appearance of the game appealed to me and made me want to buy the game...but don't let that happen to you</review_text>
After playing this game for the third time I had a thought, 'WHY DID I BUY THIS!' This game is extremely unoriginal and gets boring very quickly. I cannot notice any difference and improvements from the first ballers and other NBA Street's. Save your money and do not purchase this dreadful game</review_text>
poor quality ,out of box you can only play KQ7. almost useless very dispointed that they even sell this game as it is</review_text>
My gripe is about KQ6.  One customer said that there were no differences between the cd and disk versions. This information is false. At the time of its origional release, I was fortunate to have a high end computer (for its time) that was able to run the Windows CD version of KQ6 which had much better graphics and Character Illustrations. I was beyond upset when I found out that this was nothing but the DOS version. I bought this to play the windows version that to my knowlage does not work in any way on any OS past win95 (maybe 98). Those who have played and have been waiting to play the Windows CD version will be very upset</review_text>
I loved this game as a child and I spent many hours playing it. I was incredibly excited to be able to play it on my Laptop. OOPS they didn;t update any of the drivers for the first two games (Kings Quest 1 & 2) so after about 15 minutes of playing you can't see the screen due to all of the graphic errors. There are no patches available as of yet and it dosn't look like any are on the way. I feel pretty ripped off. It says on the cover in big print. "Runs on Windows XP." Barely, and not very well when it does. If you are interested in this game check to see if Vivendi has done any patches before you buy it or you will be disapointed. Better yet download one of the fan-made editions for free online. They work</review_text>
Hey, have you ever played Caesar II from the 1990s? Yeah, well this game is basically a knock-off of that game with better graphics. And quite frankly, Caesar II was more fun. I don't see how CivCity has any point. You build your city and nothing interesting ever happens. There is no progression to the game that keeps it fresh.The makers intergrated technologies and wonders from the successful Civilization game series, but they are inconsequential in this game. These people should stick to what they are good at, the Civilization series, and leave city games to people who know how to do it.I've heard that a new installment of the Caesar series is out now, Caesar IV, and I haven't tried it, but it has to be better than CivCity Rome. This game is boring, don't pay any money for it.</review_text>
I brought this after having played Caesar3 and loved it but wanted something with a bit more scope for controlling dynamics of a city - and I thought being a civcity game this would offer me the extension - WRONG - this is a bad rip off of Caesar3, sure, graphics are more advanced with the zoom in view but other than that I was playing the same game but with less involvement or control. This is a sit back and let it happen to you game - keep the people happy and build everything and they'll stay. Caesar IV - that's what you're wanting, it looks like everything this sets itself up to be that it isn't. Feel like I've wasted my money</review_text>
I was really looking forward to this game, and I was prepared to overlook one or two things.  Every game has it's own personality, right?  I found instead this game actually doesn't have much of one at all.I didn't mind the graphics.  Not cutting edge sure, but not that bad either.  A little muddy but a change from cartoony.  It was hard to enjoy closeup views, however, when so many buildings lost their roof on zoom.  No way to toggle that feature.  The camera angles were frustrating and it was very difficult to pick anything out with the mouse accurately.Not that there was much time to look at the scenery.  Immigrants came.  And came.  And came.  Whether there were houses and jobs available or not.  As long as city happiness was high enough, which meant that everyone was happy.  Which they were not.  Because they had no houses or jobs.To keep city happiness up was the only way to ensure a somewhat stable economy.  Forget planning.  Forget balancing resources with workshops and markets.  It wasn't clear what the balance was in any case.  It would take trial and error, and you didn't have the time.  For you were building worshops like mad, trying to guess at how many citizens would be employed by each, and researching for temporary bumps to keep your city from being deserted in droves.The best income boosts were not through sale of goods or trade.  It was through research, maximising the tax base with the development of currency and so on.  You hit those early on, and reached a certain population level, you made money.  The rest of the time you spent trying to keep people from leaving.  There was no stability in reaching any level.It quickly became a game of keep up.  There was no way to control immigration or set the pace of development.  And for all the decorative options, more than the similar games out, you really didn't care in the end what your city looked like, because it just cost time.  Money too, but that was really not the relevant issue.  Unless people were unhappy.  Then you could stick a few things, quickly, somewhere.  You just can't enjoy a leisurely pace of planning, building and finishing it off with a nudge here and there and watching it run...you have to be constantly involved in the process, staying ahead of the curve.  You don't have to worry about maintenance, such as city fires or engineers, but the cities cannot not be made self-sufficient or self-sustaining with this inherent instability built into the gameplay.  Five or ten minutes away from the screen will bring most cities, if not all, to a screeching halt.While I enjoyed the research options, and the ability to move homes I thought was a great innovation, not having the ability to control the flow of immigrants to the city and pegging success to city happiness makes this game a poor economic simulation and the gameplay ultimately very shallow and unsatisfying.</review_text>
The Civ name has been tarnished.  Analogously, one thing I have been learning is that just because Sid Meier's name is on a product, it doesn't mean the product is good.In the case of CivCity: Rome, unfortunately, it doesn't just come in at "modestly good" - it comes in at "dismally poor."  I've tried hard not to let this influence my beliefs about Civilization in general, but after Civ4 came out, I am starting to believe that Firaxis Games and Sid Meier are on their way out.  And now this...I regret to inform that the great Civ titles were made a long time ago.  The offerings of today have a simple pattern: the production was rushed and the title came out with major bugs; the games add unnecessary features designed to justify the overall cost; and the consumers are often abused with ridiculous expansion packs containing features that should OBVIOUSLY have been included in the original release - they take advantage of our love for the franchise.This pattern is so evident that the whole Sid Meier and Civ franchise is degenerating.  It almost seems, especially with the release of CivCity: Rome, that we are once again expected to simply drop cash for new products based on our love for the old.  But the developers are not living up to our expectations for producing great games!Stay away from CivCity: Rome.  Besides the obvious blunders associated with all the bugs, you will see that even the best patch cannot make the graphics look good, the narration and sound effects better, or the interface to work properly.  The game is a dismal failure, and I am sorry to report that.  It seems like Firefly Studios had an idea and got the license from Firaxis, but they just cheesed it.Watching what Maxis (The Sims and SimCity franchises) and Firaxis (Civilization franchise) are doing to their most loyal fans is like watching your dad get drunk</review_text>
It has pretty much all been said, let's just say it again 'cause I'm sure Firaxis/Firefly will plant positive reviews here. The game takes ages to load, the voice acting is silly (British? Australian? Herman's Hermits?), the progression is totally linear (ie the game fails to become more complicated at higher levels), the graphics date to 2002, and the citizen 'fetching' system is completely random and opaque. Sit and watch for awhile: your huts will change size every thirty seconds.Most importantly, boo Sid, boo. You could've produced this bad Caesar3 ripoff and called it anything, but you called it "CivCity", and even put a tiny Civilopedia in it. Haven't you got enough money? The Civ Series is brilliant. Don't cash it in</review_text>
The games faults have been well covered already so I'll just say, if a Roman era city builder is what your looking for save your money and wait for Ceasar IV. Afer playing the demo I can say that this will be a FAR superior game than civcity on every level. It seems to be the game the makers of civcity were trying to make but failed miserably.</review_text>
Like the other reviews, I find this game a rip-off of Caesare III. (I didn't know there was a IV! Must look into that.) While the graphics are admirable, the gameplay wasn't challenging at all. It didn't take me any time at all to win, and I'm one of the worst game players ever. OTOH, it's a good afternoon waster if all you want to do is build and perfect your city in open play with no goals. Don't buy it now. Wait until it's cheap, like $9.95 or something.</review_text>
Graphics aren't the most important part of a game to me.  I already owned Oblivion when I bought Gothic 2 because I was hoping it would be a darker and more mature "Oblivion" style RPG.While it does have much more mature content than Oblivion,.. I never got to see it because of the bad controls,.. bad collision and lack of fun.  (By bad collision I'm talking about your character walking through or getting stuck on objects.)The only weapons you can find at first are a tree branch and a tiny dagger.  There are no easy enemies to fight for a Level 1 character.  Even the little gremlin looking guys in the first cave by that pond at the beginning totally beat the crap out of you with ease.  The controls make combat an unfun chore.I'm a patient and forgiving gamer but Gothic 2 barely has half the quality of Elder Scrolls 4 : Oblivion.  If you've never played Oblivion and don't have an XBox 360 or a PC that can run it,.. then maybe you'll get into Gothic 2.  It has much lower system requirements</review_text>
The controls are very difficult and I understand they wanted "realism" but they killed a lot of fun by making you just so damned vulnerable to EVERYTHING.  I'm a long-time gamer and I can handle a tough game but this is just frustrating to the extreme.  Plus for all the people talking about immersion...I just don't see it.  I just couldn't get myself to care about the world or story I was in; it didn't grab me like some games do</review_text>
Bought this game on the strength of some reviews here but I was very dissapointed with it. Clunky control system really put me off</review_text>
The concept for this game is strong, and it's got some cute ideas, but the voice recognition - especially for the word "blue" - and the character recognition is abysmal.  It makes the "game" an exercise in frustration, more than anything else.As to character recognition...unless you write in whatever font the game is programmed to recognize, it's going to record your answers as something different than what you wrote.You are penalized when the system doesn't recognize "blue" or the correct number.If the system is so rigid that it only accepts one way of saying "blue", then the system should have a sound file that tells you what it wants to hear.  As to the number recognition, it should have a screen that shows you how the system wants the numbers written, or it should be able to allow you to enter your numbers and correlate them to numbers within the system.  (When I make this mark, it = 4)Also, the "intro" content is absurdly long, with no way to skip over it.  Huge waste of time after the first 10x you've seen it.I just got the game today, and I've spent hours trying to figure out a way to say blue such that the game will recognize it...now, I just wish I could return opened software.  I'm very frustrated with the entire experience</review_text>
Playing Icewind Dale II reminds me of all of those novels written by American authors in the late 19th century. Though many of the novels were very well written, they never seemed to suck me in and continue reading the book. Icewind Dale II is like that. It looks nice, it supposedly improves gameplay, and it gives the player more character creation options, but I just don't really want to play it. Why? Well, at the end of the day, it seems as if Icewind Dale II is hurt by a extremely corny story; it is bogged down in numerous irrelevent puzzles involving you running around constantly; it is just not as fun as its predescessor.I bought this game for one reason and that reason was that I was addicted to Baldur's Gate II and needed to expand my party based rpg addiction to another realm. Icewind Dale II seemed to be the logical option. I was wrong. I was immediately confronted with a story so corny that it is almost embarassing to take part in. I was confronted with gameplay that caused me to run back and forth from one place to another constantly. I was confronted with battles so easy that I was soon bored.I tried to play it again, but again I was plagued with the same problems. I installed a bunch of unofficial patches, but those did not solve the problems with the terrible puzzles and whatever else.The overload of puzzles and corniness would be ok if you could diverge from the one path as you could in Baldur's Gate II, where you could accomplish quests at the order that you wanted to. Here you had to accomplish everything in a linear order and could never diverge from the path. Furthermore, the story seemed to be a retread of the story from the original Icewind Dale. In fact, the design of the game seemed to paralell it completely.The final problem with this game concerns the fact that it is difficult to play if you have no knowledge of dungeons and dragons rules. If you do not know how to use rogues or are unfamiliar with feats and the like, this game will pose a very high learning curve that you may not want to climb. I was mostly familiar with the rules, but it was easy to see that someone who did not know them as well could easily make mistakes or be unfamiliar with the use of certain classes (even though the rule book was pretty exhaustive).All in all, I do not think that this is a good game. I would just go with Baldur's Gate II or Icewind Dale I instead of this game.</review_text>
Firstly, I have been a big fan of the aurora engine for PC based RPG games.  I loved BG 1 and 2 plus the first IWD but the sequal to which I found, to be honest, awful.  I was raised with the 2nd edition rule set and I have never played the 3rd (with the exception of NWN) but the fact that this game is based on the newer set of rules didn't bother me much.  It's a computer game after all, the exact mechanics of the system I dont have to understand.  The thing that did bother me about this game is the fact that it was one big battle after another.  Your commanders send you on endless suicide runs.  It got to the point where I could simply leave my game runing for an hour or two while my chacters could hack and slash their way through the tide of randomly spawned criters.It got boring really fast.  Not too mention difficult as well.  The really sad part was, when I read the general plot outline, I was enthusiastic.  I have always wanted to see what would happen if the Orc races banned together in an army and attempted to invade.  But, when you and your 5 companions are the only ones on the front lines against an army... this is the point where (in pen and paper RPG's) that I tell the fellow who is hiring me to shove it</review_text>
This game looked so crazy I couldn't resist it.  I mean Disney and Squaresoft trying to merge Final Fantasy and a load of Disney cartoons must have seemed like a cool idea in Japan since they love cartoons so much, but in the USA it's just insane.  On top of that you have voice talents from Mandy Moore to Lance Bass, and as production values go you knew you had to be in for one of most ridiculous games in history.   Hardcore fans were bothered that this looked like a kids' game but aren't games supposed to be aimed at children and teens anyway?I was ultimately disappointed with Kingdom Hearts.  The world and characters of Kingdom Hearts is not really about a Final Fantasy Disney crossover it's just a place for the kids you control to have out their little melodrama.  It's like the idea of Disney meets Final Fantasy just takes a back seat.  Once you get past all the hype Kingdom Hearts is boring and frustrating.  A nagging issue is the tiny areas in this game.  "Planet Alice in Wonderland" consists of four small rooms of course you will spend a great deal of time in them fighting off monsters.  The combat is a blend of chaotic button mashing and watching your party members act like total fools until they die.  The worst of it is respawning monsters, you can't take a step without having to fight and re-fight hoards of shadow munchkins that you had just defeated.  Because of this you'll spend the majority of your money on healing items.  Bosses are a nightmare since they are hard to survive and take forever to kill (30 minutes is normal.)  Since combat is so simple it really makes the drawn out battles beyond boring.  After beating 2 bosses I was done with this game.  I know that Kingdom Hearts 2, Mushashi Samurai Legend, and Final Fantasy 13 all have the same combat woes.  I wish Squaresoft would learn that respawning enemies and bosses with 9 million hit points are a thing of the past</review_text>
Now, before you say anything, I have played this game and beaten it in the week provided by blockbuster(grudgingly playing it though)and now for the unbaiased opinion. I think that this game is so completely stupid. It and the sequel are retarded but again its my opinion.</review_text>
I really could not tell you anything, as I still have not recieved this game, despite having paid for it over a month and a half ago</review_text>
Please promise me you will never play this.  It is not worth your time.  If you paid money for it, try to find the person you gave that money to and kick them in the shin.  Hard.  Then throw your copy of this game in the dumpster.Seriously though, this game is absolutely terrible.  The graphics are bad even for the PSX, the combat quickly becomes boring as all hell, the story line was confused and the fact that there was a second dimension pointless.  There was no reason for there being 40 something characters, most of them were exactly the same statwise, and all of them were poorly designed.  The most annoying thing in the world, bar nothing, is having to re-equip all your character's spells whenever you switch characters.  You have like 50 spell slots.  God.  I don't think I even need to say it, but those crumbums at Square couldn't pull another hit out of their oversized victorian tophats if they wanted too.  They should really stick with straight to video Final Fantasy 7 anime movies from now on, lest they risk making something like this again</review_text>
The first game we played on Gamecube was Spongebob, Battle for Bikini Bottom.  We absolutely loved it and my daughter plays it over and over.  Thinking Shrek 2 would be similar, we rented it.  It's very hard to control the c-stick and it kept zooming in and out and wouldn't rotate the camera except for certain times.  The charactors were very distant and even if we used the c-stick to zoom in, it still wasn't close enough.  It's the same feeling as needing to put eyeglasses on to see something more clearly! Another aspect we didn't like was the four charactors are always together and you would lose track of which one was the main charactor.  Maybe we're spoiled because the c-stick on Spongebob allowed you to rotate in every direction to see what was around you and the graphics were so good you could see facial expressions.  It's surprising all the reviews are so good because our impression was completely opposite.</review_text>
I loved "The Incredibles," so I was excited to play the game.  I've only been playing video games the last couple years, and only off and on, so I'm really just a beginner.  Perhaps that explains the enormous difficulty I've had with this game.  My boyfriend is a long-time video game player, and he was able to do things in one or two tries that I labored for hours over.  Even using cheat codes did not really help me all that much.  I was surprised when I read the review that said the game was too easy.  I almost cried.  LOL  But seriously, unless you are a good gamer, you're probably going to be more frustrated than challenged by this game.  As for me, I guess I'll stick to action RPGs</review_text>
hi- it was impossible to use this product because the keythey gave me didn't work. imight make a fisbee out of the dvd!jerr</review_text>
Bought this Platinum game with much anticipation and it doesn't work at all.  Tried the download .exe patch and does nothing and to top it off half the original game forum sites crash too.  No one has any idea how to fix this game and all you have to do is look at the dozen of patches out on first game.  If they had spent the time and money to build the game and test it right like Blizzard does and companies like Westwood was then they would release a finished game but decided to use everyone as gunea pigs to test the product so they could try to patch it to work.DO NOT BUY ANYTHING from this company or its affiliates I think they are Alkida implants trying to take over the western world. If you want to play a game with style then wait until June and get "Titan's Quest" which should be finally a Diablo 3.Too bad this company couldn't find the capital to complete the game before release and would think anyone wanting to buy Spellforce 2 should be warned upfront to make sure you wait for about 6 months after release and buy an additional hard drive so you can download the new Patch fixes they will probably try to smoke screen you with as they count their money and send it to Iran</review_text>
I have a pretty decent computer (Athlon64/3000+, Radeon X550), but this game does not work at all.  Even after I download and install the patch from Aspyr (though there is no excuse for the game to not at least load straight out of the box), spellforce.exe just sits there and sucks up 99% of the CPU until I kill the process.  Aspyr support is unable to help.That said, despite other reviews here, this game does NOT install Starforce.  But maybe that's why my version won't work..</review_text>
this game is just the original + a crappy beam system where you spin to the right when you lock beams and the gamplay is totally repetitive also their isnt any in game transforming at ALL!! i hate this game so MUCH!! it is literally the worst DBZ game i have ever played {and i have played them all) i advise you if ur looking for a new DBZ game wait for the next one because their shure isnt anything new here but a crappy beam system. DO NOT BUY THIS GAME EVER!!!!</review_text>
There is nothing majorly wrong with this game.  The plot is well-developed, the characters are customizable, and the battles are strategic.  This is probably primarily subjective, but I just didn't enjoy this game.  It's not because there were too many movies--it's because I didn't like the movie.  I also didn't like the characters or the villains or for that matter the aesthetics.  There were some minor but annoying flaws in the game which further contributed to my displeasure.  Which button to press was often counterintuitive, and so I often found myself pressing the wrong button.  Also, the game badly needs a journal and/or a destination guide so you know where to go--I once spent one hour doing nothing other than walking around a space ship trying to figure out where to go</review_text>
I actually recieved this from a friend of mine, which he bought for $0.98. Anyway, I said that there were television shows that I thought were interesting, but were only sold over in the UK (and so on). He told me that the AR MAX was a REGION X DVD reader. So, I took it home, and decided on buying a TV series that was a Region 2, and just recieved it today, to my surprise (not actually) the damn thing didn't work. Now I'm stuck with a Region 2 DVD with nothing to play it in. I AM EXTREMELY DISAPPOINTED IN THIS PRODUCT! If you are buying this for the reason that it reads other Regions of DVD's...DON'T BUY THIS PRODUCT! It is junk. However, I am thankful that I didn't even buy this product, but it was given to me. I hope that someone planning on buying this, reads my review first. IT'S NOT WORTH YOUR MONEY</review_text>
I have found only one game out of the many that i have tried that the codes on this thing actually work on.  This action replay is basically a twenty dollar or more waste of plastic and the cardboard that it came in.  avoid like the plague</review_text>
AVOID THIS PRODUCT, wait till PS3 with it's Hard drive an hope something better will come out.Memory cards are flash memory an flash memory is FRAGILE, one whoops an it's destroyed.Damn to hell Sony for making us pop 25 bucks a memory card in the first place.BAD:STAY AWAY FROM MAX MEMORY MANAGER... DO NOT LOAD GAME SAVES FROM THE INTERNET ONTO YOUR MEMORY CARDS. IT WILL CORRUPT AN DESTROY YOUR MEMORY CARD/CARDS. One memory card is worth more than this stupid thing. I lost two memory cards an ALL my bazillion hours of gameplay.ALSO... the disc sucks, when the PS2 is warm, it won't recognize the disc & if you break or mess the disc up, no way you can make a copy of it an use that. Your screwed!GOOD:The codes work an it's great to whip through a game that was driving you nuts or stressing you out before.If you have complaints, call Datels US office(727) 431-065</review_text>
FROM AMAZON.CA---------The Action Replay MAX is more than just a video game enhancer (VGE)....or at least it claims to be. My version is quite old yet but it claims to include a Region-free DVD player and a memory card compression utility (squeeze more saves onto your memory card). I have not used either of these features personally, but I have heard horror stories about the memory manager corrupting gamesaves and whole memory cards; some reusable, some permanently damaged. This and the fact that you must load up the action replay software to access saves that use the memory manager turned me off of using it. However, the real reason I bought the ARMax was for its codes and I'll get to those in a second.The ARMax, like the newer Gamesharks, loads its software from a CD. This is a major annoyance for me. Every time you load a game you must insert the ARMax memory card (which does I don't know what) and CD, go sit on the couch and wait for the software to load, choose your codes, then get up and put the actual game DVD in and wait for it to load. You can't simply turn on your PS2 and go sit down. In the old days of cartridge gaming you would snap the VGE between the game and the console so you could turn on the console and go sit down. The early generation Gamesharks had a little box that would attach to an expansion slot on the PS1 or N64 and that was it. If you wanted it to load before the game, you turned on its switch. Even if the ARMax was perfect in every other way (and it's not, btw), it would get a maximum of 4 stars as long as you had to boot it from a CD first. I mean, why can't the memory card part of it at least hold the codes for even just the current game you're playing after the system is shut off or reset so you don't have to load the software EVERY D@MN TIME.Ok, rant over. On to the codes. The user interface for the ARMax is better than the Gameshark. Functionally, they are very similar of course, but the ARMax just feels cleaner and easier to use. It offers a Beginner interface that includes descriptions of code functions (not for user-entered ones though, if I remember right), and a more robust Expert Mode. On big advantage, in theory, that the ARMax has over the Gameshark is its ability to update itself using your PS2's broadband connection. The upshot is you can download new codes for your favorite games fairly quickly instead of manually typing them all in using the controller. The dark cloud to go with this silver lining is that you have no control over which codes you download; its all or nothing. And since these updates are stored on your memory card (not the ARMax one), it will quickly fill up with codes and gamesaves for games 99% of which you will NEVER play! No wonder the ARMax has the option to come with 16 or 32MB of space on its memory card. It's to store all the useless codes! Any entered codes you choose to apply will either work, do nothing, or lock up the game. I have come across all, though to ARMax's credit, mostly the former. The absurd choice forcing you to download and save updates for every game in the PS2 library, when you may want just one, loses the ARMax another star. A note about manually entering codes: The sub-headings and folders for a game have their own codes that must be entered if you want them to show up in the game's code list.Finally, as mentioned in the reviews by Bret Morris and Glenn Nichols (Amazon.ca), the ARMax initially did not work with the new revision of the fat PS2 a couple years ago AT ALL. This happened for me as well. I returned three PS2s and two ARMaxes before I realized it was a defect in all current versions (at the time) of ARMax. I had to send away and get a new disc direct from Intec which now works as well as expected. Since the ARMax has been on shelves for several years since I bought mine, I assume any bought today would not have this problem. However, at the time there was no way to find out about this problem without contacting Intec personally. Retailers were not aware of the problem and no notices were posted on the CodeJunkies web site. This inadequate treatment of a widespread problem drops ARMax down to two stars.In my opinion, if you're in the market for a VGE, both ARMax and Gameshark have their pros and cons. I would assume both have released newer versions with newer features than the ones I have. Looks at the specs, assume nothing, and don't be afraid to e-mail the companies requesting details regarding any features you have questions about.I apologize for the length of this review, but I find there are very few in-depth reviews of VGEs on the web or in print. Maybe reviewers feel they are above using VGEs, I don't know.</review_text>
I bought this product after reading that you can update the code list via a network connection, or using a USB flash drive.  I have not been able to get either to work correctly.  After following their instructions on the Datel website on how to update the codes using a USB drive, it deleted my game saves on the memory card.  It also corrupted the memory card, and corrupted saves on the card in slot 2.  I have had nothing but trouble with it, it's slow and doesn't live up to the promises.  Their customer support is lousy, with a response that merely said...sorry.  Well thanks a lot to them...just lost hours of game saves!!</review_text>
I honestly do not like cheat devices, but since Wild Arms 4 came out, it actually now has a use. Let me explain...Unfortunately, thanks to an programming on the part of Xseed Puplishing (the company that translated Wild Arms 4) it is impossible to unlock two of the bonus contents in the game without the aid of this device, or a similar device like a Gameshark. Since this is the cheapest of all said devices, if you are hellbent on unlocking everything in that game, you'll want to shell out the twenty dollars for this.If it wasn't for this reason, I wouldn't even be interested in this product.</review_text>
Then this will not work on your console.But if you have the huge old ps2 console then this will work on you console.If you do have the slim console then you should get a game shark</review_text>
As far as I am concerned this game is total garbage and I would not recomend it to any one. I do not know why it was ever released..!! Deer hunter 2003 is the same way I tossed both of them in the garbage. Trophy hunter 2003 is a much different story. The game play is very good and the graphics are up to par with todays fast computers..</review_text>
I bought this from Best Buy yfor $25 dollars thinking it would give my Xbox360 a longer life and keep it's insides cool.When I plugged it in, my Xbox360 didn't turn on AT ALL.  After trying it several times, I took it off and plugged in the AC adapter back on to my Xbox.  For a while, the Xbx wouldn't turn on.  I thought it was broken.  I gave a it a few minutes and luckily it turned back on, but that Intercooler nearly broke my Xbox.DON"T BUY IT</review_text>
First of all, it's sad that someone would put out a product (the 360) that gets so hot that it tends to fry itself, unless you spend another 10% of the product cost on a little series of fans.Second, I attached this. I plugged it in. It wouldn't even turn on. Waste of money. Do yourself a favor and just keep your machine in an open, uncluttered, unblocked area. If you absolutely must provide additional airflow, just point a $10 clip-on fan at it</review_text>
Stay away from this product, my intercooler, while noisy as all hell worked for a good 3 months, but i continously got random red-circles-of-death until my 360 got another one today and couldnt recover. This product will mess up your 360 because of the way the power cord has to go through it first.Terrible product that cost me 140$ and a whole month without my xbox while i wait for it to be repaired</review_text>
The intercooler can, and in my case did, damage my 360. It sucks current that otherwise would go to the 360, which caused component failure. The worst part? As it's not an approved accessory for the 360, any damage it causes will void your warranty and you'll have to buy a new 360 out of pocket</review_text>
I was not able to get the original intercooler to work on my system. I sent it back and got another one. The second intercooler did not work either. It makes a nice paperweight!</review_text>
There are WAY too many credible stories about these things causing problems to risk a $400 360. Putting *any* kind of power-drawing device between a piece of sophisticated electronics and its power supply is just asking for trouble -- I own a lot of expensive electronics and I'd never do it in a million years.Instead of taking such a chance, go to your local retailer and buy a little fan (4"-6") designed for placing/clipping (depending on how you've got your Xbox set up) on your desk at work, etc. You can get one for $5-$10 and don't have to worry about leeching power from your 360. Just set it up beside the 360 so that air flows beneath and over top.Since your average superstore has about a dozen fans that would fit the bill, you can shop for one that's quiet and fits your setup. My 360 actually runs quite cool, although I do have a small fan behind my audio rack that blows on my stereo amplifier.ps Always, always, always put electronics that generate heat in as open a location as possible. NEVER put anything on top, ALWAYS place on a hard surface, and ALWAYS leave at least a few inches clearance all around. Lastly, ALWAYS use a surge suppressor</review_text>
I played this game until Chapter 23. All the Dancing Levels were VERY HARD to beat! I think this game is not worth buying-- rent it</review_text>
My son begged for this game, and the price is reasonable compared to some games so we added it to our collection.  He enjoyed levels 1 & 2, but once we got to level 3 that was it!  Unless you have earned the nickname "Fast fingers" or "Fury Feet" don't bother purchasing this until you rent it.  I spent an hour trying to beat level 3 for my 6 year old the only thing I discovered was that I did equally as well when I randomly hit the 4 keys as quickly as possible (about 57% accurate) as I did actually keeping up.  Being this is only level 3 I can only imagine the "Dance Levels" get harder from here, Good Luck!!</review_text>
This game is a joke!  It is immpossible for a child to get past level 3.  It took my husband about 20 tries to get past it, and he is a pro at video games.  (he beat mech 2 for x-box and halo2 the third time he played them.)  Don't buy this game for your kids until you rent it and let them try it out.  It is was a waste of money my kids won't even play it.  It should be rated N for Nobody</review_text>
The gameplay is just foolish and found the game annoying and un-fun!  The kids didn't even like it. Run, don't walk away from this dentist-office of a game JAWS-cr@p. (JAWS = Just another W. Smith</review_text>
my kid played the game for 5 min only, it is not fun. if you want to try it just rent i</review_text>
We have been unsuccessful with this e-reader attachment since we purchased it. Cards read once and never again. Doesn't matter if we use the GB SP or Advance. Still doesn't do anything. Don't recommend you waste your money</review_text>
It's got some occasionally interesting puzzles, but the lame story and irritating characters kill whatever appeal Keepsake might have had.The Good: Unique and challenging puzzles; handy hint system helps keep the game moving.The Bad: Some of the worst voice acting you will ever hear; blurry, low-res backgrounds; dull characters and an uninteresting story</review_text>
We bought this game knowing Shrek movies are a bit raunchy, but thinking the game would be ok for a 6 year old to play.After watching my son play this game for a few minutes... I saw that he had to stun chickens and put them in a pot of boiling water while they were still alive. Then after that, he punched large turtles and threw them on tables where there backs were cracked open and died.  I can't believe a game that is rated E for Everyone would have little kids (or whoever played it) have to be so mean to animals.  What's next, ripping the head off a rabbit? I consider myself one of the coolest moms around, but this totally crossed the line</review_text>
I agree with other reviewers that the graphics and vocals are good, but I find the gameplay itself less than stellar. For starters, I've always been irritated with games that don't let you save your status whenever you want. Sometimes I just want to get in a quick dose of gameplay, but that's not possible with these games that require you to play through an entire section before being allowed to save.  That contributes to the repetitive, tedious nature of some sections. If you get stuck getting through a certain bit of the game, you're doomed to replay much of what led up to it over and over again.I realize that tricky camera angles are some of the challenges that are supposed to exist in this game. More than in the earlier versions, however, I have trouble getting myself lined up for whatever task. Another tedious element.I found this game to be more a test of my endurance and patience than actual fun</review_text>
I purchased this game when it was new, and my computer while meeting the requirements just couldn't run it. I put he game in a box and just a month ago found it again. The computer I have now should be able to run the game thrice simultaneously with all options on highest settings. Yet the game will randomly crash and cause my computer to restart and losing my 4mins to 2 hours work. I contacted tech support and got what I am now sure are just something for me to try until I quit trying and leave them alone. It worked. They win. They got my money and I got jack</review_text>
The copy of SimCity4 that I purchased came without the access codes to support instillation. When I called Electronic arts all I got was an automated phone system... press 2 now... EA's manufacturing quality control is so poor that they had a selection for products without access codes! I could never find a way to talk with a human beibng about the problem. The automated voice suggested solution was to send the product to them at my expsnse to prove that it came without the access code! I have returned the game to Amazon for a refund. I would never buy another EA product</review_text>
I bought one of these for my daughter as a gift & found that I need one for each GBA or SP.  So I bought another one for my son.  Then after we couldn't get them to work & consulted Nintendo we found that the wireless adapter doesn't work for all multi-player games & there are only a few games that will work with the wireless version.  Some gift</review_text>
I have always been a fan of fighting games.  As far as 3D ones go, I have great experience in the Dead or Alive series and proficiency with Soul Calibur 2.  I fear that Dead or Alive and Soul Calibur may have spoiled me though.  Recently I bought Mortal Kombat Deception and found it horribly awkward* compared to the fluid battles of Soul Calibur or Dead or Alive.  I felt the same way when I played Tekken 5.  Unlike the graceful and awesome animations of Dead or Alive or Soul Calibur, the movements of the characters in Tekken 5 are unrealistic and absurd.  Try out Christie in Tekken 5 for example.  Her idle animation is preposterous.  If you have access to Dead or Alive 3, try putting out Leifang.  Her idle animation is a thing of beauty.  Every one of her moves flows perfectly from one to the next.  This kind of grace is seriously lacking in the clunky Tekken 5.And now let us speak of character design.  Tekken 5's characters are boring and uninspired.  They run the gamut from miscellaneous boxer 1, 2, 3, and 4, to miscellaneous karate fighter 1, 2, 3, and 4.  Oh.  There are also a few shrieky girls in tight clothing, some of which seem to be Asian, if that's your thing.  And then there's a guy in a cat mask.  As awesome as that sounds, it looks silly in the game.If you have ever played Practice Mode on Dead or Alive you will probably recall with fondness that there is a feature that shows each move command at the top of the screen and keeps it there until you successfully perform that move.  This feature, as useful as it is, is not present in Tekken 5.  To be fair, it isn't found in any other fighting game that I have played, but it really should be.Without further ado, let me simply say that I do not recommend buying Tekken 5 if you have ever played Soul Calibur or Dead or Alive.  The intro video is about as much excitement as the game can offer (I especially enjoyed the suicidal bicycle girl that rescued the kitten).*But at least Mortal Kombat Deception had Puzzle Kombat, which rocked my socks</review_text>
Sure it looks good and the gameplay is ok but the final boss (Jinpachi) is really cheap and lame! Even at the "easy" difficulty, just a couple of hits from this freak and you're dead! The Devil Within mini-game is also stupid, some levels are just impossible and too hard. I wouldn't mind it if you could save your game whenever you want to or at least just before some critical part of the game but unfortunately that is not the case here, not to mention some save points are hidden. Imagine getting through the most boring levels doing extremely tedious yet dumb puzzles, spending around 2 hours or more to get to the boss level, then finally finding yourself trying over and over to beat the boss until you just give up but you can't save your game, then you're gonna have to redo the entire level again!!! That is one sick stupid game design! The only reason I'm playing this mini-game is just to get the hidden items</review_text>
At First When I Got It, It Seemed Fun.  Then As The Minutes Go By It Got Boring Quick.  The Missions Suck, The Bosses Are Too Hard.  I Just Sold My Game,  If You Buy This Game You'll Be Doing The Sam</review_text>
I really liked the first two Jak games, so I was excited to try Jak 3. Whoa. Major mistake. This game is nothing more than a lame racing-wannabe. I was very disappointed in this game. If you are expecting a platformer, look elsewhere</review_text>
Dont get me wrong the controller is inovative and feels good and is really a grea idea but the one huge problem that noone has mentioned is how these things eat up batteries, put it this way, you need to put new AA batteries in the damn thing every three days, and that is not cool at all! I will be buying the wire controlers from now on,The premium system should have included the battery charger im othere than this MAJOR ISSUE the controller is great, but again let me stresss this issue,...it is not fun to be in the middle of an online fight in Fight Night 3 and have your controller (that you just put batteries in, well at least you thought you did) die, and get you knocked out when you were clearely winning the fight</review_text>
My son (7) used a gift certificate to purchase this game for his birthday. It came with 4 dics that we downloaded correctly but the game would not play. We kept getting an error message that our graphics were not sufficient.  We don't do much PC gaming, but we have a fairly new Dell laptop computer that we assumed was sufficient. If the item description had been more advising that certain requirements would prevent the game from working -- we wouldn't have wasted his time.  We have yet to receive credit for this item. A HUGE HASSLE!!  We'll stick to the PS2 games from now on.</review_text>
how many RPG's can this world make??  they're all the same.  open this container, take weapons and health kits from this dead body, use this spell.. KOTOR is no different, sadly.  the combat IMHO is just really boring.  when you see an enemy, the screen freezes and you decide ahead of time your first moves to make.  if that doesn't kill the enemy, your character automatically does standard attacks unless you pause the game and set up your next moves.  umm, how many times has this been done before?  if i wanted that, i could have bought final fantasy 129 or whatever number they're on now.  all of the enjoyment is taken out of using things like blaster rifles and light sabers.  it's the same idea as using your shovel or something in nethack (look it up).  the good thing about games like everquest and world of warcraft is that they took the stale old RPG formula and did something new with it.</review_text>
I bought this because the two Dino Crisis games on the Playstation 1 were fantastic survival horror fun, and I was very taken with the hype around this game which billed it as a lightgun game that was free roaming rather than on rails. What they didn't say was that it's almost impossible to use the PS2 gun as a fully functioning controller, which is what you really need to do. For anything but shooting, all the buttons you need are in really inconvenient places all around the gun and after half an hour's play time, I had to take a break to rest my aching joints.In case you haven't seen it, the G-Con2 gun has a teeny-weeny directional pad on the back of it, and it's this that you are expected to use to move yourself around. Now, if you try holding the gun in a standard "aiming" style, you'll soon realise that your fingers are in nowhere near the right position to be able to reach it. You could just hold the gun wrongly and reach it, but you need to be able to fire at the screen regularly to kill dinosaurs. And they don't sit still waiting to be shot! So for most of the game you need to be able to move and fire at the same time. And guess what? It's impossible. Bravo, Capcom. Oh, sorry, they didn't stop there, but added a further control scheme to allow you to strafe. To do this you need still more fingers so that you can still press the directional pad, along with two further buttons way down on the gun barrel at the same time. And be able to pull the trigger. But even that's the end of it - if you want still more pain, try using sniper mode!As you may have realised, the control scheme completely spoiled the gameplay for me. I'm not fumble-handed by any means, but you would need to be an octopus to manage all this. Which is a shame, because a free-roaming game about shooting dinosaurs is a very exciting idea. And Dino Stalker is otherwise presented very well. The graphics are very good and the monsters all look very impressive. Some stages are really good fun but my favourite ones are those when you are riding some kind of vehicle, which means you don't have to worry about movement at all - hooray! The levels where you get chased down a tunnel by an enraged T-Rex are probably the most fun in the game. The rest is ruined by the controls, which make your life hell. I'll tell you something else too - most levels have a TIME LIMIT!! In case you thought a slow careful hunt would save your fingers, this has been rendered an impossibility by the levels having a clock that counts down to zero - so if you don't rush through the stage, it's game over for you. Kind of negates the joy of free-roaming, doesn't it? You are basically stuck with dashing from point A to point B, killing everything that moves...might as well be on rails. I don't know why this stupid condition was added, as Dino Stalker was not created to be an arcade game.It's a real waste of potential, but it's only fitting that Dino Stalker was a miserable failure after release. If you buy it, you have only yourself to blame. I managed to finish it - the final stage in the volcanic pit was actually pretty good fun, but this and the other bosses towards the end were endurance tests that caused me agonising hand cramps to get through. Save yourself - I made it through so that I could come here and tell you that you don't have to. Could have been a great game, but it all went wrong due to the impossible way you are expected to be able to use the gun.</review_text>
I really wanted to see how the developers could represent playing as a dragon, and spyro is the only one that came to mind at the time.  I decided to get it, I put it in my console, turned it on, and was blown away...by the stupidity.-Basic StoryIs stupid.  Bad dragon plant mean gems to kill good dragon.  Spyro good dragon, defeat evil dragon.  Everybody dances because goodness prevailes.-GameplayAn atrocious story can be overlooked if the gameplay is good (mario?) but spyro has probably the worst gameplay ever.  It combines horrible, precise jumping puzzles with abysmally stupid enemies.  The puzzles require you to tap the jump button at a certain time.  If you don't, you go back to the beginning of the puzzle.  It was maddeningly hard at some points, and I am grown.  So how hard would it be for a kid?For the enemies, they should get the darwin award.  At many instances I was breathing flame (it has a limited reach) and the enemy walked right into it!  The enemies are dumber then a retarded 4 year old but margianally smarter than Paris Hilton.  Also, they are very weak dying in 1-2 hits.  There are also very few types of enemies (like around 2-6) but they have the same AI and equally pose no challenge, seeing as they are weak and attack you one at a time.The boss battles are so simple they make you want to shoot yourself at how moronic they are.  Also, playing as the other characters (hunter, blinx etc.) are not that fun.In conclusion don't make the mistake I made and steer clear of this game.  Get better ones for yourself whomever you are giving a gift to.(Oh, and don't listen to the other people who gave this crudhole good reviews, they are either A. Retarded or B. Never played a decent game.</review_text>
i am a huge spyro fan, i have been playing since the first one, which was great, the second one better, the third one, ok, forth one What happened!! this one, after purchasing mine from amazon cheaply for something like 5 i regret doing so, it was a waste of money seen as the whole game is a bit repetative and frustrating, you never seem to get anywhere. all the voices have changed. if you are a series gamer and enjoyed the origional spyro games, dont buy this and dont be disapointed. however i would say that if you are under 12 you would probably very much enjoy the game</review_text>
Don't be fooled by the advertisments that you see in almost every magazine.  Blitz doens't offer the career mode that it was based around and game play itself is horrible.The greatest inconvience of the game is the load times.  They are WAY too long. Loading up your profile is an inconvience, loading up to play the game gets annoying and when you finish a game and go to save, you start to think "F*ck this".  The loading time alone will kill the feeling of wanting to play.Then there is the gameplay itself.  Bone crushing hits?  Please, outside of the occasional dirty hit (which is far easier for the computer to employ on you, than vice versa) the hits look like the early developments of Madden.  The plays are fairly easy until you get to the 4th quater when it seems that everytime the computer magically can score 21 points no matter what defensive strategies you employ.  Then there is the whole steriods issue which is laughable.  Give a player some juice and he misses 3 plays.....conventionally treat him and he misses a quater.  Either way, you'll never miss him.This game is horrible, from the graphics to the load times.  Save your money and go buy a game that will at least remotely capture your interest</review_text>
This game was a really big disappointment for me.  I had to try this game because of all the hype and all the reviews here.  Having played the Nintendo 64 game titled Mario Kart 64 I felt like it was not much of an improvement.  In fact, I feel that Mario Kart 64 was a better game.  The only improvement was in the graphics.  Still, why do the characters not have fingers?  In this stage of the game you would think that they would have fingers by now.  Anyway, after I played the game I played a bit cheated.  I was bored by it within ten minutes.  The game is supposed to shine with multiplayer but it fizzled.  There are so many GameCube racing games out there that are so much better than this game at a much lower price.  One example of a better combat racing game is Burnout.  If you can get any one of the games in this series you will see what a good combat racing game feels like.  I feel that Mario Kart Double Dash!! is a dumbed down version of Mario Kart 64.  I so much wanted it to be a great game.  It no longer has the hopping ability of the previous game.  For me it just wasn't very good.  Double Dash!! probably would be better for very young gamers as they would probably be more forgiving of its shortcomings</review_text>
This game came highly recommended by people who generally have similar taste in games as me, but I'm still trying to figure out why.There's no question that the in-game graphics are impressive and the story-line is interesting. However the gameplay is nearly non-existant, and when you do happen to participate in some of the action the controls are either badly executed or unnecessarily complicated (i.e. the sphere grid or blitzball). Even the story is often poorly told, with stilted voices and hilariously bad character animation.If I had to compare this game to some of Squaresoft's other efforts, it is similar to a mix between Final Fantasy 8 and Chrono Cross. But while those two games were generally frowned upon by RPG enthusiasts, Final Fantsy X has recieved almost universal praise. In short, I'm not so much disappointed with the game as I am baffled by its warm reception.</review_text>
I bought this game on a whim, having really liked Need For Speed: Hot Pursuit 2. This game needs help. First of all, the frame rate is lower than it should be. There is slow-down as well. Even the game before this, Need For Speed: Underground 2 looked 100 times better. The car models in Most Wanted are a touch nicer-looking and there is a far better selection than Underground 2, but that's the only plus this game has to it. You don't race as much as fly around the city in a barely-controlled frenzy, trying to stay ahead of the computer cars. Winning is more by luck than skill. He or she who hits the least obstacles wins. Hardly an enjoyable way to race! I get too stressed when playing this game, so I put it away for a while. Definitely rent before buying this game.</review_text>
I started with Caesar2 back when it came out. I played it for hours and hours and loved it. When Caesar3 came out I bought that too and loved it even more and spent even more time playing. Both Caesar2 and 3 rarely crashed. Things have changed!I'm spending more and more of my time restarting Caesar4 than I am playing it. About 8 out of 10 times that I access the area where you trade with other cities it crashes. Without trading, you make little money and the game is essentially over.Other problems I'm seeing is overall performance. I don't have the fastest machine (AMD 2.1ghz, 512ram, rockin' video card with 256meg of mem) but there are irritating 1 second delays in addition to the crashes. I find the whole game to be difficult to use. This was not the case with Caesar3.Unless they issue a patch, I'm done feel frustrated with crashes. Maybe I can dumb down the graphic setting to get rid of the delays.My suggestion? Wait for a patch before buying --- or move on.- jason</review_text>
Well, it sounds like a great game, but after five hours of upgrading and downloading all of the specified programs and upgrades, I couldn't get the video to work at all, couldn't get technical support at all, and I gave up and have returned it to the manufacturer. a great disappointment because i love and still play the previous versions</review_text>
As others have said, this was a much-anticipated game. I played Caesar II and III and was extremely excited when I heard that IV was coming out.What a letdown!I didn't have any of the installation errors that others have mentioned, and I haven't had the game crash on me. However, the game is unplayable on my system - which is only a year old - unless I turn down 90% of the advanced graphics. By "unplayable", I mean ten seconds or more of waiting between the time you click with your mouse, and when the game responds. Even with the graphics turned down, I still get lag when the auto-save starts. As mouse-control is essential when building roads or aquaducts, this is aggravating in the extreme.It appears that Sierra's programmers and designers put a lot of work into upgrading the graphics. Too bad I can't see them!The interface is horrible and takes up the right half of the screen at 1280x1024 resolution. This means that you must rotate the map to build along the right edge. I much prefer the "tabbed" building interface of the other city-building games.Although you can build roads along the diagonals in this game - which you couldn't in earlier versions - the interface is not smart enough to auto-rotate the buildings to fit along the roads. You have to click and drag to rotate buildings, and lag - even at the low graphics settings - can make this an exercise in frustration.I dislike the new warehouse management panel. The sliders might look cool, but they're slow (lag!). I would've liked to see additional options for "only store basic goods", "only store luxury goods", etc. This would take some of the pain out of managing them. Trade ports are different also - you can't see prices!It appears that some of the scenarios have hidden milestones that you have to meet in order to advance. In the one I'm playing right now, I'm stuck because my prosperity rating will not rise above 36 (50 required to win). I have over 30,000 denarii in my treasury, and have been turning a hefty profit (and meeting various demands from Rome) for at least eight years of game-time. I have met and exceeded all other requirements for victory, but prosperity continues to elude me. My city is almost completely automated by now - the only thing I do is respond to Rome's requests for goods or cash. My advisors have nothing helpful to say. It's not fun if I can't advance.So while the game is pretty - from what I can see of it - it's got too many frustrations to be worth much more of my time</review_text>
First thing-the graphics are far prettier than any of the current 3 Caesar games out there.  Having said that-this game had a major bug right at the release.  How is that possible?  Is it unreasonable to expect a U.S. company to produce a flawless product?  Probably not, but Tilted Mill has some of the the best pros in the industry.  Basic bugs killed any enjoyment for me and the scenario editor is an unworkable mess. The advice offered by the techno weenies on the forums are beyond comprehension of the average consumer.Far better to go with CivCity 3</review_text>
This one turned out badly and I hate to say I bought it.  Buggy worse than normal, it is a rough game.  The fact that another patch is not yet available is terrible. The support site blames your system or card but offers no practical solutions. Too bad. I trusted PC Gamer's review and it is the first time they let me down but they have adapted more of a partnership with the game companies now and a liberal grading program that passes more stinkers. Do not buy this game...even when working it is not but a bargain bin game</review_text>
she is just right for me i know im a little to hot for her but i think wed make hollywoods cuttist couple</review_text>
Please Sid -- with the dissapointment of CivIV, and now Railroads, say you haven't jumped on the "easy" bandwagon like so many other game designers.Sid -- the reason we purchase these games is because YOUR name is on them. This game seems like it was made for a 12 year old, not someone who's grown up with the complexities you normally build into your games.Please -- the next game you release, make sure it lives up to the standards YOU created. After this, just throwing your name on a game no longer means you will print some money for your bank account</review_text>
This game is in such a sorry state that I don't even know where to begin.First of all, this is not at all what I expected and what I wanted. Sid is known for very complex simulations and I preordered this game only because I saw his name as the game designer. Alas, the game is the most dumbed down train simulation I had ever seen. Looks like Sid jumped in the "easy, fast and easy" bandwagon.Second, the game is, at best, barely out of beta - a little more useful and less destructive than, say, a computer virus. I experience frequent crashes and the AI often builds ridiculous tracks.Finally, be aware that the game has one of the worst copy protection systems I had ever seen, which interferes with other applications. For instance, the game won't launch while I run Skype.Selling a game in such an unfinished state shows lack of ethics and disrespect for the customer. Shame on you, Firaxis and Sid Meier.</review_text>
I waited months for this game to come out. I can't add anymore than what has been said by others. I wonder how "hands on" Sid was with it. Could be a long time before any great train game will be coming out, if ever</review_text>
Sid Meier's reputation was unblemished after the Civil War series, Civilization and the original releases of Railroad Tycoon. But this game release is a major setback that will make me hesitate about any future products carrying his name.This is a major derailment. It is the fastest that I have ever firmly known that a new game was being removed from my hard drive. Take a look at how many used copies are already flooding the market and this game just released less than two weeks ago.Every aspect is made into chewing gum where you were used to having steak. There is no expansion, tweak, or update that can fix how seriously dumbed down this version is</review_text>
This so called game has a very good story and plot. It keeps your attention, by making you want to see what happens next. However, the gameplay could not satisfy an 8 year old. Why you ask? Because there is none. You watch 15 minutes of cinematics and then are pretty much told what you have to do. There is really not much thought needed since you are pretty much led directly to where you have to be or the object you need. Oooooh. there are multple endings. Whoopee! You still have to sit through a majority of the same cinematics and virtually do nothing. Out of the 5 or 6 hours spent playing this game through the first time, I would estimate that I only needed the controller in my hand for 30 minutes. This makes for a good movie but don't buy it if you actually like to PLAY your games instead of watch them</review_text>
ok, most people have more then one system, i have a PS2 which plays copies, and the 360, hmmmmmmmmmm should i pay so much money for the 360 version????????? or should i go for the free copy i can download for the PS2?some people might say better graphics..hmmmmmmmmmm. dont care and many don</review_text>
Easy...Boring...Bugs, bugs, bugs, glitches, glitches, glitches...Question??? Is this a new game, or possible bonus maps from CoD2 that they decided to make into a new game to profit more money????  Hmmmm???The positive?? You can cook your grenades now. I like mine medium rare... Possibly useful in online matches, as apposed to CoD2 where you couldn't and it was point less to throw a grenade in online matches because you knew where it was and could just move. But I will never know, because I "thankfully" rented the damn thing, and didn't buy it. Wait, I didn't my dad did, on a free rental from Blockbuster. So they didn't get any of my hardly earned money. Good for me...Also could anyone tell me why I kept getting stuck on walls, tanks, people, just about everything. I think I was stuck in the air... If you like this game, you need to get the F**k out, and buy something else to play, that I have so I can meet up with you and beat you... Also, if you don't like my run on sentences you can.... Yep you guess it... Get the f**k out.</review_text>
Seriously....I was waiting quite awhile for this game to come out because its predecessor is freakin sweet.  It was all I use to play online.  After purchasing this game and playing it for all of 10 minutes I quietly put it back in the box and have not taken it out since.  Online play was non existent.  Everytime i clicked on a game it said it didnt exist.  It was ridiculus.  Letting someone else create this game instead of Infinity Ward was a giant mistake.  This latest edition adds nothing to the series.  Do not purchase this game....there are many better games out there</review_text>
I had such high expectations for this game just to have them shot down. The single player game is fine with some dumb things with the enemy AI. The muliplayer is a joke! Well first you have to get online which is basically impossiable. The Multiplayer which was the best part of 2 is totally stupid and WORTHLESS in 3. One you can play by yourself. Sounds like fun right? two you have to drive the tank unless you are the second person to the tank but you cant just use the machine gun which u can in the other vehciles stupid. Three there are some stupid errors in a bunch of levels where you can get stuck and have to respawn yourself. i say rent it before you buy it</review_text>
My friends and I had high hopes for this game.  We played COD2 multiplayer every week and were excited about a new shooter.  After playing COD3 for a few rounds we  decided to put 2 back in.  The graphics are great, but we found a lot of bugs.  There were some shading problems with the helmets that made them turn white at a certain distance.  That's fine if you want to be a UN soldier, but not if you're trying to sneak up on somebody.  Muzzle flashes were almost none existent.  No blood splash like in COD2.  The single player game isn't too bad so far, but if you plan on multiplayer I would recommend renting it first.  We were of the opinion that the game was rushed, maybe they'll patch it</review_text>
This extension cable did not work with my standard Microsoft S Controller.  Unless you still use the old monster-sized XBox controller, these cables are worthless</review_text>
This game was originally released for 10 dollars. Almost everything about it is pulled straight from Diablo and is not quite as good. Though this game has a few things about it that are interesting, and can be enjoyable to some people, I would just skip this game and go for Diablo 2</review_text>
Tediously long and weary. Nothing interesting, just a lot of borrowed ideas from RTCW, HL2, etc. I am sick of this</review_text>
Beautiful graphics and nice storyline, but the amount of times the game freezes or you receive an error is just awful! Not to mention, the monsters level up with you so you'll never be at an advantage. You could pretty much beat the game at level 5</review_text>
I bought the game couple of weeks ago. I was hesitating on buying it initially, but finally I did because of all the good hype about the game. I wish I didn't buy it.To be fair, I have to admit that the game has astonishing landscape, cities and the level of details in the game. I don't think I have ever seen suhc creativity and perfectness in earlier games. I am sure that are lot of people that will find such features enaough for them to adore the game.For me, landscape is not enough since the largest downside is the story, if there is any story, "from my perspective". I have abandoned playing after closing the 4th or 5th Oblivion gate. I don't see any excitment in playing the game any further. I explored most of the cities though, quite quickly. The conversation looks silly that every time the camre will zoom in to the person you are chating with. It was nice the first couple of times but then ....I am waiting for my sweet gothic3 to go out. Honestly I would prefer playing Gothic1 on playing oblivion. Just to tell you about the action/excitment I am talking about, I would like to say that when I got gothic2 I played for almost 36 hours straight no food no sleep just drink water and play play and lots of play.</review_text>
I bought this adaptor because my kids and I have both the Nintendo DS and DS Lite. It works great on the original DS, but the thing that's supposed to fit into the DS Lite is too wide. If you're looking for an adaptor for just the regular DS, this one works great. If for the DS Lite, don't waste your money</review_text>
Really? Wow. So, players in real football go through other players torso's? They skate and glide around the field at 40MPH without moving their legs? WR's change direction on one foot, pivot, glide and elude tackles? Uh, ok.Anyone who plays this game on the All-madden level will notice right away that this is the furthest thing from a realistic football game.What are the nerds at EA thinking? Do they ENJOY making a game who's AI constantly cheats? I love how they tout games that "give the user more control" when the user has very LITTLE CONTROL over anything that goes on in the game. I don't control if I catch it or drop it, or intercept it, or if my line blocks, of if my DB's cover their assignment...none of it. The COMPUTER makes my line miss blocks or not block at all...drop easy picks...drop easy catches, etc. And why, oh why, are DT's and LB's faster than my fastest WR? Is THAT realistic? The AI is terrible. It blatantly and UNrealistically cheats.Terrible game. Just stop making these games if this is your final product</review_text>
I bought the piece of junk from Amazon and I regret the day I started using Amazon. The machine did not work and the customer service of Amazon was the worst I have ever experienced. I will never ever shop Amazon again.</review_text>
I don't even have to explain the worst bait and switch tatic I have ever seen...  [...]  HORRIBLE HORRIBLE HORRIBLE HORRIBLE HORRIBLE HORRIBLE HORRIBLE HORRIBLE HORRIBLE AMAZON BAIT AND SWITCH.. [...]... I will never shop on AMAZON AGAIN</review_text>
I'll cut to the chase on this one. If you are a fan of Final Fantasy VII, you will look over the shortcomings of this game and find some enjoyment out of it. It has a good story and characters. Its fun to see some of your favorite characters from VII return. But if your not a FF fan, then you won't have much motivation to play this game, and I'm not sure why you would like it. Its very average to mediocre as a action game. Its not horrible by any means, but its just not very good either.Honestly, this game could have just been so much better, in just about every aspect. Gameplay wise, there is nothing unique or interesting about it, and I was just trying to blow through it too get to the next story part. Its also pretty easy and not very challenging. I can't really complain about the environments your fighting through tho, they are well done and some are very well done in my book.While the story is easily the strongest part of the game, its not without faults either. It's pacing isn't very good, and some of it doesn't make a whole lot of sense either. But it's kept alive by a strong cast of characters, and some amazing FMV's in typical square fashion. But the story could of been much better as well. I'm not complaining, because it is good and gives you a good backstory of Vincent, but it could of been better if it had been longer. It just feels rushed, and suffers because of that. I finished the game at about 11 hours. If it had been longer and closer to 20 hours they really could of done some special things with the story, and developed the villians more.Bottom line, if your a FF fan, you'll probably enjoy it</review_text>
As was said in a earlier review the creators of final fantasy are giving us everything but what we actually asked for.  They gave us Advent Children, cell phone games, and finally Dirge of Cerberus.  This game is an action based game showing you a day in the life of the most under-used and least interesting character in the Final Fantasy Series.  Its the creators way of telling us that they will never re-make Final Fantasy VII but will rather insult us with every marketing ploy know to man</review_text>
I can't believe how many people are saying how "realistic" this game is.  That can not be further from the truth.  All the CPU does is lob the ball down field on 3rd and long plays and the receiver catches it 80% of the time regardless of coverage.  What fun is that?  This in itself is highly unrealistic.  Don't even get me started on the other things this game does. NCAA 2006 is nothing but an arcade game, realism is thrown out the window in this one.  EA does not know the meaning of AI.  The only difference between the levels is the amount of cheating the CPU does.Don't waste your money, and don't make EA any more richer, its obvious they just throw these games together.  They just take our money and laugh all the way to the bank.</review_text>
I really tried to like this game, being that EA chickened out and bought their way out of competition.The graphics and sound are great in this game, but its ruined by EA's cheating AI. I have never seen a game cheat this much in my life. No matter what play you call the defense always knows what you are calling, even if you think you have them beat on a play, your receiver will purposely drop a wide open pass or better yet the defender turns on his nitrous oxide that was installed in his uniform and cover half the field in 2 seconds to deflect a pass. If you throw a high pass, not to worry the lineman has installed jet packs which allows them to jump 10 feet in the air and deflect or pick off your pass. If the CPU wants you to lose you will lose no matter what you do.If you QB is going back for a pass and a lineman is 3 feet away from you, even if you press the passing button, your QB will just stand there so he can take a sack. This game is total BS, there is no way to get off passes in heavy pressure becuase the game forces you into a tackle animation.When you are playing defense, you are better off putting down your controller and clipping your nails or flossing your teeth while the CPU pulls of BS miracle plays on every single down. Remember how I said your receivers will purposely drop wide open passes? Not the CPU receivers, the CPU receivers, regardless of their rating can catch passes in double and triple coverage every time. if they don't catch it, the ball just gets tipped over and over again until he can catch it. Think you stopped a 3rd down conversion? Think again, you will get flagged for pass interference or a face mask penatly. And remember about your QB being forced into a tackle animation? Not the CPU, the CPU can get of 60 yard spirals while he's being hit!What about the inconsistency you ask? Well let me explain. How is it that one game you can be totally on, but the next game, you can't even complete ONE pass! I'll tell you why. The CPU wants you to lose, so you will drop every pass, fumble every run and get called for every penalty in the book. I was playing a game, and managed to run back a punt and KR for a TD, before my offense even touched the field. Then all of a sudden the CPU turned on its God Mode and every thing went right for the CPU. BS lobs, BS runs and BS calls. I did not complete ONE SINGLE pass in the entire first half. Its not because the CPU was playing good defense, its because my receivers dropped every ball that was thrown to them, wide open or not. I ended up only completing one pass in the entire game, 1 for 20 I think. At this point, I knew I had no chance of winning, so I just started punting the ball on first down to avoid any more frustration. My so called impact RB only got 2 yards on 20 rushes, and my so called impact CB gave up 3 TD passes to a below average receiver. What is the point of playing if you are not even given a chance to win?Yes you can win games as I have, but it is so inconsistent. If the CPU wants you to lose you will lose, nothing you can do about it.I see why EA bought the license, after putting out crap like this, they were sure to lose a lot of customers to a game that knows how to develop better AI, instead of this cheating crap. I am taking this game to the store for store credit and I am done with EA for good. EA sucks and so does this game</review_text>
If you need a remote to turn on the tele and run the 360, this will do.  But it won't operate a DVR, DVD, VCR or cable box.  If you're really keen on it, I'll sell you mine.</review_text>
No way to change the inputs on your TV.The DVD functions and the TV functions are accessed alternatly by pressing a "tv" button but there is no way to tell which the romote is aligned to. Therefore when you press the power button you have no idea which you will be powering on/off, the TV or the XBox. And if things couldn't get any dumber, if you press the eject button while the remote is in TV mode it doesn't work. The eject button is only designed to work with the XBox yet it is disabled when in TV mode?There is also no option to program a receiver.As many others mentioned, this remote looks nice but the people who designed it must have been drunk. Do not buy this remote unless you like wasting your money on garbage</review_text>
Try before you buy! This game has a major glitch: its save game files are erased sometimes, so you can start all over again.Beware</review_text>
First, let me say that I whole-hearedly agree with the review by Tiberius. Back in the glory days of Counter-Strike (2001-2002), this game was the be-all end-all for 1) Online video games, 2) First-Person Shooters, 3) PC Games, and 4) Any video game basically. It had real-life weapons, the graphics were superb at the time, the maps were extremely well-made, the system requirements are still obscenely low, and damnit it was fun. Then, inevitabely, the hands of time began to take their ruthless, indiscriminate toll. Video cards supported better graphics, new (and yes, better!) games came out (Battlefield 1942, Unreal Tournament 2004), hacking became the unmistakable poison of Counter-Strike, and a lot of the cool, casual gamers grew up or moved on. From 2000 to 2004, Counter-Strike went from an utter joy to a sensation to a fading diamond to a nuisance. By 2004 to present day, it has become a problem. Great games and great game developers are losing tons of money because people are still playing this game after five years on their mom's worn-out 640 Megahertz Pentium III PCs running Windows 98. Counter-Strike is still one of the most popular games of all-time, with a ridiculous number of people playing it on average a day, because people just don't seem to have enough self-control to give up their hopeless addiction.Today, server admins are, for the most part, humorless dictators, and will not stand for anything that deviates from this game's undeniable, monotonous drone. People are still playing the same maps from the 1.0 release, that have completely lost all their zest and initial potential. It always feels as if I've played the same round a thousand times before, and I probably have. Even the custom maps are sickening in their monotony. fy_iceworld is fun for 3 consecutive seconds. Many other popular custom maps in heavy server rotation are the same way, and all look disguisting. I've played on probably over 500 servers, and downloaded probably over the same amount of *quality* custom maps, and not more than 3 have I ever seen a server run in its rotation, or voted on by the players. Furthermore, people are still playing the game using dial-up, and CS veterans are always complaining about camping, even if its a tactic used to complete the objective. As far as the objectives are concerned, Counter-Strike has basically become a deathmatch game. No one will listen to anyone's plan (on the rare occasion there is one), no one tries to rescue the hostages, and everyone always calls someone a "p***y" or "nub" if you use the auto shotgun or AWP. And to top it all off, Valve cancelled the outstanding won.net and replaced it with this Steam garbage, a utility soaking wet with incompetence.L337 Speak has also gained mass popularity to the jaded Counter-Strike culture, and has become its own incessant frustration. But I won't even get into that. If you're new to CS, don't bother, veterans of this game are far from friendly, and you'll probably get called a bunch of names involving lots of zeroes and threes if you're a beginner. For now, if you want to indulge yourself in a great online game, check out World of Warcraft, Battlefield 1942, Sven Co-Op, or even Team Fortress Classic (a dated game with an *awesome* community that has yet to lose its initial charm)</review_text>
I'll make this short and sweet for you.  I went to a cyber cafe so I can play this "gem" and see what all the fuss is about on this game.  OVERRATED.  I have no idea how people prais this as "THE BEST GAME IN THE WORLD!!"...How silly, This game is just plain average..  If you wanna play a nice Game from Valve..I don't need to tell you but I'll give you a hint....H***f L*fe...This game is just pure garbage and the Online is boring...And I don't need your flaming or bashing just cause One mans opinion differs from yours..The goodVisuals are good I guessBadVery MediocerPlain boring combat...Nothing newOnline isn't that greatExtreamly Overrated...TRUST ME..Gets boring after awhileAnd yes I played this out for more then an 1hour...2 bucks I'll never get back2.1 out of 5 stars....  Extreamly Overrated, Not worth my 2 bucks, and that's all I got to say....Peac</review_text>
why is it that 3rd party memory cards can store at least double the information that these can? These memory cards are way over priced.I love PS2. It's one of the best systems I have ever played and owned, but this memory card stuff is a scam. I already own 2 cards and I need more.</review_text>
Before I was even done with Final Fantasy VII, I ordered this game. I loved that game, and thought 'Say, if Final Fantasy VII is this good, then VIII must be even better!', boy was I wrong! I'm not bashing Final Fantasy VIII, I kind of liked the game, but there are big problems with it. First of all, the draw system is kind of hard, but I liked it, it was a change of pace, but the way you have to equip summon GFs (Guardian Force) was hard and boring. The music in the game reminds me of the music in the movie 'AKIRA', which is a bad thing, The characters in battle remind me of crash dummies, and the way that you get new weapons is by making them at junk shops! Not only that, but the characters are not very likeable.Main characters:Squall- A member of SeeD, he is a jerk to everybody.Zell-A member of SeeD, he is a surfer dude and a dunce.Quistis-A teacher and a member of SeeD, she seems to like Squall...for one reason or another...Seifer- Squall's rival, he is even worse then Squall.Rinoa- A member of 'The owls',Square soft ran out of ideas, she is just like Aeris.Selphie- A member of SeeD, she is a weird character and I was sad to see her in Kingdom hearts.Laguna- A Galbadian soldier. He is the best charecter in the game.Irvine-A member of SeeD, he is a lady's man and is recycled later in Final Fantasy IX as a better charecter known as Zidane.This game is the second worst Final Fantasy game ever made. The story is great, but playing it is so bad that its almost unbelivable. If Square soft remade this game for the PS2 or PSP, I would buy it, but only if they removed the draw system</review_text>
I bought the piece of junk from Amazon and I regret the day I started using Amazon. The machine did not work and the customer service of Amazon was the worst I have ever experienced. I will never ever shop Amazon again.</review_text>
If you are looking for an XBOX vertsion of another chapter in MechWarrior series, this ISN'T it. This is an extemely dumbed-down version of MW. Even if you (Mechwarrior fans) forget about having no customization, remember this: You can only fire one weapon at at time. You have to cycle between lazers, cannons and rockets. I was bored after about 5 minutes.Again, people who never played MW series may like this game better</review_text>
As the opening cutscene introduces you to Blinx the cat, the supporting cast and the particulars of his upcoming adventures, I found myself trying to wrap my brain around the basic premise of the story. The idea is that a secret, off-world clan of humanoid cat creatures, armed with souped up vacuum cleaners, are responsible for the development and dispersal of time itself to every known plane of existence on the map. It seems that time, when compressed tightly enough to be transported by said cats, takes the form of one of five different brightly-colored shapes. If these crystals are left out on the open for too long without being properly introduced to the flow of things, they turn into monsters. I could go on, because the game certainly doesn't stop there, but I think you get the point.I like to think that there's a fairly thick line drawn between cartoony fantasy and super-detailed realism. Generally, a lot of the physics and environmental details are taken for granted in a realistic game, because they're almost exclusively set in a photorealistic, lifelike location. Cartoons, on the other hand, generally don't worry themselves with the particulars and are primarily concerned with delivering a good time. How much fun would the Wile E. Coyote cartoons be if every time the lead character suffered a grisly fate, it strictly obeyed the laws of gravity and aerodynamics? Blinx tries to straddle that thick line by delivering a story that's overly detail-centric in an environment that's right out of a kid's show. The result is a tale that comes off as way, WAY out of left field and almost completely abstract. It focuses on things that would be better left to the viewer's imagination and ignores the importance of a good underlying story along the way.Beneath the needless discussions of why there are monsters in the world, how time compression works and how cats are actually responsible for all that we hold dear, the actual plot is almost laughably straightforward and generic. There's a princess, evil pigs have kidnapped her, and it's up to you and you only to rescue her and save her world. That's it, no side-stories, no reasoning, no subplots - just a straightforward rush from Point A to Point B. And here I thought the phrase "save the princess" was universally recognized as an ages-old cliche.Now, I don't want it to sound like I'm railing on this game just because it's got a few more nitpicky details than its peers and it reuses an old phrase from way back in the platformer handbook as its sole driving factor. It's also completely lacking in character development, general storytelling and ongoing inspiration. None of the characters in Blinx really establish themselves as individuals, including the lead character himself. You don't hate the pig on the spaceship because he's trying to destroy the world, you hate him because every time he shows up he tries to steal your money. I honestly forgot there was a princess at the end of the game after level three, because she's never mentioned between the game's start and its finish. I mean, the very first Super Mario Brothers at least reminded you that the princess was in another castle at the end of every boss fight.I don't honestly think the game was really designed to be enjoyable so much as it was geared to be overly challenging. The first level and a half are set up in the standard "get to know you" format, with the simplest of enemies, the most routine of stage layouts and plenty of opportunities to mess around with your tools. Shortly thereafter, you're thrown to the wolves. For the most part, the level designs are very short, with more of an emphasis on cheap hits than on complexity and true challenge. I noticed a lot of overlap in the stage layouts, whether it's retracing your steps time and time again or walking along a catwalk (har har) above the beginning of the stage and invariably plummeting back to the start point. You'll almost always know what needs to be done, but actually accomplishing that act is the real trick. I just can't overemphasize how unbearably cheap most of this game really is. If there's a bottomless pit nearby, (and chances are very good that there is) Blinx will find a way to force himself into it, regardless of what you're hitting on the control pad. If there's an enemy two feet in front of you and you hit the attack button, he'll aim at a random switch on the other side of the room, rather than the imminent threat.That's not to say that the entirety of The Time Sweeper is totally without merit, because it does bring a few fresh ideas to the table, but for the most part those insights are hampered by their surroundings. The ability to control time, for instance, was at the time a really fresh, interesting new play mechanic and still stands out today, despite the limited field of imitators that have since emerged. You can rewind a few seconds to catch an enemy unaware or rebuild a crumbling bridge, pause the action and take advantage of the frozen time, knock the level into slow motion, etc. All the while, Blinx is moving around in real time. It's a great idea, but the implementation is painfully short and underutilized. Why can't I use two controls at the same time? Why don't more aspects of the stage encourage the player to experiment with and solve problems with these powers? Why doesn't the ridiculous ten minute stage time limit pause, speed up or rewind when I use my time powers? Why is their duration so brief, and why can't I hold more than a dozen uses at a time? I mean, this could've really been a fantastic experience if the time control aspect had been beefed up a little further and treated as more than just an auxiliary function of an otherwise run-of-the-mill platformer.The controls, too, are an undeveloped, undertested nightmare. Blinx himself is often sluggish to respond, especially when implementing his time controls. He has difficulty making a precise turn, whether on midair or on solid ground. He stops to briefly celebrate when gaining an item, which leaves him open to constant enemy attacks. He routinely moves in the direction of certain death, as though pulled by a magnetic field, whether you've instructed him to do so or not. He'll occasionally refuse to perform a double jump, particularly when attempting a difficult, precise leap across a gaping chasm.I think it's these controls that most make Blinx so mind-squashingly aggravating. At a glance, you'd imagine they'd be fairly difficult to screw up. You've got a jump button, a suction / fire button, a time control button and an analog stick to control movement. Plus, there had already been a long, established line of three-dimensional platformers on the market in the years before the title's release, paving the way to an ideal control experience. Super Mario 64 had its issues, sure, but nothing like this, and it was the trailblazer for the entire genre's jump to the world of 3D. It's like they had a map leading them right to the treasure and decided to forge their own path anyway.I can't even say I'm impressed by the graphics showcased throughout The Time Sweeper, either. With the exception of the lead character himsef, these are some incredibly cheesy, preschoolish character designs - they feel unfinished and hurried, less purposeful than you'd imagine (especially in contrast with Blinx himself). Particularly insulting is the large population of simple blobs that roam around the levels, trying in vain to bump into you and cause a fatal injury. Here's a finely detailed main character, with such close attention paid to his wardrobe that even the gloss of his shoes was obviously debated time and time again, and he's pitted against a set of monsters that could've sprung to life directly out of the pages of a four-year-old's sketchbook.Despite featuring a spoken dialog track, there's no English voice acting. I couldn't pinpoint the language, but my wife seems to think it's either French or some close variation of it. It certainly didn't sound Japanese. While this does add a touch of personality to the title, and it's not every day that you get a chance to hear a cat shouting something in the language of love, it all seemed really odd and out of place coming out of my television. Everyone's vocal personalities are so black-and-white, too, that I feel like a great chance to establish some much-needed individuality amongst the cast was lost once again here. The bad guys all have the same deep, gravelly, transparently evil tone, while the good guys are all bright, cheery, squeaky and high-pitched like the monkeys in Super Monkey Ball. It's like a parody of the games that had come before, but I won't give the developers enough credit to assume that they were doing it on purpose.Overall, Blinx is really just a few promising concepts thrown together in one package, strapped to the shell of a far-below-average third person platformer and unleashed upon an unsuspecting public. At the time of its release, it was still in need of a lot of polishing, some serious scrutiny behind closed doors and a re-evaluation of just how far some of these concepts and half-hearted character designs could be conceivably stretched without losing any quality. On top of that, I really don't know which audience they were targeting with it. The game is ridiculously difficult, which betrays the childlike demeanor that surrounds it and leads me to believe it was meant for the serious gamers out there, but so bright, kid-friendly and annoyingly cutesy that I can't imagine anyone in that demographic rushing out to the stores on release day. The number of spontaneous controller hurls shot through the roof during my time with Blinx, reaching near-Marvel vs. Capcom 2 levels with its unashamed, excruciatingly cheap hits, especially in later levels. I have no idea how I acquired the willpower to finish level eight.The game is adequately lengthy, and offers some replay value, with hidden cat medals in each stage eventually unlocking production sketches, promotional materials and the like. Once you start hunting for floating cat heads in those super-tough later levels, though, you'll remember why you were so happy to be finished with them in the first place. Unless you feel like pulling your hair out in clumps (I shaved my head after the experience as a part of the cleansing process) and enjoy self-mutilation, I'd recommend you stay far away</review_text>
I hate this game its the worst game I've ever played</review_text>
I was so excited to see this game come out- I loved the Godfather, and From Russia with Love, and the hype surrounding this game was incredible.  The actual game, however, was incredibly disappointing.  The driving controls, especially compared to the driving controls in The Godfather, are AWFUL.  I was having so much trouble driving I kept looking through the handbook to see if I was doing something wrong, but from what I saw I was using the controller the way I was supposed to.  Most of the missions involve driving, under a specific time limit, and with these awful controls, I gave up early- way too frustrating.  The musical play list that you get to control was fun, but I would have liked more free-roaming like in the Godfather.  I was also looking forward to hearing everyone's voices that were in the opening credits- Dale Earnhardt Jr???  But since I have almost totally given up on it now, I guess I won't get to hear their voice acting talent.  Does anyone know if they plan to re-release this on the xbox 360?  Maybe some of the control issues could be worked out before then.  This game had so much potential that right now it is not living up to</review_text>
Every year there has to be a game adapted from a classic movie or based on a classic movie (From Russia With Love, which is actually not a bad game.). Recentlty just landing my hands on a copy of this, I simply couldn't resist picking up SCARFACE: THE WORLD IS YOURS. I loved the movie SCAR FACE, and I was gonna love this.But It turns out I didn't.The controls are really a joke, instead of your normal FPS/3PS/RPG etcetera, there are really bland controls you can't even tell what to do. The dialouge is corny, and everything else is a joke.For die-hard fans only, I guess</review_text>
This game has a good concept, nice graphics, and some definitely funny moments, but the gameplay is a total bore.There are two main gameplay styles: "investigation" and "trial". Investigation is the worst; it involves nothing more than checking everything in a room, talking to everyone, and a ton of pointless reading, much like an old point-and-click adventure on PC.The court sections are a little better, but not much. Once again, it's very linear; you don't have to use your brain much, just try all the options. And once again, there is a huge amount of reading. There is way too much dialogue packed into the game, and not near enough actual gameplay. And most of the talking is aimless, too; very little of it actually advances the plot.Overall, this game just tried way too hard to have good plot and characters, and left the player with little more to do than click on objects and scroll through text</review_text>
My nephew really needed a new controller.  So I ordered this along with a game for his birthday.  The game was received fine, but he never received the controller.  I finally got notification of shipping delay several weeks later.  Yet the controller still listed as ships within 24 hours on Amazon.  The delays kept coming and eventually it just turned into a cancelled order by Amazon.So the 1 star is for the service, the delay, and the lack of full explanation.  Who knows, the controller could have been wonderful??</review_text>
The Playstation controller is nice. However the Nintendo 64 user would remember that the N64 controller was just a snazzy, maybe even more so. The XBOX controller is like a brick when compared to both. The PS2 delivered on a vibrating Dual Shock controller as standard with the unit. This controller feels great with the thumb pads / thumb sticks allowing for all sorts of movement. Suddenly in 2005, four years after the PS2 was released, games like Metal Gear Solid III: Snake Eater and God of War improve on this thumb pad function with the new mini-games feature. The controller has been given new life because of this.The big negative is the problem that Sony PS2 controllers are extremely poor quality. This controller, for all its design, will give you a dual shock. First of all you will be shocked at how suddenly they break. Drop it on the floor and you will easily damage the L1, L2 or R1, R2 wing buttons. Even if you don't drop it the wing buttons will usually break in less than a year if you enjoy gaming. The next shock is going through so many of these controllers because of this design flaw. Adding up the cost of each controller I could easily have bought myself another PS2 and then some more. The cord also has an uncanny ability to just wrap around itself and kink. I have never seen one that managed to remain straight. Also when a button breaks it tends to release little pieces into the controller so even if you don't need that button for the game the controller feels like it has sand rolling around inside of it.For all its handheld conditioning the controller is far from robust. I have used a very similar Logitech Cordless Rumblepad 2 for the PC that is the same design as the PS2 controller and that is a proper robust model. Just comparing the two side by side makes the PS2 controller look like it was developed in the USSR in the early 80s or something. The fact that Sony have done absolutely nothing to improve on the quality of their own generic PS2 controller is probably the reason why they have made so much money out of the PS2 unit. It is a way too expensive even if the controller was more robust. I hope Sony get it right with the PS3 next time. Make these controllers more robust please. The PS2 controller was always far from a quality device since its inception and is the only item that let the PS2 down badly</review_text>
You get a few outfits and some new furniture but not a lot.  With all of the free stuff out there to download for The Sims, the Stuff Pack is not very worth it.  Maxi is just milking the franchise for every penny</review_text>
I noticed there were not many new items in this game, I found this the advertising for this game to be deceiving.  This expansion ws not worth the money</review_text>
Downloading objects from fan sites can be hit or miss -- I have had many collections I've downloaded work incorrectly or not work at all in the next expansion pack, and items I really liked were suddenly unavailable.  So, I was looking forward to a "Stuff" pack from Maxis.Bah.  Yes, there are several very nice items, but really, this is an underwhelming collection on the whole.  Items are very limited and the collections are small.  The pictures you see on the cover are a good portion of what is contained.  Like so many here remarked, the money spent is not equal to the value received.  Another reviewer pointed out what the title "Glamour Life" implies -- jewelry, house items, luxurious textures for floors and walls, and clothing for all ages, and most of all, excess and abundance.  There's no abundance here.  I've found items I like, but I am not impressed with the collection.Maxis knows that its target audience is always hungry for new items, and I think it is taking advantage of the fact, fooling us into thinking we are getting much more than we actually recieve for our money.  I feel a little cheated.  If you must have this, wait until the price drops, or -- better yet -- find a good, reputable fan site  (there are some very good ones out there that have safe downloads) and download for a small fee or for free</review_text>
This pack offered very little of anything. The decor (very little of it) is uninspired. I was hoping to get some good artwork at least.  I know a lot of people don't like to download from fan sites but don't waste your money on this junk.  Believe me fansites have much better and more creative stuff for your sims and most of it is free, and none of it cost  as much as this glamour life stuff pack did.  This is the first and last stuff pack that I will ever buy</review_text>
1 star for looking at the game cover in the store, 2 stars for the visual and audio and playinggggg.-Walk, pick up specified items, push things, use a few gadgets.-Those save points that are maddening rather than save as you go.-Things to do over for the another character.-Same collection of villans over and over.-The cut scenes are sketched for you and the narration is on and on.-(why do the houses look so similar.)-Stuff in the houses that you can not touch. boring.-Find Things you need but can not use yet and have to go back for it.-Not so puzzle solve as much as fetch this and that.-No free range chicken, doors are often locked.-Had to catch same snakes more than 3 times (weeee)-Atleast if you fail a task you get to try again. -REMEMBER nothing goes well, from the get go.-I found no cheats online for this game as of yet... -Dont play the piano, you hit buttons when they float by on screen.-The kids are cute and each special gadget and moves such as they are.I have Never read these books but there is a Warning at the start of the game that this is depressing and states nothing comes out right for these kids.If you want to try this game rent it.If you want to buy this game for someone......make sure you dont mind making yourself depressed for spending the cash and them for playing it.. Do you play the game or does it play you? :-</review_text>
I bought this game 5 days ago and when i finally got it it was missing a pice of plastic in the middle so that i could not play the game and the case was also damage</review_text>
When I first played this game, I got bored in 10 minutes.All you do is shoot and kill people for nothing, have the police chase you and you shoot them, Bring girls into your car and do it with them. I dont recommend this game at all its overrated</review_text>
OK, so where the heck is Vince Young, Matt Leinart, and Reggie Bush in this version?  You see Reggie Bush on the cover, so you think you're going to get the opportunity to play with the Heisman Trophy winner, pair him up with Lendale White and Matt Leinart, and take on the Longhorns to try and replay the Rose Bowl.  But none of these players are to be found.  In fact, Ohio State is listed as the #1 team.Am I behind the times?  Or is this how EA Sports does their football games?  Do I need to buy NCAA 06 in order to use these players in their prime?  I was hoping to be able to play them with updated "abilities" that would reflect all of their outstanding years in 2005.Any ideas out there?  Is this a code or a "cheat" I need to unlock?HELP!!</review_text>
I was reading that 8000-word review by Dave Jeanclerc, and I strongly disagree with some of his points.  (P.S. My review has nothing to do with the XBox 360 version, which, apparently, is awesome.)I HAVE PLAYING THE EA FOOTBALL GAMES SINCE THE MID-90'S, and I'm sick of paying $50 for the same game every year.  EA Games owns the rights to the college and NFL teams, so you won't see any football games by any other game companies, most noteably, SEGA, who revolutionized football simulation games in the late 80's.NCAA Football 07 is basically the same as NCAA Football 2002, and 2003, and 2004, and 05 and 06.  Each year, EA adds a little tweak to the mix, but overall, it's the same look, the same feel, the same moves, the same everything.  This year, they've changed the way you kick the ball, and added more defensive audibles--that's it.  There are a few other minor adjustments, but none are worth noting IMO.  In fact, the audibles they added are the EXACT SAME audibles you used to have on Sega's ESPN Football 2005--you can call audibles for individual defensive players.  Thieves.  Everything else is THE EXACT SAME AS 05 and 06.  The most disappointing thing, graphically speaking, is the crowd...it still looks like flat rows of objects moving in unison, just like it did on games made 10 years ago.OH--one other big change...the "improved" momentum meter.  If you thought it was ridiculous last year, wait til you play NCAA 07.  The "momentum meter" has such a strong influence on the game, that if you make ONE OFFENSIVE MISTAKE in the beginning of the game, you're doomed...that's it.  You can't win.  For example--I played FSU vs. UM twice.  The first time, I made no 1st half errors, and pounded the Hurricanes 31-10.  I played with the same exact settings in the same stadium again, and purposely fumbled the opening kickoff, giving the Hurricanes the ball at my 35 yd. line, and I lost the game 45-24.  That fumble was my ONLY MISTAKE of the game.NESSLER, HERBSTRIET AND CORSO ARE STILL MAKING THE SAME EXACT IN-GAME COMMENTS THEY WERE SAYING IN 05 AND 06...GIMME A BREAK!!!!  Also, the AI is still atrocious.  Defensively, the computer controlled team is hapless.  They blitz on every down.  In fact, I've lined up numerous times for a 3rd and long with 4 or 5 receivers, and the defense continually loads 8 men in the box...they don't even put enough DB's out there to stop me.  It's basically a game of long bombs.  If you choose a team with good receivers, you can easily throw for 400+ yards a game by continually going deep.  THE SAFETIES ALWAYS BLITZ!!!  The safeties only drop back into coverage if you have 3rd and 20+, or 4th and 15+.  So how does the computer couteract your deep balls?  Easy--when the momentum meter swings against your favor, your receivers drop EVERY BALL YOU THROW AT THEM, (even if you hit them in the chest with the ball) and when you finally decide to run the ball, your RUNNING BACK FUMBLES THE BALL IMMEDIATELY.  I played a game between USC and Cal, and I kept switching to play with the team that DIDN'T have the momentum, and I ended up turning the ball over on every possession.You may be reading this and saying, "Hey--this guy has played this game a lot to figure all of this out."  No, not really--it's exactly how I've played the 05 and 06 game, and the same "glitches" I've encountered in them, too.  EA has really dropped the ball again.  You are paying $50 to get updated rosters, and, in typical EA fashion, you don't even have names for any of the players--just different skill levels.EA games suck.  Their soccer games are horrible, their basketball games are too slow and awkward, and they don't update their football games.  I GUARANTEE YOU THAT MADDEN 07 WILL BE THE SAME AS MADDEN 06...JUST WATCH.And by the way--EA has gone all-out on the XBox 360 editions of NCAA 07 ans Madden 07...I'm sure those versions will be stunning.  The rest of us are paying the same price for last year's game</review_text>
Typical Xbox game using checkpoints instead of creativity to make it challenging. Nothing more mind numbing than doing the same thing over and over again because you keep getting killed right before the next checkpoint. Granted, you can get hours and hours of playing time from it, but only about 25% is something that you haven't already done 10 times before. I highly recommend this game to people who are of the intellect that enjoy working on production lines where they do same thing repeatedly. If your brain actually requires some kind of stimulation, find a more creative game. In addition, some actions tend to be a bit uncooperative at times, such as when attempting to knock someone out but instead you just stand there waiting to get shot. Apparently if you aren't facing in just the perfect position when attempting smash his brains out, you stand there like a manakin hoping the guy two inches in front of you doesn't notice. Another option is to try and shoot him, but unless you get a head shot, expect to fire of gobs of rounds to take him out since you seem to be armed with what can only be a .22 short pistol</review_text>
nothing more really needs to be said.I'm running a 3GHz P4;256Mb ATI Radeon 9000 series PCI express video card and 2Gb of RAM and the game still hangs,lags and locks up on my computer. I tried uninstalling & reinstalling-same effect.DO NOT BUY THIS GAM</review_text>
The overall impression is that of a game made on the rush.Assuming the "good" alignment, you win simply by building expensive  buildings at the edge of your influence zone and burning the enemy's platoons sent by a very unintelligent AI. Since winning requires no strategy, the game is challenging; you can do basically the same on all levels.The races against which one fights are pretty much the same except for their "skins" and the building's aspect. Defeating them all takes you at most 8 hours of gameplay.Unlike the previous version of B&W, there are no custom campaigns nor multiplayer features. Cinematics and creature apart, it looks like a very primitive first version of "Age of Empires".</review_text>
The game itself is very interesting - the storyline is engaging and the controls are unique.  It's an RPG, which is quite a switch for Mario.  The major problem with this game is interactivity - not enough of it.  Specifically, there are far too many cutscenes that are not skippable.  Many of these cutscenes lead directly into a boss battle.  The most frustrating instance of this is just before the final boss battle - it takes about 10 minutes to get to the "real" fight from the prior save point.  This isn't a problem for the first time through the sequence, but if you lose 4 or 5 times, this just becomes a hassle and makes the game not really worth playing to see the end.  This is a major problem that most game designers have found work-arounds for, but Nintendo revealed its lack of RPG experience in this element.  It's an interesting game, but just make sure to win, or have a friend/sibling/(enemy?) skip through the dialog sequences for you if you get tired of them</review_text>
All I have to say is this game is not for 'EVERYONE'!! you have to be able to READ to play! Last time I checked not everyone can read. I bought this for my 13 year old son...who has autisum. He can master just about every game I get him but he can't read. So, for him this game was not much fun. I ended up playing more than he did and I didn't even enjoy it</review_text>
with games such as Grand theft auto: San Andreas, driv3r,true crime, etc. the competition is fierce and a game like this won't cut it. first when max talks it sounds like he is mumbling second the graphics suck third the game just sucks in general i am so glad i got this used for $6 i bet it was returned because it was too dumb for the previous owner. i saw it at EB games for only $5 that must mean it sucks and i read rockstar game the rights to remedy because the sales for the sequel max payne 2 were so low i have no clue how this was made a "greatest hit" play GTA or true crime instea</review_text>
I had high hopes on this game but I was disapointed. The controls are horrible and definately the voice acting throughout 90% was bad. The story line was basically typical, it really didn't hold my interest for long. I did beat the game because I spent $50 on it the day it came out and I figured I would at least do that. I gave the game to a friend of mine after I beat it and he had the same opinion as I did. It's worth renting but definately not worth buying. Hopefully those who decide to buy or rent this game can devote a good bit of time trying to learn the controls</review_text>
this game is just a waste of time everything about this crap game gave me a huge headache think god for advil they said that it took then a long time to make this game and for what its not worth nothing cameras are very bad it makes you dizzy when you play it there also a part in this game were you have to follow a maze in pich dark all you see is the lines from the maze you fall off almost every time plus that baby crying too just does it help you. like I said just a waste of time. plus max payne looks fuuny in this game take a good look at his face it looks like he from resident evil the walking dead. and they said it took then a long time to make this game. this game should have never been release</review_text>
this game is really bad I mean everything about it. they took so long to make this and for what.its just a waste off time and your money I gave it 1star because the guns are the best thing about this crap gam</review_text>
Driving physics are as unrealistic as they can get.  Obtaining licenses is extremely difficult, made worse by poor car physics.  Your heavy car easily bounces off light cars, while light cars easily derail your heavy car.  Turning the steering wheel only slightly produces heavy tire squeal, and that's with sports tires!Long gone are the ESPN-like replays of GT 2.  For some reason cars look thinner than before.  The analog tachometer has been reduced to just a bar across the screen.  The 3D mechanics can be headache prone, made worse by the poor physics of the cars.  Easily the most inadequate music ever.The game makes you start with a used model of only certain makes, which is nothing new.  However, it takes a long time to earn any money for a better car.  Only 7 horsepower upgrades make huge differences on the track?!  The game has mostly only newer models, almost none from a few years ago, unlike in GT 2.The only good thing about this game is that you don't have to drive all the time.  The B-Spec driving mode can win races for you.  Just leave for a few minutes and return to a victory screen.  This can help in skipping the painful, early parts of the game.The powertrain is still not modifiable.  Compression, bore, stroke, camshaft timing/overlap, valve size, and other engine characteristics are still not available.  With poor driving physics, engine modification would not have helped this game.Loading times are very long, with the most annoying loading indicator ever.  Constant auto saving feature is quick but can become annoying.  There is an excessive amount of confirmation screens.This game is a yet another disappointment, much like GT 3 was.  The makers of this game made it quite clear that if you want to know what the real cars drive like, you will have to drive them for real.  The Gran Tourismo series are over, unlikely to return to what they used to be.  I'm not a racing game fan, but only GT 2 was good enough for me to buy.  If you want good, car make-independent physics, you need to play Gran Tourismo 2.</review_text>
Being a Starsky and Hutch fan since I was a kid, I was looking forward to playing this. The graphics are &quot;cartoon&quot; horrible and the need for &quot;VR&quot; points becomes annoying after awhile. The bad guys are like something from a Chinese Kung Fu movie, you can shoot at them accurately and it takes all day to kill them...and that's with playing with a PS2 gun (I can't imagine shooting with a controller) which makes you lose the mission because you are down on &quot;VR&quot; points. The dialog gets annoying too and you can't skip hearing it either</review_text>
This game has a great design and excellent/fun story BUT it was obviously not fully tested before it was released for the PC. Whenever there are more than about 5 enemies on the screen the game has horrible clipping/graphic slowdown issues. This means the bad guys keep shooting but your guy doesn't respond quickly to the commands. The clipping is so bad that sometimes I just wanted to find the CEO of Activision and shove this game down his throat. This CAN be a fun game, just don't play the PC version. Borrow someone's Xbox and play that version. This is another example of a greedy developer rushing a PC port to market without bothering to make sure it worked right</review_text>
I thougt there would be a better story line, and what I found was very disappointing.The boss (McGruder) was easier to beat than the boss in the Matrix-Path to neo. I mean, I paid good money for this game on the premise that it was a quality game; obviously I was wrong</review_text>
I plugged the receiver into my game controller and followed the directions to get the controller to communicate with the receiver.  The receiver light kept blinking which means that it didn't recognize the controller. After several tries I decided that the product is defective and returned it</review_text>
this just sucks the main person just keeps running around.He just keeps running and or walking which is controlled thru the key board.no fwd bike control,he won't peddle, but gos backwards quite well.Tryed different setups reloads and nothing worked.Atleast I bought it used and for not much money.Maybe ill find a fix and try it again later</review_text>
I rented this game for my 3 year old.  Who loves the movie.  He tried to play it.  He like it.  I tried to play it & got to the dancing part.  I couldn't get past it.  I tried for 5 days.  My rental time was up.  I returned it.  I haven't rented it since.  This game is way too hard to beat.  And my 3 year old got bored with it real fast.  I would NOT recommend this game to anyone.  Don't waste your money buying it.  Unless you are an expert with video games.  I'm just thankful that I rented it instead of buying it</review_text>
I rented this game and returned it the next day because between my and my friend we could not get past the dancing scene we tried for like an hour and couldn't get past it don't waste your time or patience with this annoying game</review_text>
Pointless quests with no real conclusions. CTD every 30-45 minutes. Lengthy dialoge with no real human attachment. All in all a VERY unpolished product, even with the patch. If your favorite aspect of the first game was the story then do not buy this game</review_text>
Such great visuals and I love most of the Star Wars RPG/Shooters, BUT, I cant believe this is a point and click game.  I was hoping KOTOR2 would have implimented a normal battle engagement.  Theres nothing worse than toggling thru menus etc during an intense battle and actually having to turn around, click the target, then engage someone else after the kill.  The days of Boulder's Gate point-n-click should be over, but I guess theres a crowd for this type of gameplay.  Still a good game, but dissapointed</review_text>
lucas should be ashamed to stamp his name on this turkey. do not play on the xbox 360. you will experience random sound shreiks, resolution issues, too-lonng load times. and overall this is a really buggy and perplexing product. why? the first was very good</review_text>
I BOUGHT THIS GAME WHEN IT WAS $50 BECAUSE I THOUGHT IT WOULD BE A GREAT GAME. I WAS WRONG. YOU DONT GET A LIGHTSABRE UNTIL FAR INTO THE GAME AND ALL THE ADVERTISMENTS SHOWS YOU WITH A LIGHTSABRE. THE GAME IS EXTREMELY BUGGY AND HAS POOR GRAPHICS. I AM A HUGE STARWARS FAN AND WOULD NOT RECCOMEND THIS GAME TO ANYONE NO MATTER HOW BIG OF A STARWARS FAN THEY ARE.DONT BUY THIS GAME</review_text>
First off i just want to say that i've read "The Secret of the Old Clock" and it made this game even more boring because i knew the basic outline.I see in an above review an adult of the age 35 loved it, which i can understand. But I'm 15 and i found this game OVERLY boring. The puzzles were way too easy, and driving around in the horribly done car part of the game made me want to quit playing. It says youll get a pay if you do some chores for people...i didnt get anything. Although I love herinteractive and and i love all the other nancy drew games i would highly reccomend you dont waste $19.00 on it. I would only reccomend getting it if it was in a value pack of Nancy Drew games</review_text>
i was excited to play this game because i wanted to play a detective-like game.  unfortunately, this game is very kid-like.  here's an example.  the first non auto-generated task is to solve some puzzles for a guy.  these are the simple kind of puzzles you could find in a children's word game book.  i easily got all of them except 1, meaning i couldn't progress past this point.  no problem for me, because by this time i didn't want to!  i'm not saying it's a bad game, it's just probably not a good game for grownups.</review_text>
Sure, the graphics and sound ARE nice, but this game is very linear and very forgiving- too forgiving. You can save and reload just about constantly, so long as there aren't monsters nearby and things are made kinda dummy-proof so you can't make any significant mistakes. As a result, I never really felt like I was taking much of a chance doing anything. The dialogue is mostly a matter of clicking responses until you can't click anymore and there's not much bad consequence to clicking them in any ol' order. There's really only one path through the different areas of the game and nothing ever respawns. You can also adjust the difficulty levels from very easy to very difficult but the experience and treasure don't adjust accordingly. This means if a fight is too tough after a couple reloads you can make it very easy and still get the same rewards you would have gotten when it was hard. &lt;yawn&gt; Maybe I'm just a little jaded from playing online games like Everquest for so long. In online, realtime games with other humans playing around you there is much more of an unpredictable, and more importantly uncontrolable, and much more exciting environment to play in. I got so bored with this that I actually stopped playing while close to completing the very last area of the game. I just didn't care anymore. This game requires very little thinking or strategizing</review_text>
On paper, the idea of a 24 video game sounds like a great idea, and upon first glance of it, it seems like it's firing on all cylinders.  Featuring all the major players from the series reprising their roles (Kiefer Sutherland, Dennis Haysbert, Elisa Cuthbert, etc.) and a storyline and tone and atmosphere that captures the feel of the show, 24: The Game falls apart once you get further into it.  The missions are repetitive, the animation and graphics are jumpy and glitched, and the controls are unresponsive to say the least.  Targeting enemies is a chore at times as you use the analog sticks, but the targeting along with just plain moving gets incredibly cumbersome thanks to a camera that seems to want to work against you.  Some of this could be forgiveable, but the further you get through 24 the more rushed the game feels.  It's a shame too, considering how innovative the series was in it's early life and everything the game had going for it.  If more polish was put into it, 24: The Game could have been something special, but as it is, it's only recommended as a rental for fans of the series</review_text>
I guess the first thing i'll say is that I got Jedi Academy BEFORE I got this game. I was HUGELY dissaponted. I really liked Jedi Academy but this game is not that great. I have cheat codes so I can have all wepons and all amo and I can be undying. There are partes in this game that are INSAINLY tought. There are way to many puzzles - I don't mind puzzles but there are simply way to many. And some on them are insainly hard. I would recomend you to get Jedi Knight: Jedi Academy - way better the puzzles aren't insain and you get to choose what you look like and....well I could go on but i'll leave it there. If you aredy have Jedi Academy and you want another star wars game that is $20 then you sould get Battlefront thats anoter great game. Just don't get this game.</review_text>
I used my remote all of about 8 times before it stopped working.  Even with the proprietary dongle inserted into a controller slot you cannot control this thing with a controller, you must use the remote control.  When you take the dongle out with a DVD in, a screen will come up telling to reinsert, so if either the dongle or the remote get slightly injured or malfunction, then you've just wasted thirty bucks.  I feel quite ripped off.  With the low cost of DVDs nowadays, it's a MUCH better idea to buy a standalone IMHO, you can get a good progressive scan for about $30 or $40, which comes out to about the same price.As a side, it is also EXTREMELY annoying that you can't turn on, or off the device with the remote, you must go up to box to do it yourself, especially annoying if you just want to watch a DVD in your bed and crash afterwards.All in all the value proposition offered by this product is very low considering the similarly priced alternatives</review_text>
DVD's which play perfectly well on other cheap players, freeze/skip or don't play when I try to play them on the XBOX. Don't waste your money on this, buy a stand-alone DVD player instead so you won't have the frustration that I've had</review_text>
This remote is of awful quality; i've been through two of them in the past year. I wouldn't complain so much if it didn't cost $30! It's worth ten, at most. Most people would be better off buying a cheap DVD player, rather than using the xbox</review_text>
I love the Nancy Drew games, and I own every one.  I bought this game, with high hopes--then I finished it in only one day.  It was that simple.  Yes, like all Nancy Drew games there were interesting characters, amazing graphics, and intriguing puzzles, but those good things failed to even out the bad.  The game was over much too quickly.  The problem of the game was too simple and seemingly unimportant.  There was not much to do, and the three or so mandatory tasks were monotonous and dull.  While the character-switch Her Interactive offered was interesting, it could also be very confusing.  The characters, though interesting, were not as thoroughly developed as in the other Nancy Drew games.  And what I consider the worst fault of all, the ending of the game was absolutely horrid.  It was by far the worst of all the games in its series.  There was no action, or chase, or anything that really needed a brain or quick thinking.  It was just over.  While the Nancy Drew games are an amazing series as a whole, this game just left me wondering, "What was Her Interactive thinking?"  I would recommend this game only to the die-hard Nancy Drew fans.  To those of you merely seeking a fun and entertaining game, look at some of the other Nancy Drew games.  I believe that "The Curse of Blackmoor Manor", "The Secret of Shadow Ranch", and "The Secret of the Scarlet Hand" are the best</review_text>
The game seemed to start off like any other Nancy Drew game.  My daughter has played them all.  However, after a while, it seemed as thow it was an easter egg hunt for three year olds.  Everything was easy to find and not mysterious at all.  All the other games took my daughter quite some time before she figured out the mystery.  However, this game took her two days.  All the other Nancy Drew games kept her intrigued and kept her coming back for more.  This game breezed by and and she was quite disappointed.  In fact, her words at the end of the game were, "that's it?".  Her interactive, better come out with a more interesting game next time or you'll lose the interest</review_text>
Seems like they just huried this game. Too much running around to get answers. The phone did not even have web acsess. Actually i did not like it at all</review_text>
My daughter and I have played all of the previous games; we've enjoyed them overall.  Some of the games are fantastic, challenging and fun. This game was quite lame in comparison to the others.  The puzzles weren't really puzzling, just boring tasks.  There were not many clues to find.  Because there weren't many clues, there was no real sense of detecting anything.  The game ended abruptly and was very short.  We did NOT use a walk-through to solve the mystery in record time, just experienced a lack of challenge.  We did like the newness of becoming Frank and Joe Hardy occasionally.  The rest was pretty boring.  If you are looking for a Nancy Drew game, try one of the others instead</review_text>
The review by Bovey is spot-on!  These games have gotten more boring as they go.  The majority of this game is spent looking for the same shells over and over to make the same necklaces over and over....how much is enough?  There was no real sense of scariness or danger... just boredom! And the game was so short... suddenly it ended!  I am so disappointed in what these games have become.  I loved The Final Scene, I even liked Blackmoor Manor even though I could never have finished it without consulting a walkthrough.  This game was just lame. I don't recommend paying full price for it</review_text>
I've been a fan of these games since the first one - Secrets Can Kill - came out.  I've played them all.I'm not at all sure what's happened to the games, though.  While the graphics have steadily improved, the puzzles, plot, and gameplay have really gone downhill.The first game, "Secrets Can Kill" had pretty horrific graphics, but the story was compelling and there were some fabulous puzzles in it.Things really picked up with the second game, "Stay Tuned for Danger".  Better graphics and a very interesting story, very cool puzzles, great plot.I can absolutely recommend Games 2 (Stay Tuned for Danger), 3 (Message in a Haunted Mansion), 4 (Treasure in the Royal Tower), 5 (The Final Scene), 6 (Secret of the Scarlet Hand), 7 (Ghost Dogs of Moon Lake), 9 (Danger on Deception Island), and 10 (Secret of Shadow Ranch).These games are similar in length and have interesting puzzles.  Lots of areas where you can snoop around - which I really enjoy.Game #8 (The Haunted Carousel) is interesting and has wonderful graphics, but is awfully short.I did not at all enjoy #11 (Curse of Blackmoor Manor) as I found it way too difficult.   I also cannot really recommend #12 (Secret of the Old Clock). It was too short and repetitive.I did somewhat enjoy #13 (Last Train to Blue Moon Canyon) and #14 (Danger by Design) but they were nowhere near the quality of the earlier games in terms of plot or puzzles.And now, we have #15.  Outstanding graphics, but way too short.  The amount of repetition of puzzles in order to advance drove me completely crazy.  I don't mind Nancy running about doing errands to help people (for that, I thought Games 3 and 4 had it perfectly balanced).  But I like each task to be different and interesting.  Not mind-numbingly repetitive and boring.This seems to be a factor of the more recent games - delivering telegrams in Game #12, painting pictures in Game #14, and now finding seashells and making necklaces in this game.I miss looking for clues.  Putting together evidence for a purpose.  I miss puzzles that actually are woven into the fabric of the plot and are there to advance the game.  It seems like the repetition now might be so that it can be said that this game took X number of hours to complete.I also miss learning useful things.In #1, I learned about American Sign LanguageIn #3, I learned about Chinese symbols and the San Francisco earthquakeIn #4, I learned about latitude and longitude and how a sextant worksIn #6, I learned SO much about the Maya and how to work a HAM radioIn #7, I learned about Roman Numerals and ProhibitionIn #8, I learned how to make invisible writing!In #9, I learned how to work a HAM radio and about Pacific Northwest sea animalsAfter that, well, I didn't really learn very much of anything useful in any of the later games.If you've never played a Nancy Drew game, please, please, PLEASE do yourself a favor and start with one of the earlier games (although probably not the very first one - the graphics aren't as good and switching discs can be highly annoying).  But give #2 - 9 a try; you won't be disappointed!Oh please, Her Interactive, PLEASE go back to the way they used to be structured.  I'd gladly sacrifice some of the improved graphics if it meant regaining some plot, cohesion, or integrated, interesting puzzles.</review_text>
this game has a 25 minute introduction or story.  Square Enix was really creative and the stories are so good!  However I do expect them to put something like "Skip Intro" cause impatient people could really get mad at the stories!  I, however only get a game every five months so I am fine with that.  This is only a minor flaw.  Another flaw is that when you want to look at the map or statistics, you have to wait 5 seconds until it appears.  Very annoying, but again a minor flaw.  This game depends on how much you like to battle the same creatures over and over and over again!  It get very boring after awhile.  You have to train those dumb spirits and sometimes you just want them to level up quicker.  This game gets very boring after awhile and you will want to ditch the game as well as the characters.  There is not much action and you have a limited amount of monsters to battle.1.0 ~ 3.5----- terrible3.6 ~ 5-----bad5.1 ~ 6.5-----average6.6 ~ 8-------good8.1 ~ 9------great9.1 ~10------must buy excellent!graphics- 9/10  greatsound   -9/10   some voice acting but greatfun   -   5/10  depends on how patient you are and how you react to battling the same monster over and over againaverage- about 8my grade-   7   goo</review_text>
I had read pretty good reviews about this game so I bought it.   I was hoping for something with a little action with an interesting storyline.  What I got was probably the most boring game I have ever played.- The introduction/prolouge lasts about 7 minutes or so, including the credits.  You cannot break out and move on- After you set down your PSP and grab a drink, you come back and find that there is one short battle for you to play.  Then you go back to the "story".  The characters have long, annoying conversations and you get to press "X" at the end of each of their sentances.  Again, no way to break out, no in-game menu for you to manage the game.  You have to go through each painfully slow dialog box until the "chapter" is over.This game is really bad.  Maybe it gets a little more interesting; it is possible that there is actually something for you to do besides watch the characters argue.  It is really slow and it is all about the storyline and the dialog.  There does not appear to be any freeplay.  If you have played this type of game before and you enjoy that style of play, then you might like it.  I was bored and frustrated from the first minute</review_text>
Pretty much sums up how I felt after 15 minutes of introductory waffle, hellishly annoying bingy bongy music and (admittedly very pretty) cut scenes, totally emotionless voice overs, impossibly slow conversations that served little or no point.And to be honest at that point it was either switch off the psp or throw it against a wall. I decided to switch it off.Now I'm a big fan of adventure games, played untold legends 1 till it gave up on me (literally left hanging around with nothing to do and no more quests on offer).From what I can gather, the in game graphics for Valkyrie (after 15 minutes [though it seemed like much longer]) I'd seen some really cool character graphics - bit like tekken DR in-game graphics - and some of those horrible 2d munchkin japanese rpg graphics, which are the in-game stuff.So the bit you play looks like it's 20 years old and should be on a gba, the cutscenes are nice but there will no doubt be far too many of those - ie: 5 minutes of slow cut scenes for every encounter.I can't say this is a proper review as I couldn't stand this title long enough to get to any actual gameplay and there's no way I'm sitting through that intro again.My advice, if you like the long winded old style walk-and-talk for three hours before actually doing anything, japanese rpgs. Get this (or better still go to an antiques shop and find an old text adventure).If you prefer a game where you actually play the character and do stuff - avoid this like the plague.I've got high hopes for dungeon siege when it comes out (but then I had high hopes for valkyrie too :-( ), but for now untold legends 2 is okay, not as good as it should have been but a helluva lot more fun than valkyrie.I would like to point out that I've never played on a ps2, xbox or game cube - so this is the first time I've seen a valkyrie profile game. I didn't have any preconceptions, obviously if I had I'd never have gone anywhere near this title in the first place :-)</review_text>
I love the idea behind this game and it's pretty impressively exectuted. I had three gripes though: 1) It's so fast paced that I found it really difficult to progress past the third procedure. 2)I couldn't get the magnify and reduce (with quick little circles) to work.  This caused me great frustration. 3)There's no way to skip through the seemingly endless pages of character dialogue if you have to repeat a procedure a couple of times.I quit playing it pretty quickly</review_text>
This game is mindnumbingly hard not because its a very challenging but rather its set up to fail.Most missions thrust you into a situation with little indication of what to do. As the patients vital signs drops, you frantically poke at your DS trying to think on what to do. The nurse, who assists you, gives you vague ideas on how and before you know it you've failed the mission. It would take me an average of 10-15 failures before I finally won a mission. The last mission I played that made me quit, resulted in 30+ failures. And that's only being 1 hour and half into the game.The graphics are crisp and clear. The storyline didn't make much of an impression on me. But I was probably too frustrated to pay attention to that. This game had a lot of potiental but killed it by constantly making you fail. Do not buy this game unless you have an extreme amount of patients, game collector who will keep it sealed, or you're a gultton for punishment. Whatever you do, do not buy this game for the hype. It does not live up to it.</review_text>
I know that Pelican screen protectors and styluses are tempting because they're always the cheapest ones available.  That should tell you something.First of all, the top screen uses adhesive.  It's smooth plastic in the middle, but the edges will leave sticky goo on the screen.  Because the edge is a different material than the middle, it's insanely difficult to squeeze the air bubbles out of it, and being adhesive, trying again and again isn't much of an option.  Furthermore, the sticky edge is white, not clear, and it looks horrible on my onyx DS Lite.After having so much difficulty with the top screen protector, I checked online for reviews.  I read several reports of people who used the Pelican styluses with the Pelican bottom screen protector and the screen protector being very drastically scratched up within an hour's worth of use.  So, whether the stylus is too harsh for the bottom screen protector or the screen protector was too flimsy for the stylus, the combination just doesn't work.Many people report simply throwing their Pelican Write and Protect sets into the trash, so I'm not the only one that paid Pelican money for something that's going into the trash can.  No matter how inexpensive Pelican's product is, it's still too expensive if you end up throwing it in the trash too.I know I'm going to avoid the Pelican screen protectors and styluses in the future, and I very much wish that there were reviews here on Amazon before I bought mine.  I had to dig through Nintendo DS forums to read other peoples' opinions.Finally, if you already bought one and hate it, you can remove it by using scotch tape on the edges to peel it off and rubbing alcohol to remove the residue</review_text>
To me, this game was seriously disappointing. So disappointing, I didn't finish the second case before setting it down forever.I was highly entertained - at first. It's cute, funny, and going around clicking on things for a new DS user was highly entertaining. However, it quickly got older.1. You can't skip through the horrendously long dialog - ever. Even after you've heard it about a million times because you're clicking on people hopelessly in frustration unable to figure out what to do.2. I found myself looking for an internet walk through, yes, on this simplistic game. I couldn't figure out what to click and wandering around hopelessly for thirty minutes reading over dialog you've read a thousand times just gets too frustrating even for my typical patience level.3. Possible Spolier - There seemed to be a glich in the second story in which I talked to the wrong person at the wrong time and then I could never get a ticket into the planetarium. After that, I just couldn't take it any more and gave up.4. The places and people never change. For each case, from my understanding, it's all the exact same tiny few places. I'm not a big gamer, but I like a world bigger than three feet.I let a friend borrow it and thus far she is enjoying it more than me.Just to help this review - I'm a college-age female and this is my first gaming console, although I've played the PS2 quite a bit. Maybe it's really a hit or miss but I don't really recommend it for anyone but someone with a high patience level. A REALLY high patience level</review_text>
This GameCube is WEAK. I have owned both the NES and the Nintendo 64 and those were excellent gaming systems. Nintendo's recent system, the GameCube, has several problems with it's design. First of all, the internal fan is slow but, quiet. After an hour or so of use, the system overheats, thus shuts down. Second problem, the wireless controllers for this system SUCK. We have tried 4 brands and none have worked more than a week. The brands we have tried: Pelican, Intec, Nintendo, and Osmart. The third problem is that the system was not built to last. I still have the NES and Nintendo 64, which both work great! I doubt the GameCube will last past 4-5 years of use. Simply put, DON'T BUY THIS PRODUCT! ALSO! The Nintendo Wii is going to come out soon. From the description and from the specs, you will need to stand up and interact (move around and stuff) with the game. Sounds fun but, would you like to do that after a hard day of work? It will work something like the Sony Eye Toy.</review_text>
This game is fun and injoyable, but the bonus levels are questionable and it is almost better with less people</review_text>
This is Supposed to be an x-box cleaner, but the system does not read the disc.  A shoddy product</review_text>
I am a huge fan of the RPG genre and have played just about every one for the PC.  Morrowind is the most boring one I have ever played.  I turned it off after two evenings of SLOWLY walking around, having stupid repetitive conversations with NPCs, and lamely fighting rats.  The interface is terrible.  You are very limited in what you can carry, so after you kill a monster you can't even carry your treasure back to town.  This "game" was all work with no fun.  Do not buy</review_text>
there are pros and cons of this card.PROS-its stores a lot of memoryable to save many files at one timecompactaffordableCONS-games that require 256 blocks will not be able to save!sometimes crashes.i tried saving with nhl 06 and it said it needed more memory. if you have a game that used 256 blocks get the gameshark 16x memory car</review_text>
Make no mistake, this is the memory card for you if you've got a Gamecube (which I'm assuming you do, or you're planning on getting one soon).Anyway, there are 251 blocks on this baby, which may not seem like a lot, but it is.  It gets the job done, and you don't have to worry about it corrupting data or anything.  I've had mine for a while and nothing has happened to the files saved on there.  It's also easy to save and delete information from this thing with the simple click of a button.Please, don't get that damn third party memory card from Madcatz, my experience with that is corrupted data, and constant reformating of the card (which erases your files anyway).  Only go with Nintendo, they're the only ones who know the divine nature of their memory card.I must say, though, this is for the casual gamer.  Someone who doesn't have every game they can possibly get a hold of.  Some EA games, for exammple, take up over one-hundred blocks of memory.  Basically, what I'm saying is simple: If you're one who has a ton of games, you may find yourself buying more than one of these memory cards before you know it.  Not every game has a save for just the game.  Resident Evil, for example, saves on a different block every time.  Just like a playstation memory card.  If you're like me, however, you probably don't have THAT many games that it's a bother.The other thing I must caution is simple: This thing, like every other memory card, is small as hell.  This one even more so.  If you can, keep it plugged in your Gamecube at all times.The great thing about memory cards, just about everyone of them, is simple: You can take them anywhere.  Does your same friend also own Super Mario Sunshine?  Hey, that's great, now you can leave your copy of the game at home and take your memory card.  It lightens the load.It's essential to have a memory card if you buy a Gamecube, and this is a good one.  If, however, you happen to be someone who has a TON of games, this won't hold you over long enough, and you'll have to buy another.No Gamecube owner should be without a memory card, though.</review_text>
I got this game during the summer expecting it to be great fun. Well...it caught my interest for a few weeks then I just got bored with it. I'd only recomend it to people who do not get bored easily</review_text>
Remember all those countless super hero licensed beat 'em up's that plagued 16-bit systems?  At first glance EA's Marvel Nemesis: Rise of the Imperfects might not seem like that type of game, but make no mistake that it is: a repetitive and quickly boring beat 'em up with a host of technical issues.  You can play as a variety of Marvel Comics heroes and villains, as well as six "Imperfects": cyborg-esque warriors created specifically for the game.  The single player mode is ungodly repetitive as you battle hordes of generically created enemies.  This gets boring real quick, with button mashing galore and repetitive gameplay.  The destructable environments seem like a good plus at first, but you'll soon learn how much they actually work against you in a brawl, and it becomes more frustrating than it should be.  The cumbersome control scheme adds to this, not to mention that the controls can get to be quite buggy as well.  The graphics look sharp from a distance, but the game has an odd look to it like it doesn't know if it wants to look like Spider-Man 2 or Ultimate Spider-Man (both are great games that are much more worth your time than this), and the in game cut scenes look godawful.  There are a few saving graces which save Marvel Nemesis from being a complete clunker, including a horde of unlockable content that comic fans will love.  The Marvel heroes' super powers are nicely pulled off, including Storm's weather attacks and Daredevil's agility, and the online support is where the most fun from the game is to be had.  Other than that though, there's not much else here to hold your interest.  If you're looking for a great super hero game, check out the X-Men Legends series or the aforementioned Ultimate Spider-Man.  If you're looking for a great beat 'em up, check out Rockstar's the Warriors; all of which are more worthwhile than this</review_text>
This review is in reference to "Nancy Drew: Last Train to Blue Moon Canyon Game + Strategy Guide" edition.I've played 3 or 4 of the Drew games.  This one played faster and was over before the time it took to install the game.Before I had installed 'Blue Moon Canyon', I had installed "Morrowind the Game of the Year Edition", which sold for five dollars less than 'Blue Moon Canyon'.  Morrowind is a huge 4 disc game that has, at the bare minimum, 400 hours of gameplay, and possibly might literally be endless.  The entire Morrowind set had been installed and up and running within 15-20 minutes.After I had installed and played 'Blue Moon Canyon' we installed and got up and running "Age of Mythology Gold" also within 20 minutes. This is another massive game, a Real Time Strategy game that included the expansion pack "The Titans". Both 'Mythology' games were completely installed.  This is another game that can be played and explored for years.  The two game set sold for five dollars more than 'Blue Moon Canyon', or the original full retail price of the strategy guide edition."The Last Train to Blue Moon Canyon" took so long to download...we went out for dinner and let it download while we were gone.  We have a P4 at 3.2Ghz, an 80GB HD, of which only 23GB were used, and 1.5 GB of RAM.  There is no reason on earth why Nancy Drew games should take so long, over an hour, to download...unless their copy protection program conflicted with our Toshiba Super-Multi Drive drivers.The actual installation was not as painful as the download.  What was painful was the gameplay.  I had a lot of fun playing the 'Secret of the Old Clock'.  Whereas most of the Amazon user reviews came across as lukewarm to the game, I liked playing the golf game, and the car chase, and the "bank shots" of reflective light beams to be aligned.  I even felt proud when I finally got the sewing completed.I knew that the Drew games wouldn't deliver the value that the two games (mentioned above) did.  But after the reading the reviews of 'Blue Moon' I expected to have more fun than I did with 'Secret', even though I knew it would be short lived.What a let down.  The game was over in two or three hours. Most of the gameplay was a memory test of what order what button was pushed or stick was knocked over, or  which way the track leaned to.  The 'arcade' games in the General Store were just hit the button or in this case 'click the mouse'. You didn't even have to look.  The most complicated task was getting a piece of paper to do a rubbing. It was very boring.Between the price, the concern over the length of the download, the most unimaginative gameplay set to walking back and forth on a train, I cannot recommend this game as being fun. It had a few moments with the Math/scale problems but it wasn't enough to carry the game or balance the huge amount of needless dialogue the player has to endure listening to.I realize I'm an adult, but the eight year-old little girl (I bought it for) lost interest after the first 15 minutes.  She was wiser than I.Sorry Nance, this one is a waste of money, and might contribute to hardware damage with driver conflicts.marf</review_text>
i didnt like clue chronicles i sat there for 5 hours and still couldnt figure it out, i got so far and couldnt get any further. this was a waste of my money, if i could sell it i would, i like the regular clue better, that is why i bought this i thought it was something like the old one, when i seen it wasnt, i thought this might be fun, but as i was playing it i hated it more and more. i have sat down and tried this game 10 different times and i end up in the same spot and cant get no where else. i hate i</review_text>
We recommend not buying this game, unless you don't mind a buggy version that is not supported by Hasbro and can't be fixed.  Hasbro has decided not to support the game and the patches at the website are no longer available.  Save your money and wait for the next one, hopefully bug free</review_text>
I bought this game about a week ago. I had not purchased the prequil (sp?) to this game and did not know what to expect.I began playing the game and immediately got bored about 30-45 minutes later. I have no played the game since. Here's why:The graphics, to me, are ridiculously annoying. It makes the game feel so unrealistic. The graphics are a step lower than "NBA Street" and even more unrealistic. The real problem is that there is just nothing to do. You enter tournements and they all feel the same. The little side missions are laughable, and I feel like turning off my Ps2 and smashing the controller on my head repetitively everytime I play one of them.I can go on and on about why I hated this game. But I won't. The bottom line is that I strongly urge you not to waste your money. The cover and appearance of the game appealed to me and made me want to buy the game...but don't let that happen to you</review_text>
After playing this game for the third time I had a thought, 'WHY DID I BUY THIS!' This game is extremely unoriginal and gets boring very quickly. I cannot notice any difference and improvements from the first ballers and other NBA Street's. Save your money and do not purchase this dreadful game</review_text>
First off, I cannot believe how mad this game has made me.  I like all kinds of games, but honestly trying to figure out some of the levels in this game left me stumped.  It's one thing to be stuck somewhere and have to retry a lot, but several times during this game I was stuck in an area and had no idea where to do/what to do, etc... even after I killed all the bad guys I didn't know how to get out of the room.  This game is not intuitive (sp?) at all!Secondly, this game should not be called the Incredibles, it should be called Mr. Incredible, because you play as him almost all the time.  Playing as Elasta-Girl is great, I really enjoyed that part, but when there are a lot of baddies with guns, Mr. Incredible is a pain since he has no way to block anything, so you spend a lot of time getting pushed back until the bad guys reload.I liked the first mission as Dash (when you play as Dash, which is only twice) you have to run fast; however the second mission I just lost my patience because I had to restart about a million times because I couldn't see what was ahead of me.Playing a Violet was bad, they should have done a lot more with her instead of a boring stealth mission.  The Incredi-ball mission Incredibi-sucked, it took me like an hour to hit something because it was in a difficult place.I'm just finishing up the game now and quite frankly I haven;'t enjoyed a lot of it, which is a shame because I really loved the movie.  Some of the levels are too hard because you can barely find the way to do something and Mr. Incredible needs to do more than punch people.  Currently I'm on the Rocket Silo level and I keep falling down trying to get onto a platform.  What a load of fun that is to do 100 times or more.Bottom line:  Playing as Elasta-girl was fun, everything else was either blah, or made me want to swear a lot.  Hopefully the second game will be better.  I'll be renting that instead of buying, this game left me disappointed overall</review_text>
Shouldn't you  people know by now?Say it with me:NEVER BUY MOVIE GAMES.A friend of mine bought it and it was horrible.It was way too easy to die in,etc,etc,etc.Hey listen.Keep you money.Your investment isn't in here</review_text>
the vertical stand is wonderfull... but why? you can do this with 2 useless dvd cases and some duck tape... I put my PS slim vertically and it helps but why waste the time buying the product? I bought it just for kicks... literally</review_text>
poor quality ,out of box you can only play KQ7. almost useless very dispointed that they even sell this game as it is</review_text>
My gripe is about KQ6.  One customer said that there were no differences between the cd and disk versions. This information is false. At the time of its origional release, I was fortunate to have a high end computer (for its time) that was able to run the Windows CD version of KQ6 which had much better graphics and Character Illustrations. I was beyond upset when I found out that this was nothing but the DOS version. I bought this to play the windows version that to my knowlage does not work in any way on any OS past win95 (maybe 98). Those who have played and have been waiting to play the Windows CD version will be very upset</review_text>
I loved this game as a child and I spent many hours playing it. I was incredibly excited to be able to play it on my Laptop. OOPS they didn;t update any of the drivers for the first two games (Kings Quest 1 & 2) so after about 15 minutes of playing you can't see the screen due to all of the graphic errors. There are no patches available as of yet and it dosn't look like any are on the way. I feel pretty ripped off. It says on the cover in big print. "Runs on Windows XP." Barely, and not very well when it does. If you are interested in this game check to see if Vivendi has done any patches before you buy it or you will be disapointed. Better yet download one of the fan-made editions for free online. They work</review_text>
After all the Hype about this game I bought it...well in my opinion it just felt flat on its face. The game simply is not very intersting and the storyline can be plain boring. There are other RPGs out there that are better and you simply get immersed in the story line quickly. The battles get boring extremely quickly since all you do is kinda point and tap the same guys over and over. The "costumes" and "decals" are kinda stupid. Many said this was the next EARTHBOUND, well is NOT and not even close. The Nintendo DS has so much potential and this game does not deliver in graphics, sound , game play and fun. dont get me wrong the game is not horrible by any means but defitnetly not that good either. check out some reviews out there before you buy it</review_text>
This second part of Xenosaga compares very badly to the stellar first part, regardless of what anyone says.  I no longer wanted to play this game after only 30 minutes.The game begins with lots of boring instructions for a very non-intuitive battle system.  Annoying amount of experience points is needed to defeat nearly every main enemy, including the very first one.  Battle result and saving screens are a painful chore.Battle camera is inadequate and characters look and act like small puppets.  The game has very few items, weapons, or armor to deal with even ordinary enemies, which are stronger than expected.  The skill combination that will be successful on a main enemy is not available until engaged by that enemy.  Battles with main enemies are long, which isn't such a problem.  However, they often conveniently power up at the end of the battle, just to frustratingly finish off a battle-weakened party.Voice acting is very uninspired and sometimes even annoying.  I don't remember any music from this game, so plain it is.  Some character changes are likely to upset at least half of everyone who liked the first Xenosaga.  Very noticeable is the use of swearing, which is the main reason I don't enjoy or watch Hollywood movies during my rest and relaxation anymore.New, meaningless characters have been introduced into the story, and the focus shifted far away from the main characters.  The cover character hardly says or does anything this time.  There is one short scene between the main characters during a critical moment, but if you blink you will miss it.This game is far more frustrating than challenging, which is not a good game trait.  I don't recommend even playing this game before reading the above, to fully prepare for the disappointment that awaits.  If you're looking forward to anything that made the first Xenosaga great, you will be extremely disappointed.  The second Xenosaga is better completely avoided.</review_text>
I loved the first Xenosaga. Then, this arrived. Episode 2 isen't a bad game in terms of the story, the intro is absolutely DYNAMITE. Then you get into a battle. Now, if you like tactical stuff, this is a good game for you. But if you're trying to fight your way through a hoard of enemies to get to a save point in record timing, I say save your money. Gone is the amazingly well-done battle system in the first episode. In its place stands a completely out-of-nowhere new way of battling that takes 15 minutes to get rid of a couple of easy enemies( the easy ones in this game have around 2000 Hps). Ridiculous, but that's not all. The enemies have weak "zones" that depend of the height of the attack that you input.The zones are A,B and C, A being the highest. Triangle=C, square=B and Circle=A -SOMETIMES-. See what I mean? It's completely screwed-up and you have to become deeplyaddicted to the game to understand its full potential. And if       that wasn't enough, they changed the voice actors too. Kos-Mos'svoice sounds more like an operator than a robot's and Momo sounds like a brat. At least, chaos' voice has improved. I'd prefer playing episode 1 twice than playing this. I just hope Namco comes out with a better sequel, otherwise spend your moey on something else (like Shadow Hearts, for example).</review_text>
Pros:- Mechs are a bigger part of the games (you actually have to use them),- The graphics of the cutscreens are great, and the graphics overall are betterthan before,- A couple of the characters look better,- Much harder than Episode I,- More optional bosses,Cons:- New battle system is a load of mouse spunk (can I say spunk?),- Most characters look worse (especially Kos-Mos), and Jin travelsthroughout space with no pants on,- Almost all of the sidequests are terrible,- Very short,- The story is much weaker,- The dictionary is gone; and so are Shion's glasses,- No shops. Why are there no shops?- Too much more to list.  Just bad.  The movie "Howard the Duck" is better thanthis</review_text>
We got this game free in a box of Corn Chex. We thought, Oh this will be fun since the show is cool. So we got home and played it and it was so annoying! There's just like a black screen before and after the question shows up and a black background. Just, don't buy it if you want to have any fun</review_text>
When Disney Interactive released &quot;Who Wants to Be a Millionaire,&quot; in early 2000, they anticipated a very warm response to the disc, which had a firm but low opening price. However, when actually being played, the game is sure to depress. If it isn't crudely simple, the design is poor and uninspired. The entire game is essentially based on one lackluster thing: Regis Philbin repeating the same phrases over and over again. &quot;Be Sure to come back to... Who Wants to be a Millionaire.&quot; &quot;I hope you'll join me again on... Who Wants to be a Millionaire.&quot; If one doesn't decide to resell (or simply trash) this game within its first week of purchase, they work for Disney Interactive or are Regis themselves. Don't waste your time on this pitiful effort</review_text>
I am extreamly dissapointd with this game.  Every section and mission is exactly the same with the exception of the location.  There is absolutly no skill involved in beating the game which i was able to do in 3 sittings.</review_text>
Hey, have you ever played Caesar II from the 1990s? Yeah, well this game is basically a knock-off of that game with better graphics. And quite frankly, Caesar II was more fun. I don't see how CivCity has any point. You build your city and nothing interesting ever happens. There is no progression to the game that keeps it fresh.The makers intergrated technologies and wonders from the successful Civilization game series, but they are inconsequential in this game. These people should stick to what they are good at, the Civilization series, and leave city games to people who know how to do it.I've heard that a new installment of the Caesar series is out now, Caesar IV, and I haven't tried it, but it has to be better than CivCity Rome. This game is boring, don't pay any money for it.</review_text>
I brought this after having played Caesar3 and loved it but wanted something with a bit more scope for controlling dynamics of a city - and I thought being a civcity game this would offer me the extension - WRONG - this is a bad rip off of Caesar3, sure, graphics are more advanced with the zoom in view but other than that I was playing the same game but with less involvement or control. This is a sit back and let it happen to you game - keep the people happy and build everything and they'll stay. Caesar IV - that's what you're wanting, it looks like everything this sets itself up to be that it isn't. Feel like I've wasted my money</review_text>
I was really looking forward to this game, and I was prepared to overlook one or two things.  Every game has it's own personality, right?  I found instead this game actually doesn't have much of one at all.I didn't mind the graphics.  Not cutting edge sure, but not that bad either.  A little muddy but a change from cartoony.  It was hard to enjoy closeup views, however, when so many buildings lost their roof on zoom.  No way to toggle that feature.  The camera angles were frustrating and it was very difficult to pick anything out with the mouse accurately.Not that there was much time to look at the scenery.  Immigrants came.  And came.  And came.  Whether there were houses and jobs available or not.  As long as city happiness was high enough, which meant that everyone was happy.  Which they were not.  Because they had no houses or jobs.To keep city happiness up was the only way to ensure a somewhat stable economy.  Forget planning.  Forget balancing resources with workshops and markets.  It wasn't clear what the balance was in any case.  It would take trial and error, and you didn't have the time.  For you were building worshops like mad, trying to guess at how many citizens would be employed by each, and researching for temporary bumps to keep your city from being deserted in droves.The best income boosts were not through sale of goods or trade.  It was through research, maximising the tax base with the development of currency and so on.  You hit those early on, and reached a certain population level, you made money.  The rest of the time you spent trying to keep people from leaving.  There was no stability in reaching any level.It quickly became a game of keep up.  There was no way to control immigration or set the pace of development.  And for all the decorative options, more than the similar games out, you really didn't care in the end what your city looked like, because it just cost time.  Money too, but that was really not the relevant issue.  Unless people were unhappy.  Then you could stick a few things, quickly, somewhere.  You just can't enjoy a leisurely pace of planning, building and finishing it off with a nudge here and there and watching it run...you have to be constantly involved in the process, staying ahead of the curve.  You don't have to worry about maintenance, such as city fires or engineers, but the cities cannot not be made self-sufficient or self-sustaining with this inherent instability built into the gameplay.  Five or ten minutes away from the screen will bring most cities, if not all, to a screeching halt.While I enjoyed the research options, and the ability to move homes I thought was a great innovation, not having the ability to control the flow of immigrants to the city and pegging success to city happiness makes this game a poor economic simulation and the gameplay ultimately very shallow and unsatisfying.</review_text>
The Civ name has been tarnished.  Analogously, one thing I have been learning is that just because Sid Meier's name is on a product, it doesn't mean the product is good.In the case of CivCity: Rome, unfortunately, it doesn't just come in at "modestly good" - it comes in at "dismally poor."  I've tried hard not to let this influence my beliefs about Civilization in general, but after Civ4 came out, I am starting to believe that Firaxis Games and Sid Meier are on their way out.  And now this...I regret to inform that the great Civ titles were made a long time ago.  The offerings of today have a simple pattern: the production was rushed and the title came out with major bugs; the games add unnecessary features designed to justify the overall cost; and the consumers are often abused with ridiculous expansion packs containing features that should OBVIOUSLY have been included in the original release - they take advantage of our love for the franchise.This pattern is so evident that the whole Sid Meier and Civ franchise is degenerating.  It almost seems, especially with the release of CivCity: Rome, that we are once again expected to simply drop cash for new products based on our love for the old.  But the developers are not living up to our expectations for producing great games!Stay away from CivCity: Rome.  Besides the obvious blunders associated with all the bugs, you will see that even the best patch cannot make the graphics look good, the narration and sound effects better, or the interface to work properly.  The game is a dismal failure, and I am sorry to report that.  It seems like Firefly Studios had an idea and got the license from Firaxis, but they just cheesed it.Watching what Maxis (The Sims and SimCity franchises) and Firaxis (Civilization franchise) are doing to their most loyal fans is like watching your dad get drunk</review_text>
It has pretty much all been said, let's just say it again 'cause I'm sure Firaxis/Firefly will plant positive reviews here. The game takes ages to load, the voice acting is silly (British? Australian? Herman's Hermits?), the progression is totally linear (ie the game fails to become more complicated at higher levels), the graphics date to 2002, and the citizen 'fetching' system is completely random and opaque. Sit and watch for awhile: your huts will change size every thirty seconds.Most importantly, boo Sid, boo. You could've produced this bad Caesar3 ripoff and called it anything, but you called it "CivCity", and even put a tiny Civilopedia in it. Haven't you got enough money? The Civ Series is brilliant. Don't cash it in</review_text>
The games faults have been well covered already so I'll just say, if a Roman era city builder is what your looking for save your money and wait for Ceasar IV. Afer playing the demo I can say that this will be a FAR superior game than civcity on every level. It seems to be the game the makers of civcity were trying to make but failed miserably.</review_text>
Like the other reviews, I find this game a rip-off of Caesare III. (I didn't know there was a IV! Must look into that.) While the graphics are admirable, the gameplay wasn't challenging at all. It didn't take me any time at all to win, and I'm one of the worst game players ever. OTOH, it's a good afternoon waster if all you want to do is build and perfect your city in open play with no goals. Don't buy it now. Wait until it's cheap, like $9.95 or something.</review_text>
I swear if it wasn't that i liked final fantasy 7 and 8 so much i'd just break this game at then i'd move on and be happy. But i can't do that because that would be waste of money the only thing that kept me in the game was the fact that i did'nt want to waste money. This game makes kingdom hearts look like a M rated game. Oh my god this is so childish. You know how in most final fantasy games they try to make the main character cool they didn't feel like doing that in this one. You are a monkey-man! How stupid is that. Plus the other character are way more dumb looking that the main one im just happy i beat in and can put that awful exp. behind me. AHHHHHHHHHH</review_text>
Graphics aren't the most important part of a game to me.  I already owned Oblivion when I bought Gothic 2 because I was hoping it would be a darker and more mature "Oblivion" style RPG.While it does have much more mature content than Oblivion,.. I never got to see it because of the bad controls,.. bad collision and lack of fun.  (By bad collision I'm talking about your character walking through or getting stuck on objects.)The only weapons you can find at first are a tree branch and a tiny dagger.  There are no easy enemies to fight for a Level 1 character.  Even the little gremlin looking guys in the first cave by that pond at the beginning totally beat the crap out of you with ease.  The controls make combat an unfun chore.I'm a patient and forgiving gamer but Gothic 2 barely has half the quality of Elder Scrolls 4 : Oblivion.  If you've never played Oblivion and don't have an XBox 360 or a PC that can run it,.. then maybe you'll get into Gothic 2.  It has much lower system requirements</review_text>
The controls are very difficult and I understand they wanted "realism" but they killed a lot of fun by making you just so damned vulnerable to EVERYTHING.  I'm a long-time gamer and I can handle a tough game but this is just frustrating to the extreme.  Plus for all the people talking about immersion...I just don't see it.  I just couldn't get myself to care about the world or story I was in; it didn't grab me like some games do</review_text>
Bought this game on the strength of some reviews here but I was very dissapointed with it. Clunky control system really put me off</review_text>
The concept for this game is strong, and it's got some cute ideas, but the voice recognition - especially for the word "blue" - and the character recognition is abysmal.  It makes the "game" an exercise in frustration, more than anything else.As to character recognition...unless you write in whatever font the game is programmed to recognize, it's going to record your answers as something different than what you wrote.You are penalized when the system doesn't recognize "blue" or the correct number.If the system is so rigid that it only accepts one way of saying "blue", then the system should have a sound file that tells you what it wants to hear.  As to the number recognition, it should have a screen that shows you how the system wants the numbers written, or it should be able to allow you to enter your numbers and correlate them to numbers within the system.  (When I make this mark, it = 4)Also, the "intro" content is absurdly long, with no way to skip over it.  Huge waste of time after the first 10x you've seen it.I just got the game today, and I've spent hours trying to figure out a way to say blue such that the game will recognize it...now, I just wish I could return opened software.  I'm very frustrated with the entire experience</review_text>
Everyone seemed really excited about this game; supposed to be a great launch title, etc.Turns out that Red Steel fails to deliver like Dominoes during a hurricane. The graphics are meh (Ubisoft could have done way better), and controls are a bit awkward. This isn't because of the Wii controller itself... having played Zelda and Wii sports, I can say that the controller works very very well. So I am inclined to think that the bulkiness of shooting in Red Steel, and the fact that using your sword is more like clubbing a baby seal then fighting with the grace of a master samurai, has to do with the game design, not any fault of the controller. The storyline isn't that amazing either. Pretty straight-forward neverending quest to save your girlfriend (brownie points if you got the pop culture reference!), shoot a lot of Japanese people in the process. Nothing innovative to see here, move along now.It could have been a lot better. I'm selling this one back to EBgames and getting Trauma Center instead. Disappointing launch title.</review_text>
This was the first Wii game I got, and its mostly because I couldn't get a hold of Zelda.  Red Steel looks promising.  Certainly its controls are good, but it feels more like a game that's supposed to get you used to using the remote and nunchuck attachment.  A tutorial of sorts.  The problem is that it isn't much fun to deal with.You play as Scott, a man in Japan with his girlfriend.  You suddenly find out that her father is a Yakuza Mob boss and that he's got tons of enemies.  Your girlfriend gets kidnapped and so its up to you to save her, ultimately getting yourself involved in this family struggle.  It's pretty simple stuff.  Most of the game is told through voice acted cutscenes or graphic novel like storyboards.  The graphic novel storyboards look interesting, but its really painful that you can't skip any of these cinematics or storyboard cutscenes.  This is especially annoying when you die and you have to listen to the same objective over and over again.Red Steel's appeal is its gameplay, which seems to be the focus of the game.  The controls are solid, for the most part, but again, the whole game seems like a tutorial to get used to the Wii remote.  You use the remote to aim at enemies and the B button to shoot.  The nunchuck allows you to pick up weapons, reload said weapon and tip over tables (you'll know what can be accessed because it has a golden outline around it).  The nunchuck is also how you'll move around.  You can strife from side to side and you can move forward.  The nunchuck also allows you to jump and duck.  You'll be doing a lot of ducking.The remote is responsible for most of the gameplay.  It allows you to turn from one side of the screen to another.  The game itself will help you get adjusted with a tutorial provided at the beginning of the game (with your grifriend directing you what fish to look at).  You'll be able to use the remote for several things.  You can lock onto enemies with the A button and if you hold the A button you can zoom into enemies by moving the wii remote closer to the screen, or you can zoom out.  It's all pretty cool, but the remote is extremely sensitive.  Just the slightest flick to the left and you'll look to the left.  It's great to actually point and shoot at an enemy, your accuracy is really important, but now it's all up to you whether or not you hit an enemy.  Granted, the controls take time to get used to, but they flow particularly well.Swordfights are another story, though.  These are annoying sequences actually.  Mostly because the controls are clumbsy.  You'll have to swing your sword using the wii remote and you'll parry and dodge attacks using the nunchuck.  At first this is fun, but its so limited.  When fighting with swords you can't pull out a weapon.  This is bad when you're in the middle of a firefight and some guy has a sword.  You'll be forced into the sword fight even when all the enemies using guns are still up.  And they'll STILL fire at you and you'll lose health.  There's no way to back out of sword fights either, and that's also really annoying.  The controls just feel clumbsy as well, especially with its extreme sensitivty.To the gameplay's credit, there are some interesting things you can do.  For starters, when you're not shooting someone and you're ducking behind something, your health refills.  At first this makes the game seem easy, but you have to understand that if you're taking damage, or shooting at all, your health doesn't refill.  So this doesn't make the game incredibly easy.  Also, after a sword fight, you'll have the choice of finishing your attacker off or sparing his life.  Sparing his life earns you respect, which you can use to learn more techniques.The game doesn't look fantastic, but it's not bad looking either.  It's visual presentation is alright, but the part of the graphics that lacks are the games numerous bugs and glitches.  There are moments where you'll be staring an enemy right in the face and he won't move.  Won't flinch or even attack you.  He just stands there waiting to be killed.  Sometimes enemies will run right past you or claim they can't see you when you're in plain sight.  There are also moments where I shot an enemy in the back and neither him nor his comrades even acknowledged my existence.  There are probably more bugs than this found within the game, but it was hard to take after a while.There are a couple of other annoying aspects of the gameplay as well.  You can only hold two weapons at a time.  This isn't as annoying as it sounds, but I wish I could've held on to more.  Luckily, ammo is not hard to come by at all.  There are also glitches such as your bullets passing right through an enemy while he takes you out.  Enemies shooting through walls.  This game is just full of them.I wish I could say it sounds good, but it doesn't.  The voice acting is very mediocre and the soundtrack isn't great either.  Some levels sound good, but there's nothing memorable here.Red Steel has a good control scheme going for it but that's really all it has going for it.  It's not a fantastic game by any means.  The bugs and glitches strewn throughout are also just really annoying.  It's hard to recommend this game, even to die hard first person shooter fans.The Good+The control scheme works+Well, there is lots of actionThe Bad-Tons of bugs and glitches found throughout the whole game: enemies who don't attack, or walk right past you.  Enemies who can't see you in plain sight.  Bullets going through walls or through your enemies... this game is full of them and they detract from the gameplay-Sword fighting is clumbsy-You can only wield two weapons at once.-When you're forced into a sword fight, there's no way you can get out of it until the fight is over-Horrible voice acting-There's really no story to it-The controls, while good, just seem like another ploy to get one used to the Wii Remot</review_text>
I really wanted to like this game.. unfortunately for me, it blows. I'd trade it for a migraine if I could. The gameplay is pretty horrible, the sword scenes are reminiscent of PC adventure games circa 1992, where you press the "Attack" key and  swing your sword aimlessly at the bad-guy. The run & gun part of the game is nothing to write home about either. It feels like being teleported into the body of a cracked-out, 1 legged, drunken monkey.Also, I know the graphics aren't the Wii's strong-point, but that is no excuse to regress back to 8-bit. When you're trying to shoot someone across the room, it really sucks when you can't tell them  apart from a flower pot.....or is that a lawn chair?The cut scene's were obviously supposed to look like Sin City. I stress the word SUPPOSED cause they were probably strung together by some poor intern after the development team went into hiding. They look like an amateur flash slide-show. Kinda like what your local mom & pop video editor would have put together if your little nephew had gotten his way and had a Sin City themed Bar Mitzvah.This game is a joke. Anybody associated with it should be embarrassed.</review_text>
Playing Icewind Dale II reminds me of all of those novels written by American authors in the late 19th century. Though many of the novels were very well written, they never seemed to suck me in and continue reading the book. Icewind Dale II is like that. It looks nice, it supposedly improves gameplay, and it gives the player more character creation options, but I just don't really want to play it. Why? Well, at the end of the day, it seems as if Icewind Dale II is hurt by a extremely corny story; it is bogged down in numerous irrelevent puzzles involving you running around constantly; it is just not as fun as its predescessor.I bought this game for one reason and that reason was that I was addicted to Baldur's Gate II and needed to expand my party based rpg addiction to another realm. Icewind Dale II seemed to be the logical option. I was wrong. I was immediately confronted with a story so corny that it is almost embarassing to take part in. I was confronted with gameplay that caused me to run back and forth from one place to another constantly. I was confronted with battles so easy that I was soon bored.I tried to play it again, but again I was plagued with the same problems. I installed a bunch of unofficial patches, but those did not solve the problems with the terrible puzzles and whatever else.The overload of puzzles and corniness would be ok if you could diverge from the one path as you could in Baldur's Gate II, where you could accomplish quests at the order that you wanted to. Here you had to accomplish everything in a linear order and could never diverge from the path. Furthermore, the story seemed to be a retread of the story from the original Icewind Dale. In fact, the design of the game seemed to paralell it completely.The final problem with this game concerns the fact that it is difficult to play if you have no knowledge of dungeons and dragons rules. If you do not know how to use rogues or are unfamiliar with feats and the like, this game will pose a very high learning curve that you may not want to climb. I was mostly familiar with the rules, but it was easy to see that someone who did not know them as well could easily make mistakes or be unfamiliar with the use of certain classes (even though the rule book was pretty exhaustive).All in all, I do not think that this is a good game. I would just go with Baldur's Gate II or Icewind Dale I instead of this game.</review_text>
Firstly, I have been a big fan of the aurora engine for PC based RPG games.  I loved BG 1 and 2 plus the first IWD but the sequal to which I found, to be honest, awful.  I was raised with the 2nd edition rule set and I have never played the 3rd (with the exception of NWN) but the fact that this game is based on the newer set of rules didn't bother me much.  It's a computer game after all, the exact mechanics of the system I dont have to understand.  The thing that did bother me about this game is the fact that it was one big battle after another.  Your commanders send you on endless suicide runs.  It got to the point where I could simply leave my game runing for an hour or two while my chacters could hack and slash their way through the tide of randomly spawned criters.It got boring really fast.  Not too mention difficult as well.  The really sad part was, when I read the general plot outline, I was enthusiastic.  I have always wanted to see what would happen if the Orc races banned together in an army and attempted to invade.  But, when you and your 5 companions are the only ones on the front lines against an army... this is the point where (in pen and paper RPG's) that I tell the fellow who is hiring me to shove it</review_text>
Image if you took all those aspects of an MMORPG that everyone complains about: The lack of story, the constant level griding, the stingy monetary system, the stingy experience system, quests that require the FAQ, and completely stupid party members. That, in a nutshell, is what FFXII is like.It starts out well, though, with strong characters, beautiful graphics, and good playablity. If, the game had stopped at about 30 hours in, it would have shined as a great game. But, 40 MORE hours of grinding and subquests are neccessary past that point, where there's almost no story. In fact, what story there IS gives a strong indication that you shouldn't actually BE doing what the story wants you to do.Truth be told, the game is terrible, when all is said and done, and the rediculous ramping up of difficulty as the game progresses, the absurdity of the License Point system, and the very concept of BUYING AI routines so your party isn't hopelessly stupid (which, they still generally are), completely ruin the experience.Once, the Final Fantasy series was the standout line of console role-playing games. How the mighty have fallen. It's not the worst RPG out on the market, but it's easily the worst of the franchise, and one of the worst of the past couple of years.Play any of the other Final Fantasy games instead, and give this one a complete pass</review_text>
Lack of balance...if one thing could be pointed at as the problem, it is the lack of balance.The battle system was a good attempt and it sounded great on paper but it just didn't pan out. As has been mentioned, the number of enemies and the speed of enemies took away from the battle. Also, the monotony of the enemies left me wanting. During one area of the game, in the Sandsea, I had a chain of 164, I wasn't trying to get chain points, either. No matter how good the battle system was designed, 164 of the same enemy, in a row, gets boring.The license system seemed more like a dumbed down version of the sphere grid in FFX. I loved the sphere grid, wasn't so fond of this system. Obtaining the experience through battle to increase your abilities would have made this a success, requiring abilities to also be bought made it a failure. At level 20, Penelope had cleared the Magick section of the grid, although, her highest level magick that was of use was Cura...hardly an impressive skill.The storyline was like riding a snail. Too many cut-scenes and not enough interesting developments. The gil distribution was down-right ridiculous. Leveling up for hours, exploring every nook-and-cranny of a dungeon, and still not having enough money to improve your weapons...there just wasn't a good balance. There needs to be a healthy dose of risk and reward to keep it interesting, in past games, leveling up was just as fun as progressing the story...it felt like a necessary chore in FFXII. For nearly every enemy I remember, you got 1 license point per kill. By a rough estimation, 1800 enemies would need killed to clear one section of the licensing system.The last rant was the character classes, or lack of. Any character can be anything you want and carry any weapon you want (for a necessary price). While the openness can be good, it makes for rather boring characters and the excitement of getting new skills for a class is completely lost. After all, so what if Vaan gets that new axe when Basche is right behind (note: I mentioned a weapon...there are no special abilities unique to any character, either).Between the lack of rewards, gil, ability increases with experience, and monotony of battles, I would not recommend this game. I put 20 hours into the game and completely lost interest midway through a hunt (the mini-games are bland and the rewards for completing a hunt are nothing to get excited about, comparable to defeating a difficult enemy in previous FF games). I believe you can make a decision as to whether you will enjoy this game with a rental. Naturally, another person may like everything I ranted on above. Like any FF game, you hate the learning curve from the previous for a few hours and then become addicted...I lost interest in the middle of the addiction-stage</review_text>
I want to take a moment to address the battle system and the license system.  These systems, while well-conceived, have completely ruined the game for me.  For example, the license system is, itself, a very good idea:  It allows the player to craft the character to his liking and tastes.  The problem lies in the execution.   Say, for example you want to learn "Steal." Not only do you have to get the license for it but you also have to purchase it in the game.  This presents problems. In my game, for example, my characters possess a suite of licenses that they cannot use because the shops don't carry that particular item.  The system gives you flexibility but snatches it away by requiring that you not only get the license but to also find the item.   I can't help but to feel hobbled by the license system.  Because these items (which require licenses) come at discrete parts of the game, the developers have cunningly shot up the difficulty.  It doesn't matter that I earned the license for "Shield of Fire" at level 4, I can only get it at level 20+ when its offered in a shop!The game is very challenging precisely because the mechanics prevent characters from getting better-than-normal equipment after they earned the license. The sly, artificial way the developers of FFXII ramped up the difficulty strips away seems almost arbitrary and unnecessary. The cap of three playable characters (at one time) is the straw that breaks the camel's back.Lastly, the battle system, in my opinion, isn't fitting for a console RPG.  It feels like I am playing World of Warcraft or City of Heroes. The enemies are always faster than you.  It's nigh impossible to chase them down and they always are able to catch up with you. Fighting with a bow is an exercise in futility: the enemies will catch you because the game freezes you in place during firing.The R2 button, which allows you to flee, borders between being useless to outright deadly to use. While fleeing, the game prevents you from interacting with objects. So if you flee toward a door, you have to stop, pause, let them hit you, before you can escape.My mouth gaped open when I saw the reviews for the game online.  This game received astronomical scores, some heralding it as the best Final Fantasy ever.  That shocks me beyond belief.   FFXII would be a better MMORPG and an even sharper two-player RPG.  As a single-player game, with shoddy A.I mechanics, the game plays like a tumbling rock.Perhaps I am just too old school, but this game tastes too much like lollipops and bubblegum.  Your mileage may vary.</review_text>
This game looked so crazy I couldn't resist it.  I mean Disney and Squaresoft trying to merge Final Fantasy and a load of Disney cartoons must have seemed like a cool idea in Japan since they love cartoons so much, but in the USA it's just insane.  On top of that you have voice talents from Mandy Moore to Lance Bass, and as production values go you knew you had to be in for one of most ridiculous games in history.   Hardcore fans were bothered that this looked like a kids' game but aren't games supposed to be aimed at children and teens anyway?I was ultimately disappointed with Kingdom Hearts.  The world and characters of Kingdom Hearts is not really about a Final Fantasy Disney crossover it's just a place for the kids you control to have out their little melodrama.  It's like the idea of Disney meets Final Fantasy just takes a back seat.  Once you get past all the hype Kingdom Hearts is boring and frustrating.  A nagging issue is the tiny areas in this game.  "Planet Alice in Wonderland" consists of four small rooms of course you will spend a great deal of time in them fighting off monsters.  The combat is a blend of chaotic button mashing and watching your party members act like total fools until they die.  The worst of it is respawning monsters, you can't take a step without having to fight and re-fight hoards of shadow munchkins that you had just defeated.  Because of this you'll spend the majority of your money on healing items.  Bosses are a nightmare since they are hard to survive and take forever to kill (30 minutes is normal.)  Since combat is so simple it really makes the drawn out battles beyond boring.  After beating 2 bosses I was done with this game.  I know that Kingdom Hearts 2, Mushashi Samurai Legend, and Final Fantasy 13 all have the same combat woes.  I wish Squaresoft would learn that respawning enemies and bosses with 9 million hit points are a thing of the past</review_text>
Now, before you say anything, I have played this game and beaten it in the week provided by blockbuster(grudgingly playing it though)and now for the unbaiased opinion. I think that this game is so completely stupid. It and the sequel are retarded but again its my opinion.</review_text>
I really could not tell you anything, as I still have not recieved this game, despite having paid for it over a month and a half ago</review_text>
Please promise me you will never play this.  It is not worth your time.  If you paid money for it, try to find the person you gave that money to and kick them in the shin.  Hard.  Then throw your copy of this game in the dumpster.Seriously though, this game is absolutely terrible.  The graphics are bad even for the PSX, the combat quickly becomes boring as all hell, the story line was confused and the fact that there was a second dimension pointless.  There was no reason for there being 40 something characters, most of them were exactly the same statwise, and all of them were poorly designed.  The most annoying thing in the world, bar nothing, is having to re-equip all your character's spells whenever you switch characters.  You have like 50 spell slots.  God.  I don't think I even need to say it, but those crumbums at Square couldn't pull another hit out of their oversized victorian tophats if they wanted too.  They should really stick with straight to video Final Fantasy 7 anime movies from now on, lest they risk making something like this again</review_text>
The first game we played on Gamecube was Spongebob, Battle for Bikini Bottom.  We absolutely loved it and my daughter plays it over and over.  Thinking Shrek 2 would be similar, we rented it.  It's very hard to control the c-stick and it kept zooming in and out and wouldn't rotate the camera except for certain times.  The charactors were very distant and even if we used the c-stick to zoom in, it still wasn't close enough.  It's the same feeling as needing to put eyeglasses on to see something more clearly! Another aspect we didn't like was the four charactors are always together and you would lose track of which one was the main charactor.  Maybe we're spoiled because the c-stick on Spongebob allowed you to rotate in every direction to see what was around you and the graphics were so good you could see facial expressions.  It's surprising all the reviews are so good because our impression was completely opposite.</review_text>
I loved "The Incredibles," so I was excited to play the game.  I've only been playing video games the last couple years, and only off and on, so I'm really just a beginner.  Perhaps that explains the enormous difficulty I've had with this game.  My boyfriend is a long-time video game player, and he was able to do things in one or two tries that I labored for hours over.  Even using cheat codes did not really help me all that much.  I was surprised when I read the review that said the game was too easy.  I almost cried.  LOL  But seriously, unless you are a good gamer, you're probably going to be more frustrated than challenged by this game.  As for me, I guess I'll stick to action RPGs</review_text>
hi- it was impossible to use this product because the keythey gave me didn't work. imight make a fisbee out of the dvd!jerr</review_text>
Bought this Platinum game with much anticipation and it doesn't work at all.  Tried the download .exe patch and does nothing and to top it off half the original game forum sites crash too.  No one has any idea how to fix this game and all you have to do is look at the dozen of patches out on first game.  If they had spent the time and money to build the game and test it right like Blizzard does and companies like Westwood was then they would release a finished game but decided to use everyone as gunea pigs to test the product so they could try to patch it to work.DO NOT BUY ANYTHING from this company or its affiliates I think they are Alkida implants trying to take over the western world. If you want to play a game with style then wait until June and get "Titan's Quest" which should be finally a Diablo 3.Too bad this company couldn't find the capital to complete the game before release and would think anyone wanting to buy Spellforce 2 should be warned upfront to make sure you wait for about 6 months after release and buy an additional hard drive so you can download the new Patch fixes they will probably try to smoke screen you with as they count their money and send it to Iran</review_text>
I have a pretty decent computer (Athlon64/3000+, Radeon X550), but this game does not work at all.  Even after I download and install the patch from Aspyr (though there is no excuse for the game to not at least load straight out of the box), spellforce.exe just sits there and sucks up 99% of the CPU until I kill the process.  Aspyr support is unable to help.That said, despite other reviews here, this game does NOT install Starforce.  But maybe that's why my version won't work..</review_text>
I gave it one star because there was no way to give it less.This game when played on the X Box was great.  So when it came out for PC I bought it.  BIG MISTAKE!  The control are too hard to learn.  And when you are in a battle you can't stop to think which keys when used together work. There are too many keys that you need to push together to do even the simplest thing.I wasted my money on this game.  I deleted it and will never play it.  Don't waste your money</review_text>
this game is just the original + a crappy beam system where you spin to the right when you lock beams and the gamplay is totally repetitive also their isnt any in game transforming at ALL!! i hate this game so MUCH!! it is literally the worst DBZ game i have ever played {and i have played them all) i advise you if ur looking for a new DBZ game wait for the next one because their shure isnt anything new here but a crappy beam system. DO NOT BUY THIS GAME EVER!!!!</review_text>
Have you played any of the games in the Doom series?  How about Metroid Prime? Medal of Honor? Golden Eye?  Well, then you've played Halo 2, also, because ALL First Person Shooter games are exactly the same.  I don't care how many times X-Box magazine (odd how the magazine that drools the most over an X-BOX game is the system's magazine.) calls it the greatest game of all time, I'd rather play Mario Power Tennis which was atrocious.The story is absolutely appauling in terms of a Science Fiction orientated theme, utterly mundane, unoriginal, boring and just all around unentertaining.  The gameplay is so generic that it's as if this was the first creation of some fresh out of college video game designer, the music is cliche, the voice acting is flat, and Master Chief is just an all around retard.The weapons, oh boy, the weapons, again another lame aspect of the game.  The alien's weapons are like something in the kid's "toy gun" section from Toys R Us, and the human guns are nothing that I haven't used in a Resident Evil game.When the first Halo came out I didn't get the big deal, I didn't even play it, then eventually I got myself an X-Box, and decided to give this installment a shot - huge mistake.  Come to think of it none of the games of X-box are even worth owning a system for: Fable was decent, but got old after beating it a few times, The Knights of the Old Republic series was boring, and everything else on X-Box I could play on PS2 or Gamecube</review_text>
Halo 1 on steroids, Halo 2 is a clear Microsoft stamp on Bungie's creativity and control and it muddies up what was a balanced gameplay.  A hackneyed single player story that makes no sense, and has no flow, along with levels that aren't replayable.  You thought the Library from Halo1 was tedious?  Try the headache inducing map design in this game.  Also in the nonsense, the unneccesary switch to an Elite's perspective for half the game, along with a new group of Covenant bad guys that look like rejects from a Captain Planet cartoon.  Apes with mohawks, yeah, nice design.  I can only play one or two levels of the single player, and they are so noobish, it loses appeal quickly.On to Multiplayer.  Okay, in 2004 upon release, this was a great game.  It took time to go up in level, and the ranking system wasn't as abused as it is now.  Once new maps, kept on the harddrive (read mod kids) were released by Bungie, that opened the door to full blown chaos.  Now 2 years later, modding has died down somewhat, but a whole new slew of bridging and connection speed manipulation makes it roughly 25% likely you'll find a game with no lag.  So I still play on occasion, it's lame they can't offer dedicated servers so you can play your map of choice, choose servers with good connections, and then the modders and big gun noobs can find the type of game they want to play too.  I only pray Halo 3's multiplayer improves on this system, otherwise I'm done with the Xbox console permanently</review_text>
There is nothing majorly wrong with this game.  The plot is well-developed, the characters are customizable, and the battles are strategic.  This is probably primarily subjective, but I just didn't enjoy this game.  It's not because there were too many movies--it's because I didn't like the movie.  I also didn't like the characters or the villains or for that matter the aesthetics.  There were some minor but annoying flaws in the game which further contributed to my displeasure.  Which button to press was often counterintuitive, and so I often found myself pressing the wrong button.  Also, the game badly needs a journal and/or a destination guide so you know where to go--I once spent one hour doing nothing other than walking around a space ship trying to figure out where to go</review_text>
This is by far the worst instance of overzealous copy protection I've ever experienced.  I bought this game new at a local store because I've been itching to play SimCity 4 but that game will not work with my new video card.  Got this game home and it installed just fine, but when it came time to launch the game, it said disc authentication failed.  Tried it with the other disc, failed again.  Went to the company's support forums and found a lot of other people with the same problem and no one had done anything to help them.  Thankfully the people at the store were very reasonable and gave me a full refund</review_text>
Don't buy it unless you want the Starforce malware on your computer.  I understand publishers wanting to prevent piracy, but not at the expense of replacing the drivers I need(ed) for my DVD burner.  Check the search engines and see for yourself.  Would have otherwise been a great game, too bad it isn't playable because of this malware</review_text>
Starforce....nothing else need be said. Starforce singlehandly has destroyed a number of "could be" great games...I don't know since not a single one will play on a Dell XPS "Gaming" Laptop</review_text>
I bought this game because it sounded like a lot of fun.  I tried installing it on my Dell laptop and no dice.  It would not run.  I tried installing it on my Dell desktop computer and again, it would not run.  When I went to the knowledge base, technical support lists that if you have an integrated video card, the game will not work on your system.  In short, if you have an "over the counter" system, you cannot run this game on your computer.  I find this ridiculous and disappointing.  I would not suggest buying this game until you go to their technical support page and go over all of the requirements for game play.  Especially since these little facts are not listed on the box</review_text>
This game sucks.  It tries to be Sim City with extra features.  Unfortunately, the graphics are way below average.  In fact, some of the screens look like they were designed by a first year art student.  The Interface is clumsy and not intuitive.  I am a big fan of the Sim City series and this game really falls short</review_text>
This game has StarForce copy protection, which is software that you do not want on your computer. Reportedly, it replaces your CD and/or DVD drivers, and often causes extreme hardware and software problems. I've been a victim of the software problems, it basically crippled my very expensive SCSI scanners and it was extremely difficult to figure out what was doing it. It could be the best game that's ever been produced, but anyone who's had the StarForce experience is going to steer clear</review_text>
I actually recieved this from a friend of mine, which he bought for $0.98. Anyway, I said that there were television shows that I thought were interesting, but were only sold over in the UK (and so on). He told me that the AR MAX was a REGION X DVD reader. So, I took it home, and decided on buying a TV series that was a Region 2, and just recieved it today, to my surprise (not actually) the damn thing didn't work. Now I'm stuck with a Region 2 DVD with nothing to play it in. I AM EXTREMELY DISAPPOINTED IN THIS PRODUCT! If you are buying this for the reason that it reads other Regions of DVD's...DON'T BUY THIS PRODUCT! It is junk. However, I am thankful that I didn't even buy this product, but it was given to me. I hope that someone planning on buying this, reads my review first. IT'S NOT WORTH YOUR MONEY</review_text>
I have found only one game out of the many that i have tried that the codes on this thing actually work on.  This action replay is basically a twenty dollar or more waste of plastic and the cardboard that it came in.  avoid like the plague</review_text>
AVOID THIS PRODUCT, wait till PS3 with it's Hard drive an hope something better will come out.Memory cards are flash memory an flash memory is FRAGILE, one whoops an it's destroyed.Damn to hell Sony for making us pop 25 bucks a memory card in the first place.BAD:STAY AWAY FROM MAX MEMORY MANAGER... DO NOT LOAD GAME SAVES FROM THE INTERNET ONTO YOUR MEMORY CARDS. IT WILL CORRUPT AN DESTROY YOUR MEMORY CARD/CARDS. One memory card is worth more than this stupid thing. I lost two memory cards an ALL my bazillion hours of gameplay.ALSO... the disc sucks, when the PS2 is warm, it won't recognize the disc & if you break or mess the disc up, no way you can make a copy of it an use that. Your screwed!GOOD:The codes work an it's great to whip through a game that was driving you nuts or stressing you out before.If you have complaints, call Datels US office(727) 431-065</review_text>
FROM AMAZON.CA---------The Action Replay MAX is more than just a video game enhancer (VGE)....or at least it claims to be. My version is quite old yet but it claims to include a Region-free DVD player and a memory card compression utility (squeeze more saves onto your memory card). I have not used either of these features personally, but I have heard horror stories about the memory manager corrupting gamesaves and whole memory cards; some reusable, some permanently damaged. This and the fact that you must load up the action replay software to access saves that use the memory manager turned me off of using it. However, the real reason I bought the ARMax was for its codes and I'll get to those in a second.The ARMax, like the newer Gamesharks, loads its software from a CD. This is a major annoyance for me. Every time you load a game you must insert the ARMax memory card (which does I don't know what) and CD, go sit on the couch and wait for the software to load, choose your codes, then get up and put the actual game DVD in and wait for it to load. You can't simply turn on your PS2 and go sit down. In the old days of cartridge gaming you would snap the VGE between the game and the console so you could turn on the console and go sit down. The early generation Gamesharks had a little box that would attach to an expansion slot on the PS1 or N64 and that was it. If you wanted it to load before the game, you turned on its switch. Even if the ARMax was perfect in every other way (and it's not, btw), it would get a maximum of 4 stars as long as you had to boot it from a CD first. I mean, why can't the memory card part of it at least hold the codes for even just the current game you're playing after the system is shut off or reset so you don't have to load the software EVERY D@MN TIME.Ok, rant over. On to the codes. The user interface for the ARMax is better than the Gameshark. Functionally, they are very similar of course, but the ARMax just feels cleaner and easier to use. It offers a Beginner interface that includes descriptions of code functions (not for user-entered ones though, if I remember right), and a more robust Expert Mode. On big advantage, in theory, that the ARMax has over the Gameshark is its ability to update itself using your PS2's broadband connection. The upshot is you can download new codes for your favorite games fairly quickly instead of manually typing them all in using the controller. The dark cloud to go with this silver lining is that you have no control over which codes you download; its all or nothing. And since these updates are stored on your memory card (not the ARMax one), it will quickly fill up with codes and gamesaves for games 99% of which you will NEVER play! No wonder the ARMax has the option to come with 16 or 32MB of space on its memory card. It's to store all the useless codes! Any entered codes you choose to apply will either work, do nothing, or lock up the game. I have come across all, though to ARMax's credit, mostly the former. The absurd choice forcing you to download and save updates for every game in the PS2 library, when you may want just one, loses the ARMax another star. A note about manually entering codes: The sub-headings and folders for a game have their own codes that must be entered if you want them to show up in the game's code list.Finally, as mentioned in the reviews by Bret Morris and Glenn Nichols (Amazon.ca), the ARMax initially did not work with the new revision of the fat PS2 a couple years ago AT ALL. This happened for me as well. I returned three PS2s and two ARMaxes before I realized it was a defect in all current versions (at the time) of ARMax. I had to send away and get a new disc direct from Intec which now works as well as expected. Since the ARMax has been on shelves for several years since I bought mine, I assume any bought today would not have this problem. However, at the time there was no way to find out about this problem without contacting Intec personally. Retailers were not aware of the problem and no notices were posted on the CodeJunkies web site. This inadequate treatment of a widespread problem drops ARMax down to two stars.In my opinion, if you're in the market for a VGE, both ARMax and Gameshark have their pros and cons. I would assume both have released newer versions with newer features than the ones I have. Looks at the specs, assume nothing, and don't be afraid to e-mail the companies requesting details regarding any features you have questions about.I apologize for the length of this review, but I find there are very few in-depth reviews of VGEs on the web or in print. Maybe reviewers feel they are above using VGEs, I don't know.</review_text>
I bought this product after reading that you can update the code list via a network connection, or using a USB flash drive.  I have not been able to get either to work correctly.  After following their instructions on the Datel website on how to update the codes using a USB drive, it deleted my game saves on the memory card.  It also corrupted the memory card, and corrupted saves on the card in slot 2.  I have had nothing but trouble with it, it's slow and doesn't live up to the promises.  Their customer support is lousy, with a response that merely said...sorry.  Well thanks a lot to them...just lost hours of game saves!!</review_text>
I honestly do not like cheat devices, but since Wild Arms 4 came out, it actually now has a use. Let me explain...Unfortunately, thanks to an programming on the part of Xseed Puplishing (the company that translated Wild Arms 4) it is impossible to unlock two of the bonus contents in the game without the aid of this device, or a similar device like a Gameshark. Since this is the cheapest of all said devices, if you are hellbent on unlocking everything in that game, you'll want to shell out the twenty dollars for this.If it wasn't for this reason, I wouldn't even be interested in this product.</review_text>
Then this will not work on your console.But if you have the huge old ps2 console then this will work on you console.If you do have the slim console then you should get a game shark</review_text>
I purchased this remote control to make watching DVD's on the PS2 easier.  I had problems getting it to work consistantly right out of the box.  I had to press most of the buttons very hard to get them to work.  I hoped it would get better but it only got worse.  I am now back to using the game controler and threw the remote control away.I would NEVER recommend this product.</review_text>
As far as I am concerned this game is total garbage and I would not recomend it to any one. I do not know why it was ever released..!! Deer hunter 2003 is the same way I tossed both of them in the garbage. Trophy hunter 2003 is a much different story. The game play is very good and the graphics are up to par with todays fast computers..</review_text>
This intercooler WILL ruin your 360 with prolonged use. I was getting Error 68 codes and couldn't figure out why. Turns out it was the Intercooler sucking too much power from the 360. DO NOT BUY THIS PRODUCT</review_text>
I had this in my cart and just "Thought" it sounded like a useful tool to protect my investment. I cannot thank ALL of you who were honest and told me what damage this could do.Thank you all again!mckinle</review_text>
This product was not designed by the 360 team, and really most products that aren't aren't very good for your 360.This is no exception, it can and has been known to actually damage, and destroy your 360.  A statement from an 360 representative is to not but this product, it has caused numerous problems for a lot of people.  Mainly because it actually draws power from the 360, and that's not good, and leads to a lot of other problems.</review_text>
My Xbox was getting the red rings of death, figured this was most likely due to overheating, so I bought this thing. Not only did it not fix any of my troubles, I was having more. Whenever I would bump my Xbox, the whole thing would shut-off instantly. Found this out by accident, come to find out this thing has very bad connections. So for $20 you can buy more headaches than Microsoft is pawning off onto us game addicts...</review_text>
This is the worst item you can get for your 360. I got one and started experiencing many problems with my 360. It was crashing and freezing and ultimately I had to get my console repaired. Do not get this unless you want to hurt your baby (360)</review_text>
I'll be brief:First of all: out of the 81 reviews of this product currently on Amazon, 31 are 1-star.  That should tell you something.Pros:When it actually works, it /does/ cool down your 360.Cons:1) CrashingCaused more crashes than it prevented.  Running without the Nyko instantly reduced the number of crashes and freezing problems I had.2) Loud as hellTurn on your 360.  Put a hairdryer next to it, and turn it on, on low.  Step back and sit where you normally play.  That is how loud this product will make your 360.3) Hard to set up, frequently stops working.It took a lot of playing around just to get it to work the first time.  It snap fits well to the back of the 360, but despite that, there's some impossible magic to the angles and tightness of the power connector... we're talking millimeter tolerances here.  If you're off by just a tiny bit, it won't work at all, and the XBox won't even power on.  This wouldn't be too bad if you only had to go through this headache once, but no: it's loose enough that you risk disconnecting it (and setting it up all over again) every time you touch the power cord or move the 360.4) Many people have reported this unit causing actual damage to their 360s.  You better have a replacement plan for your 360 handy, and never mention the Nyko when you try to RMA your box.  If you let it slip, you probably won't be covered.That's it for the Nyko.  I returned mine within 2 weeks.I've been searching for a good cooler for the 360 since I got one.  Unfortunately, it is my opinion that there are NO GOOD COOLERS FOR THE 360 ON THE MARKET.  The fan-stands (yes, I've bought and returned them) are decent coolers, but require you to run your 360 vertically, which is a big no-no.  A number of websites have shown that the 360 DVD-rom drive will EAT your DVDs and games when it's vertical.  I had hoped this was overexaggerated, but then the problems started happening to me... I'ver personally seen what appears to be damage on my /mint/ condition games when running the 360 vertically.  I also experienced frequent game-loading problems (including hideous slowdowns) in games like Halo 2 (where you can actually see a progress bar) when played on a vertical 360 (it worked just fine with it horizontally).  So, horizontal is the way to go.In the end, I ended up building my own cooler out of some old (still loud, but MUCH QUIETER) computer fans and a 12 volt adapter, and slapped it on the side.  Works well, probably cools as well as the Nyko, but without the noise or the crashing!  Your best bet, if you can't do something like that, is to just buy a little clip fan (with its own power adapter) and have it blow into the right side/bottom (the vents away from the DVD drive) of your 360</review_text>
I bought this for my XBox 360 and it doesn't work at all, which is a good thing considering the other reviews I've read here. At least, by not working, it isn't damaging my Xbox 360</review_text>
I bought this from Best Buy yfor $25 dollars thinking it would give my Xbox360 a longer life and keep it's insides cool.When I plugged it in, my Xbox360 didn't turn on AT ALL.  After trying it several times, I took it off and plugged in the AC adapter back on to my Xbox.  For a while, the Xbx wouldn't turn on.  I thought it was broken.  I gave a it a few minutes and luckily it turned back on, but that Intercooler nearly broke my Xbox.DON"T BUY IT</review_text>
First of all, it's sad that someone would put out a product (the 360) that gets so hot that it tends to fry itself, unless you spend another 10% of the product cost on a little series of fans.Second, I attached this. I plugged it in. It wouldn't even turn on. Waste of money. Do yourself a favor and just keep your machine in an open, uncluttered, unblocked area. If you absolutely must provide additional airflow, just point a $10 clip-on fan at it</review_text>
I played this game until Chapter 23. All the Dancing Levels were VERY HARD to beat! I think this game is not worth buying-- rent it</review_text>
My son begged for this game, and the price is reasonable compared to some games so we added it to our collection.  He enjoyed levels 1 & 2, but once we got to level 3 that was it!  Unless you have earned the nickname "Fast fingers" or "Fury Feet" don't bother purchasing this until you rent it.  I spent an hour trying to beat level 3 for my 6 year old the only thing I discovered was that I did equally as well when I randomly hit the 4 keys as quickly as possible (about 57% accurate) as I did actually keeping up.  Being this is only level 3 I can only imagine the "Dance Levels" get harder from here, Good Luck!!</review_text>
This game is a joke!  It is immpossible for a child to get past level 3.  It took my husband about 20 tries to get past it, and he is a pro at video games.  (he beat mech 2 for x-box and halo2 the third time he played them.)  Don't buy this game for your kids until you rent it and let them try it out.  It is was a waste of money my kids won't even play it.  It should be rated N for Nobody</review_text>
The gameplay is just foolish and found the game annoying and un-fun!  The kids didn't even like it. Run, don't walk away from this dentist-office of a game JAWS-cr@p. (JAWS = Just another W. Smith</review_text>
my kid played the game for 5 min only, it is not fun. if you want to try it just rent i</review_text>
It's got some occasionally interesting puzzles, but the lame story and irritating characters kill whatever appeal Keepsake might have had.The Good: Unique and challenging puzzles; handy hint system helps keep the game moving.The Bad: Some of the worst voice acting you will ever hear; blurry, low-res backgrounds; dull characters and an uninteresting story</review_text>
We bought this game knowing Shrek movies are a bit raunchy, but thinking the game would be ok for a 6 year old to play.After watching my son play this game for a few minutes... I saw that he had to stun chickens and put them in a pot of boiling water while they were still alive. Then after that, he punched large turtles and threw them on tables where there backs were cracked open and died.  I can't believe a game that is rated E for Everyone would have little kids (or whoever played it) have to be so mean to animals.  What's next, ripping the head off a rabbit? I consider myself one of the coolest moms around, but this totally crossed the line</review_text>
I agree with other reviewers that the graphics and vocals are good, but I find the gameplay itself less than stellar. For starters, I've always been irritated with games that don't let you save your status whenever you want. Sometimes I just want to get in a quick dose of gameplay, but that's not possible with these games that require you to play through an entire section before being allowed to save.  That contributes to the repetitive, tedious nature of some sections. If you get stuck getting through a certain bit of the game, you're doomed to replay much of what led up to it over and over again.I realize that tricky camera angles are some of the challenges that are supposed to exist in this game. More than in the earlier versions, however, I have trouble getting myself lined up for whatever task. Another tedious element.I found this game to be more a test of my endurance and patience than actual fun</review_text>
I bought the KR Party bundle for my boyfriend's daughter for her birthday. She loves the game, but it has only been about two weeks and the mic is dead. It started with the static for a while, but then while I was singing, it just died completely. I know I'm not a great singer, but I'm not THAT bad</review_text>
I bought this mic in December and after only two nights of singing, it completely died!  What a complete disappointment.  Save your money!</review_text>
This game is, simply put, not good. I got bored to tears playing it, then ended up giving it away because it was robbing useful space on my desk. It is slow-paced, predictable, and not suspenseful at all. In fact, these characteristics are probably why it's so mainstream, even though it's laughable in comparison to real first-person shooters, which by the way don't even belong on consoles. Owning at this game means you are an average player. Any true FPS gamer knows what childish, pathetic garbage this is, while the rest just go with the hype. Many have successfully deceived themselves into thinking it's worth anything at all. It isn't</review_text>
I used to love this game, but there are so many better games out there, plus this game is overated, with a not so good storyline, and nerdy weapons, it's just not good</review_text>
I purchased this game when it was new, and my computer while meeting the requirements just couldn't run it. I put he game in a box and just a month ago found it again. The computer I have now should be able to run the game thrice simultaneously with all options on highest settings. Yet the game will randomly crash and cause my computer to restart and losing my 4mins to 2 hours work. I contacted tech support and got what I am now sure are just something for me to try until I quit trying and leave them alone. It worked. They win. They got my money and I got jack</review_text>
The copy of SimCity4 that I purchased came without the access codes to support instillation. When I called Electronic arts all I got was an automated phone system... press 2 now... EA's manufacturing quality control is so poor that they had a selection for products without access codes! I could never find a way to talk with a human beibng about the problem. The automated voice suggested solution was to send the product to them at my expsnse to prove that it came without the access code! I have returned the game to Amazon for a refund. I would never buy another EA product</review_text>
I bought one of these for my daughter as a gift & found that I need one for each GBA or SP.  So I bought another one for my son.  Then after we couldn't get them to work & consulted Nintendo we found that the wireless adapter doesn't work for all multi-player games & there are only a few games that will work with the wireless version.  Some gift</review_text>
I have always been a fan of fighting games.  As far as 3D ones go, I have great experience in the Dead or Alive series and proficiency with Soul Calibur 2.  I fear that Dead or Alive and Soul Calibur may have spoiled me though.  Recently I bought Mortal Kombat Deception and found it horribly awkward* compared to the fluid battles of Soul Calibur or Dead or Alive.  I felt the same way when I played Tekken 5.  Unlike the graceful and awesome animations of Dead or Alive or Soul Calibur, the movements of the characters in Tekken 5 are unrealistic and absurd.  Try out Christie in Tekken 5 for example.  Her idle animation is preposterous.  If you have access to Dead or Alive 3, try putting out Leifang.  Her idle animation is a thing of beauty.  Every one of her moves flows perfectly from one to the next.  This kind of grace is seriously lacking in the clunky Tekken 5.And now let us speak of character design.  Tekken 5's characters are boring and uninspired.  They run the gamut from miscellaneous boxer 1, 2, 3, and 4, to miscellaneous karate fighter 1, 2, 3, and 4.  Oh.  There are also a few shrieky girls in tight clothing, some of which seem to be Asian, if that's your thing.  And then there's a guy in a cat mask.  As awesome as that sounds, it looks silly in the game.If you have ever played Practice Mode on Dead or Alive you will probably recall with fondness that there is a feature that shows each move command at the top of the screen and keeps it there until you successfully perform that move.  This feature, as useful as it is, is not present in Tekken 5.  To be fair, it isn't found in any other fighting game that I have played, but it really should be.Without further ado, let me simply say that I do not recommend buying Tekken 5 if you have ever played Soul Calibur or Dead or Alive.  The intro video is about as much excitement as the game can offer (I especially enjoyed the suicidal bicycle girl that rescued the kitten).*But at least Mortal Kombat Deception had Puzzle Kombat, which rocked my socks</review_text>
Sure it looks good and the gameplay is ok but the final boss (Jinpachi) is really cheap and lame! Even at the "easy" difficulty, just a couple of hits from this freak and you're dead! The Devil Within mini-game is also stupid, some levels are just impossible and too hard. I wouldn't mind it if you could save your game whenever you want to or at least just before some critical part of the game but unfortunately that is not the case here, not to mention some save points are hidden. Imagine getting through the most boring levels doing extremely tedious yet dumb puzzles, spending around 2 hours or more to get to the boss level, then finally finding yourself trying over and over to beat the boss until you just give up but you can't save your game, then you're gonna have to redo the entire level again!!! That is one sick stupid game design! The only reason I'm playing this mini-game is just to get the hidden items</review_text>
If you're looking to spend money on this, don't. Having spent my teen years holed up in my bedroom on a Commodore 64 (and being the current fan that I am), I was really excited when I heard about this product. Unfortunately, it stinks. There are a couple of games on this contraption that are real gems, the rest being mediocre at best. The overall bad choice of games isn't my issue with this thing though. It's the CRUMMY JOYSTICK. Control is horrible. The stick is clunky and unresponsive and makes playing a real chore. As someone else pointed out in their review, often it doesn't even respond when pushed in a certain direction. I can't believe it's 2006 yet these companies releasing plug-n-play video game contraptions can't even make a decent joystick! A real letdown</review_text>
Not as much fun as I remember. Maybe better if they had a better selection of games (One on One, Hardball, etc.</review_text>
I purchased this product for my niece,having had positive experiences with similar items,and finding the price to be too tempting.However,what had been the hope of introducing her to the videogames of my generation turned into an exercise in frustration from the outset.The screw to the battery casing stripped with very little application of a screwdriver,the titles suffered from redundancy,and many of them required the use of too many buttons.What was the most disappointing aspect of this item was the potential it possessed; perhaps fewer similar titles and a re-configuration of the button commands would ensure the promise of this product</review_text>
I was really excited when I saw this item was out!  I had the Commodore 64 when I was a kid, and my brother and I used to spend hours and hours playing games on it.  I was so glad to see that Winter Games and Summer Games was included.... until the item arrived and I plugged it in and tried to play with it.. the joystick doesn't work at ALL when you move it to the right.  So, you can only use it to go up down or left.BIG Dissapointment.  Don't waste your $$</review_text>
DOn't buy this - it will crash your entire xbox.  Learn to play - forget the cheats</review_text>
If you are looking for codes like Game Shark had, this is not for you.  Not only do you HAVE to have a computer, If anything happens to the disk, you are screwed.  You won't be able reinstall windows, or install it on a new computer.  Some games do offer rewards like unlimited health for %100 completion.  So if those are they games you plan on using,  this is the best thing out there</review_text>
returned item for refund; found it cheaper at Toys R U</review_text>
SMALL MEMORY WHICH MEANS THAT U CAN ONLY PUT 1 SAVE ON IT SO U HAVE TO RUN BACK TO YOUR COMP EVERYTIME U WANNA SAVE!!! AND SOFTWARE IS VEERY CONFUSING!!! HORRIBLE BUY!!! I RETURNED THE PIECE OF JUNK!!</review_text>
I dont have much to say other than I did not like this game.  I was hoping that it was going to be like Fusion Frenzy for the Xbox but it was not nearly as fun.  The controls were difficult to use and the gameplay was not very good.  Some people may like it but I didn't</review_text>
I have been an extremely devoted SMB fan since the very first time I laid eyes on it. I own ALL of them, and so when I stood in line all night Saturday (and through Sunday morning, 8am), I made sure to grab myself a copy of SMB: Banana Blitz for my brand new Wii. I bought an entire set of controllers, anticipating the mini-game fun with all my friends. (We're huge SMB fans, all of us. It always makes an appearance at our parties.)But now I'm really angry. They completely gutted our favorite mini-game(s), hitting Monkey Target worst of all. I can honestly say I don't care that there are 50 freakin mini-games, because now Monkey Target is completely worthless. Instead of the amazingly subtle game play with bonus items, increasingly difficult levels, magnets, velcro, double bonuses, wind speed and direction, and the all-import ramp run-off you have... a cannon, one level, no wind or wind direction, no bonuses, and no special items.Who cares if I can SORT of pilot a submarine on a single level? Monkey squash -- no joy there. A lot of the controls for the mini-games are terrible. And so on, so forth. The new mini games suck almost unilaterally, but gosh darn, there are 50 of them! But volume does not make up for lack of quality.I love traditional SMB levels and the ones on SMB: Banana Blitz are nice. The graphics are beautiful and fun. But the best part of the game for me and my friends, is now gone and dead. None of the reviews I'd read mentioned the fact that this favorite of most SMB players was killed like this, and if they had, I certainly wouldn't have wasted my $50 plus tax.If Sega people are reading this: BRING BACK MONKEY TARGET. That's what people play at parties when they're slightly drunk and sick of listening to Super Smash Brothers, and way too awake to enjoy Mario Party</review_text>
At First When I Got It, It Seemed Fun.  Then As The Minutes Go By It Got Boring Quick.  The Missions Suck, The Bosses Are Too Hard.  I Just Sold My Game,  If You Buy This Game You'll Be Doing The Sam</review_text>
I really liked the first two Jak games, so I was excited to try Jak 3. Whoa. Major mistake. This game is nothing more than a lame racing-wannabe. I was very disappointed in this game. If you are expecting a platformer, look elsewhere</review_text>
Dont get me wrong the controller is inovative and feels good and is really a grea idea but the one huge problem that noone has mentioned is how these things eat up batteries, put it this way, you need to put new AA batteries in the damn thing every three days, and that is not cool at all! I will be buying the wire controlers from now on,The premium system should have included the battery charger im othere than this MAJOR ISSUE the controller is great, but again let me stresss this issue,...it is not fun to be in the middle of an online fight in Fight Night 3 and have your controller (that you just put batteries in, well at least you thought you did) die, and get you knocked out when you were clearely winning the fight</review_text>
This is a perfect example of false advertisement. If you're like the many that i've heard of trying to order a remote for the Playstation 2, Don't order this one unless you have a newer model. The picture shows an IR unit but it doesn't come with one. So save yourself the hassle and don't order this</review_text>
My son (7) used a gift certificate to purchase this game for his birthday. It came with 4 dics that we downloaded correctly but the game would not play. We kept getting an error message that our graphics were not sufficient.  We don't do much PC gaming, but we have a fairly new Dell laptop computer that we assumed was sufficient. If the item description had been more advising that certain requirements would prevent the game from working -- we wouldn't have wasted his time.  We have yet to receive credit for this item. A HUGE HASSLE!!  We'll stick to the PS2 games from now on.</review_text>
how many RPG's can this world make??  they're all the same.  open this container, take weapons and health kits from this dead body, use this spell.. KOTOR is no different, sadly.  the combat IMHO is just really boring.  when you see an enemy, the screen freezes and you decide ahead of time your first moves to make.  if that doesn't kill the enemy, your character automatically does standard attacks unless you pause the game and set up your next moves.  umm, how many times has this been done before?  if i wanted that, i could have bought final fantasy 129 or whatever number they're on now.  all of the enjoyment is taken out of using things like blaster rifles and light sabers.  it's the same idea as using your shovel or something in nethack (look it up).  the good thing about games like everquest and world of warcraft is that they took the stale old RPG formula and did something new with it.</review_text>
I saw a DVD player at Target for $30 yesterday.  I especially don't see the need for the xbox 360 remote if it's $40!!  Space-saving, maybe???</review_text>
A simple DVD player, as long as you or a friend own an X-box console. Simply push in a little plastic knob into the controler socket and their you go oyu know own a standard of the line DVD player.The maginfacation is great the rewind and fastfrward is great.It has all the extras a normal DVD player has and a easy to operate menu and layout.No overloads of pointless buttons just point out the obvious structer.You may be dissapointed in the response time, but that is not entirely the remote or players fault.If you own an old x-box console or a low memory X-box console  you may encounter slowness and maxed out freezing.Some mint condition titles may not even work.(I purchased "Little Nicky" sometime ago mint and to this date it still does not work on my X-box console)Batteries may play a roll.With out a doubt though this is the most easy and portable DVD player around with the acknowledgement of owning an X-box console first.A must have for a gamer/movie lover wit ha large movie library or a constant renter</review_text>
"Hey kids, fire up the XBOX and lets watch this movie!"That is what is heard through households that own an XBOX but for some reason or another they are still in the 90's and don't already have a DVD player.Like my title suggests, if you already have a DVD player, this is a waste of money. The only reason I purchased one is because my DVD player had problems playing some DVD-R's that I got from a friend. I had some money to burn so I just wanted to see if the XBOX DVD kit could play it to determine if the DVD was a bad burn or was it just my DVD player. I found that the XBOX was able to play the DVD-R's in question with no problem. However, aside from those two DVD-R's, all of the DVD's I own are bought from retail stores, so I really have no need to play DVD-R's, and my DVD player plays normal discs perfectly.With that being said, I only used XBOX's DVD playback kit once to watch the DVD-R's I had problems with. Because of the content of these burned "movies", there is really no need to watch them again....... However if push comes to shove I can always use one of my PC's or Mac to watch the burned DVD; no need to use my XBOX for that. I meant to return the DVD kit the next day, but never got around to it.The XBOX's DVD player is a good feature, but the fact that Microsoft charges you to use the feature makes it not worth the money.....unless of course you don't have a DVD player at all.</review_text>
My only experience with this product was after I opened it, and started to play a DVD in my Xbox, when I tried to pause it, it didn't work, and it had brand new batteries. I found (after much frustration) that if I smacked it against my hand a few times then it would work for about 2 minutes. I took it back to exchange for another in hopes that it was just a bad unit, but it was sold out so I just got my money back. You can buy a DVD player for not much more than this way overpriced piece of junk costs</review_text>
DO NOT USE THISthe dvd thing causes  the xbox to break. when u play games the disk doesnt constantly spin. it reads some and takes break so it doesnt over heat. when it reads a dvd, it must constantly spin. the dvd playback kit fryed my xbox. at most "best buy"s you can buy a dvdplayer that functions better for less money than the one for xbox.</review_text>
I would blame this game sucking on the Wii, it is unfortunate that the sequel to COD2 had to be this game. I played it on the X-Box 360 and it wasn't good there either. I was only able to stand playing the game for about an hour. After that I couldn't bring myself to touch it again</review_text>
I'm going to start this review by saying that I came to the Wii as a lifetime PC-only gamer. I have never felt the need to buy a console until the Wii and its fun controller system came out. The aspect I was most excited about was controlling first person shooters just as precisely and intuitively as the mouse and keyboard, together with the added entertainment of using it for other motion-activated actions within the game (rowing, throwing grenades, close combat, etc). As a result, after spending the night out in the cold to get my console, and flushed with excitement at seeing all the merchandise, I grabbed three games: Zelda (a no-brainer), Trauma Center, and Call of Duty 3. Of those three titles, I'm sorry to say that CoD 3 was the one to leave a bitter taste in my mouth.As I have stated before, I am a PC gamer; I'm really into my hobby, and love the satisfaction of building a PC which can manage all the latest games. I played CoD 1 and 2 on the PC, and greatly enjoyed both. By far the biggest problem with the Wii version, however, especially as someone accustomed to playing on the computer, are the graphical shortcomings of the title. I literally had no idea what was going on. I could barely tell which direction the enemies were coming from and the only reason why I was going in the right direction was because of the linear construction of most of the levels. Added to this, I had no idea how to get rid of the first German to engage me in hand to hand combat (a much advertised feature, which is actually just an interactive cut-scene). I followed the instructions to wave my controllers around wildly, and although I worked myself into a frenzy (causing my dogs to panic and think something really was attacking me) that inevitable German (I tried throwing all my grenades into the room he hides in) kept clubbing me to death. Even beyond this setback, I found that the controls were often quite poorly implemented. It is also disappointing (yet speaks volumes) that the grenade 'throwing' function that involves you actually 'throwing' the nunchuck (without letting go, by the way, unless you've got a backup TV) is disabled by default; trying to use it usually gets you to miss your target/get cut down/ blow yourself up. For the record, I know that the Wii controller works. I've played many hours of other games already (as the system conveniently informs you). This just seems like a shoddy implementation of it.I can definitely tell you that there is a lot of ambition here to convey the frenzy of war, with some obvious strong attempts at creating absorbing combat scenes. Nevertheless, it essentially boils down to being a messy soup of blurry pixels which, even to my gameplay-over-graphics mentality in buying the Wii, blocks the enjoyability of this title. To be honest, it has made me think that WW2 isn't the best-suited area for the Wii. After all, these historical titles tend to rely a great deal on cinematically portraying the visceral splendor of war, rather then pushing exciting new gameplay elements. My advice on the FPS front: wait for the Wii 'Far Cry' game and see how that turns out. In the meantime, there are countless hours of other great titles more suited to the Wii graphics waiting for your attention.Before leaving you, I'd just like to clarify on thing: this is the perspective of someone who has very little experience with consoles. Perhaps you're reaction to the game will be very different if you come to the Wii straight from a gamecube instead of PC/high definition gaming.Oh, and if you're still determined to buy it, keep an eye out for my used copy of the game; I'm going to need the money for 'Banana Blitz'..</review_text>
I bought this because the two Dino Crisis games on the Playstation 1 were fantastic survival horror fun, and I was very taken with the hype around this game which billed it as a lightgun game that was free roaming rather than on rails. What they didn't say was that it's almost impossible to use the PS2 gun as a fully functioning controller, which is what you really need to do. For anything but shooting, all the buttons you need are in really inconvenient places all around the gun and after half an hour's play time, I had to take a break to rest my aching joints.In case you haven't seen it, the G-Con2 gun has a teeny-weeny directional pad on the back of it, and it's this that you are expected to use to move yourself around. Now, if you try holding the gun in a standard "aiming" style, you'll soon realise that your fingers are in nowhere near the right position to be able to reach it. You could just hold the gun wrongly and reach it, but you need to be able to fire at the screen regularly to kill dinosaurs. And they don't sit still waiting to be shot! So for most of the game you need to be able to move and fire at the same time. And guess what? It's impossible. Bravo, Capcom. Oh, sorry, they didn't stop there, but added a further control scheme to allow you to strafe. To do this you need still more fingers so that you can still press the directional pad, along with two further buttons way down on the gun barrel at the same time. And be able to pull the trigger. But even that's the end of it - if you want still more pain, try using sniper mode!As you may have realised, the control scheme completely spoiled the gameplay for me. I'm not fumble-handed by any means, but you would need to be an octopus to manage all this. Which is a shame, because a free-roaming game about shooting dinosaurs is a very exciting idea. And Dino Stalker is otherwise presented very well. The graphics are very good and the monsters all look very impressive. Some stages are really good fun but my favourite ones are those when you are riding some kind of vehicle, which means you don't have to worry about movement at all - hooray! The levels where you get chased down a tunnel by an enraged T-Rex are probably the most fun in the game. The rest is ruined by the controls, which make your life hell. I'll tell you something else too - most levels have a TIME LIMIT!! In case you thought a slow careful hunt would save your fingers, this has been rendered an impossibility by the levels having a clock that counts down to zero - so if you don't rush through the stage, it's game over for you. Kind of negates the joy of free-roaming, doesn't it? You are basically stuck with dashing from point A to point B, killing everything that moves...might as well be on rails. I don't know why this stupid condition was added, as Dino Stalker was not created to be an arcade game.It's a real waste of potential, but it's only fitting that Dino Stalker was a miserable failure after release. If you buy it, you have only yourself to blame. I managed to finish it - the final stage in the volcanic pit was actually pretty good fun, but this and the other bosses towards the end were endurance tests that caused me agonising hand cramps to get through. Save yourself - I made it through so that I could come here and tell you that you don't have to. Could have been a great game, but it all went wrong due to the impossible way you are expected to be able to use the gun.</review_text>
I really wanted to see how the developers could represent playing as a dragon, and spyro is the only one that came to mind at the time.  I decided to get it, I put it in my console, turned it on, and was blown away...by the stupidity.-Basic StoryIs stupid.  Bad dragon plant mean gems to kill good dragon.  Spyro good dragon, defeat evil dragon.  Everybody dances because goodness prevailes.-GameplayAn atrocious story can be overlooked if the gameplay is good (mario?) but spyro has probably the worst gameplay ever.  It combines horrible, precise jumping puzzles with abysmally stupid enemies.  The puzzles require you to tap the jump button at a certain time.  If you don't, you go back to the beginning of the puzzle.  It was maddeningly hard at some points, and I am grown.  So how hard would it be for a kid?For the enemies, they should get the darwin award.  At many instances I was breathing flame (it has a limited reach) and the enemy walked right into it!  The enemies are dumber then a retarded 4 year old but margianally smarter than Paris Hilton.  Also, they are very weak dying in 1-2 hits.  There are also very few types of enemies (like around 2-6) but they have the same AI and equally pose no challenge, seeing as they are weak and attack you one at a time.The boss battles are so simple they make you want to shoot yourself at how moronic they are.  Also, playing as the other characters (hunter, blinx etc.) are not that fun.In conclusion don't make the mistake I made and steer clear of this game.  Get better ones for yourself whomever you are giving a gift to.(Oh, and don't listen to the other people who gave this crudhole good reviews, they are either A. Retarded or B. Never played a decent game.</review_text>
i am a huge spyro fan, i have been playing since the first one, which was great, the second one better, the third one, ok, forth one What happened!! this one, after purchasing mine from amazon cheaply for something like 5 i regret doing so, it was a waste of money seen as the whole game is a bit repetative and frustrating, you never seem to get anywhere. all the voices have changed. if you are a series gamer and enjoyed the origional spyro games, dont buy this and dont be disapointed. however i would say that if you are under 12 you would probably very much enjoy the game</review_text>
I haven't even got to play it yet because the game does not work on my PS2. After the PS2 logo comes up, the screen goes blank and nothing happens. I thought it was maybe just that disc, but I exchanged it and the same thing happened. I called Ubisoft and they said many people with the Slim PS2 have called to say it doesn't work, but they don't have any answers. Sony said that it is an error in the format of the discs, and it may not work in many PS2's. Do not buy if you don't want the risk of it not working!!!!</review_text>
As one that couldn't stand NBA Ballers, I thought I would give this game a try.Pros:create a ballerNice graphicsCons:Defense? If you are a fan of Pheonix Sun basketball, you will love this gameThe announcer needs to learn ENGLISHThe whole "I-Ball Trick Stick" is horrible and will have you sreaming as you're stuck on the second side game that is required before you can advance on And 1 tourThat stupid mic trick that allows you to score 4 points with one shotStupid Watch This Trick that you can't stop despite the fact that you can still move your player. You can't even block!You can not choose who you want to face in other game modes unless you are playing two player.Guess which game I'll be trading for NBA Live 2007 or WWE Smackdown vs Raw 2007 this fall?</review_text>
Ok let me break itdown for you. The Game isn't all thatb great, infact it sucks on ice, but the only reason i am giving this game fear grade is because of the year. Really you really can't blame them that made this game. The Fact Is 2006 is one of the worst years. there just throwing all the game at your face and they arent really that great. we see about 90% of games and movies arent doing that good. so my suchest is wait to 2007 when the PS3 and the wii comes out. I Promise you that year want disoponte. So dont buy every thing in 06, wait till 07. Dont waiste your mone</review_text>
This is without a doubt the worste game I have ever purchased. It is basiclly one big empty landscape with about 16 or so bosses that you have to climb on to beat.They could have made this a decent game so easily just by puting in some minions and some characters to talk to and buy stuff from. As it is right now it's just a really, really, really, crappy version of Zelda: Orcarina of Time.If you have any respect for decent video games you will not buy this video game unless it is for the sole purpose of setting it on fire and stomping on it</review_text>
Don't be fooled by the advertisments that you see in almost every magazine.  Blitz doens't offer the career mode that it was based around and game play itself is horrible.The greatest inconvience of the game is the load times.  They are WAY too long. Loading up your profile is an inconvience, loading up to play the game gets annoying and when you finish a game and go to save, you start to think "F*ck this".  The loading time alone will kill the feeling of wanting to play.Then there is the gameplay itself.  Bone crushing hits?  Please, outside of the occasional dirty hit (which is far easier for the computer to employ on you, than vice versa) the hits look like the early developments of Madden.  The plays are fairly easy until you get to the 4th quater when it seems that everytime the computer magically can score 21 points no matter what defensive strategies you employ.  Then there is the whole steriods issue which is laughable.  Give a player some juice and he misses 3 plays.....conventionally treat him and he misses a quater.  Either way, you'll never miss him.This game is horrible, from the graphics to the load times.  Save your money and go buy a game that will at least remotely capture your interest</review_text>
I ordered this from amazon, it shipped from 3btech.... and ive had no luck with it... the communicator its self is quite comfortable... but i cannot comment on the quality of the mic or the audio that comes through it because it will not charge... i called logitech tech support and the tech asked me the usual questions (is it plugged in, have you tried a different wall outlet, have you tried jiggling the plug at the communicator end, and so on) after all the questions the tech said that it was defective and that they were running dangerously low on stock of that particular one.So i guess what im trying to say is order at ur own risk and i hope you have better luck with it than i did</review_text>
ok first of all let me say that yes this mic has a nice look and feel to it..also being wireless it adds to its attractivness but over all this mic after a long time of wearing it can really hurt your ear....it becomes very uncomfortable to wear and has even given me headaches, being as how me and a friend needed a headset we both bought one...i no longer use this headset while my freind has no choice till he gets his 360 also, and to this day he constantly has to say "hold up im switching my mic to my other ear cause this ear is starting to hurt" with the 360 controller and headset being wireless and it becoming more availible just wait cause in the end this headset isnt worth the price and it wont be compatible for your 360</review_text>
This game was a really big disappointment for me.  I had to try this game because of all the hype and all the reviews here.  Having played the Nintendo 64 game titled Mario Kart 64 I felt like it was not much of an improvement.  In fact, I feel that Mario Kart 64 was a better game.  The only improvement was in the graphics.  Still, why do the characters not have fingers?  In this stage of the game you would think that they would have fingers by now.  Anyway, after I played the game I played a bit cheated.  I was bored by it within ten minutes.  The game is supposed to shine with multiplayer but it fizzled.  There are so many GameCube racing games out there that are so much better than this game at a much lower price.  One example of a better combat racing game is Burnout.  If you can get any one of the games in this series you will see what a good combat racing game feels like.  I feel that Mario Kart Double Dash!! is a dumbed down version of Mario Kart 64.  I so much wanted it to be a great game.  It no longer has the hopping ability of the previous game.  For me it just wasn't very good.  Double Dash!! probably would be better for very young gamers as they would probably be more forgiving of its shortcomings</review_text>
This game came highly recommended by people who generally have similar taste in games as me, but I'm still trying to figure out why.There's no question that the in-game graphics are impressive and the story-line is interesting. However the gameplay is nearly non-existant, and when you do happen to participate in some of the action the controls are either badly executed or unnecessarily complicated (i.e. the sphere grid or blitzball). Even the story is often poorly told, with stilted voices and hilariously bad character animation.If I had to compare this game to some of Squaresoft's other efforts, it is similar to a mix between Final Fantasy 8 and Chrono Cross. But while those two games were generally frowned upon by RPG enthusiasts, Final Fantsy X has recieved almost universal praise. In short, I'm not so much disappointed with the game as I am baffled by its warm reception.</review_text>
I bought this game on a whim, having really liked Need For Speed: Hot Pursuit 2. This game needs help. First of all, the frame rate is lower than it should be. There is slow-down as well. Even the game before this, Need For Speed: Underground 2 looked 100 times better. The car models in Most Wanted are a touch nicer-looking and there is a far better selection than Underground 2, but that's the only plus this game has to it. You don't race as much as fly around the city in a barely-controlled frenzy, trying to stay ahead of the computer cars. Winning is more by luck than skill. He or she who hits the least obstacles wins. Hardly an enjoyable way to race! I get too stressed when playing this game, so I put it away for a while. Definitely rent before buying this game.</review_text>
I started with Caesar2 back when it came out. I played it for hours and hours and loved it. When Caesar3 came out I bought that too and loved it even more and spent even more time playing. Both Caesar2 and 3 rarely crashed. Things have changed!I'm spending more and more of my time restarting Caesar4 than I am playing it. About 8 out of 10 times that I access the area where you trade with other cities it crashes. Without trading, you make little money and the game is essentially over.Other problems I'm seeing is overall performance. I don't have the fastest machine (AMD 2.1ghz, 512ram, rockin' video card with 256meg of mem) but there are irritating 1 second delays in addition to the crashes. I find the whole game to be difficult to use. This was not the case with Caesar3.Unless they issue a patch, I'm done feel frustrated with crashes. Maybe I can dumb down the graphic setting to get rid of the delays.My suggestion? Wait for a patch before buying --- or move on.- jason</review_text>
Well, it sounds like a great game, but after five hours of upgrading and downloading all of the specified programs and upgrades, I couldn't get the video to work at all, couldn't get technical support at all, and I gave up and have returned it to the manufacturer. a great disappointment because i love and still play the previous versions</review_text>
As others have said, this was a much-anticipated game. I played Caesar II and III and was extremely excited when I heard that IV was coming out.What a letdown!I didn't have any of the installation errors that others have mentioned, and I haven't had the game crash on me. However, the game is unplayable on my system - which is only a year old - unless I turn down 90% of the advanced graphics. By "unplayable", I mean ten seconds or more of waiting between the time you click with your mouse, and when the game responds. Even with the graphics turned down, I still get lag when the auto-save starts. As mouse-control is essential when building roads or aquaducts, this is aggravating in the extreme.It appears that Sierra's programmers and designers put a lot of work into upgrading the graphics. Too bad I can't see them!The interface is horrible and takes up the right half of the screen at 1280x1024 resolution. This means that you must rotate the map to build along the right edge. I much prefer the "tabbed" building interface of the other city-building games.Although you can build roads along the diagonals in this game - which you couldn't in earlier versions - the interface is not smart enough to auto-rotate the buildings to fit along the roads. You have to click and drag to rotate buildings, and lag - even at the low graphics settings - can make this an exercise in frustration.I dislike the new warehouse management panel. The sliders might look cool, but they're slow (lag!). I would've liked to see additional options for "only store basic goods", "only store luxury goods", etc. This would take some of the pain out of managing them. Trade ports are different also - you can't see prices!It appears that some of the scenarios have hidden milestones that you have to meet in order to advance. In the one I'm playing right now, I'm stuck because my prosperity rating will not rise above 36 (50 required to win). I have over 30,000 denarii in my treasury, and have been turning a hefty profit (and meeting various demands from Rome) for at least eight years of game-time. I have met and exceeded all other requirements for victory, but prosperity continues to elude me. My city is almost completely automated by now - the only thing I do is respond to Rome's requests for goods or cash. My advisors have nothing helpful to say. It's not fun if I can't advance.So while the game is pretty - from what I can see of it - it's got too many frustrations to be worth much more of my time</review_text>
First thing-the graphics are far prettier than any of the current 3 Caesar games out there.  Having said that-this game had a major bug right at the release.  How is that possible?  Is it unreasonable to expect a U.S. company to produce a flawless product?  Probably not, but Tilted Mill has some of the the best pros in the industry.  Basic bugs killed any enjoyment for me and the scenario editor is an unworkable mess. The advice offered by the techno weenies on the forums are beyond comprehension of the average consumer.Far better to go with CivCity 3</review_text>
This one turned out badly and I hate to say I bought it.  Buggy worse than normal, it is a rough game.  The fact that another patch is not yet available is terrible. The support site blames your system or card but offers no practical solutions. Too bad. I trusted PC Gamer's review and it is the first time they let me down but they have adapted more of a partnership with the game companies now and a liberal grading program that passes more stinkers. Do not buy this game...even when working it is not but a bargain bin game</review_text>
Please Sid -- with the dissapointment of CivIV, and now Railroads, say you haven't jumped on the "easy" bandwagon like so many other game designers.Sid -- the reason we purchase these games is because YOUR name is on them. This game seems like it was made for a 12 year old, not someone who's grown up with the complexities you normally build into your games.Please -- the next game you release, make sure it lives up to the standards YOU created. After this, just throwing your name on a game no longer means you will print some money for your bank account</review_text>
This game is in such a sorry state that I don't even know where to begin.First of all, this is not at all what I expected and what I wanted. Sid is known for very complex simulations and I preordered this game only because I saw his name as the game designer. Alas, the game is the most dumbed down train simulation I had ever seen. Looks like Sid jumped in the "easy, fast and easy" bandwagon.Second, the game is, at best, barely out of beta - a little more useful and less destructive than, say, a computer virus. I experience frequent crashes and the AI often builds ridiculous tracks.Finally, be aware that the game has one of the worst copy protection systems I had ever seen, which interferes with other applications. For instance, the game won't launch while I run Skype.Selling a game in such an unfinished state shows lack of ethics and disrespect for the customer. Shame on you, Firaxis and Sid Meier.</review_text>
I waited months for this game to come out. I can't add anymore than what has been said by others. I wonder how "hands on" Sid was with it. Could be a long time before any great train game will be coming out, if ever</review_text>
People, I don't know what you see in this game.  It's not really a bad game, it's just an average arcade shooter.  More often than not, I can't even hit the enemy because the action occurs so quickly.  I pop out from behind something and I'm dead meat.  Pick up the second one to see what it was like to play a good Time Crisis game</review_text>
I'd like to give this game a good review, but unless you read the fine print, you may be as dissapointed as I was to discover that it doesn't work on LCD televisions.  It also is incompatible with rear projection and plasma television sets</review_text>
This so called game has a very good story and plot. It keeps your attention, by making you want to see what happens next. However, the gameplay could not satisfy an 8 year old. Why you ask? Because there is none. You watch 15 minutes of cinematics and then are pretty much told what you have to do. There is really not much thought needed since you are pretty much led directly to where you have to be or the object you need. Oooooh. there are multple endings. Whoopee! You still have to sit through a majority of the same cinematics and virtually do nothing. Out of the 5 or 6 hours spent playing this game through the first time, I would estimate that I only needed the controller in my hand for 30 minutes. This makes for a good movie but don't buy it if you actually like to PLAY your games instead of watch them</review_text>
When I bought the XBox on 6-11-06 it came at a very good rate of time, my son enjoyed it then as we returned from a vacation he turned it on and we saw smoke I don't feel paying for an item at this price was fair to only have it for two months. I can't say the  person that sold me the XBox has even tried to email me since I've emailed him , hmmmm.</review_text>
This game is horrible. I rented it for 5 days and returned it 3 hours after i rented it. I had wasted 5 bucks. Its patheticic. You cant do anything, graphics are horrble, cutscenes are as long as some commercials, and the characters are gay.Pros:Sunny can bite, yayCons:Horrbiel graphicsonly 3 playable charactersBad humorShort cutscenesu cant do anything1 path gamehardly 3d, (seriously, it doesnt look like it</review_text>
Man!  What's the f#$%ing deal with companies handing over their biggest game franchises to second and third party developers???  Haven't they ever heard the old saying, "Dance with the one that brought you???"This game is horrible, and if you say otherwise you're in bad need of therapy because you're so desperate for a video game that you've convinced yourself this is worthy of your time.Or maybe your time is truly that worthless...in which case you should contemplate drastic measures.First off, the game is VERY linear.  "Call of Duty 2" truly felt like an open battlefield, whereas this one feels like a ride at Disneyland.  Sure the scenery is beefed up and beautiful, but how about those character animations?  The mouths aren't synched to the dialogue, and they do that mindless hand-waving thing when they talk...just like all cinematics did back on the PS1 and N64.The AI is horrible.  In Call of Duty 2 you couldn't just hold your crosshairs in the same spot and wait for the idiot German to pop up in the same place so you could plug him.  In this one you CAN---but you just don't care to.Also---"IT'S GLITCHERIFFIC!"  I shot a German and he flew straight up into the air, completely off the top of the screen!  I snuck up behind another German and hit him with a melee attack----the friggin' dude did two front flips and flew like twenty yards.  Mind you, he was in the standing position the entire time.  Not unlike tossing an action figure across the yard.This game left a stale taste in my mouth, and really just pissed me off.  Call of Duty 2 was 360's only killer app.  If nothing else these people need to realize that once you have a great game---all we really want as gamers is a great big expansion pack!  They could've added 12 more hours of additional content to Call of Duty 2's campaign missions and I would've paid $60, cash on the barrelhead son.Way to go jacka@@es. ..</review_text>
ok, most people have more then one system, i have a PS2 which plays copies, and the 360, hmmmmmmmmmm should i pay so much money for the 360 version????????? or should i go for the free copy i can download for the PS2?some people might say better graphics..hmmmmmmmmmm. dont care and many don</review_text>
Seriously....I was waiting quite awhile for this game to come out because its predecessor is freakin sweet.  It was all I use to play online.  After purchasing this game and playing it for all of 10 minutes I quietly put it back in the box and have not taken it out since.  Online play was non existent.  Everytime i clicked on a game it said it didnt exist.  It was ridiculus.  Letting someone else create this game instead of Infinity Ward was a giant mistake.  This latest edition adds nothing to the series.  Do not purchase this game....there are many better games out there</review_text>
